CHAPTER I.
The
lightning streamed athwart the heavens
in quick and vivid flashes. One peal of thunder
after another echoed from cliff to cliff, while a
driving storm of rain, wind and hail, made the
face of nature black and dismal. There was
something
frightfully congenial in this uproar of the
contending elements with the storm raging in
Bacon's
heart, as he rushed from the scene of the
catastrophe we have just witnessed. The
darkness
which succeeded the lurid and sulphureous
flashes was not more complete and
unfathomable
than the black despair of his own soul.
These vivid contrasts of light and gloom were
the only stimulants of which he was susceptible,
and they were welcomed as the light of his path!
By their guidance he wildly rushed to his stable,
saddled, led forth, and mounted his noble charger,
his own head still uncovered. For once the
gallant
animal felt himself uncontrolled master of his
movements, fleet as the wind his nimble heels
measured the narrow limits of the island. A
sudden
glare of intense light served for an instant to
reveal both to horse and rider that they stood upon
the brink of the river, and a single indication of the
rider's will was followed by a plunge into the
troubled waves. Nobly and majestically he rose
and sank with the swelling surges. His master
sat erect in the saddle and felt his benumbed
faculties
revived, as he communed with the storm.
The raging elements appeared to sympathize with
the tumult of his own bosom. He laughed in
horrid
unison with the gambols of the lightning, and
yelled with savage delight as the muttering
thunder
rolled over his head.
There is a sublime stimulus in despair. Bacon
felt its power; he was conscious that one of the
first laws of our organization, (self-preservation,)
was suddenly dead within him.
The ballast of the frail vessel was thrown
overboard
,
and the sails were spread to the gathering
storm with reckless desperation. Compass and
rudder were alike abandoned and despisedthey
were for the use of those who had hopes and fears.
For himself he spread his sails and steered his
course with the very spirit of the storm itself.
Nature
in her wildest moods has no terrors for those
who have nothing to lose or win; no terrors for
them who laugh and play with the very elements
of her destruction; they are wildly, madly
independent
.
1*
It is the sublimity of the maniac!
Nevertheless
there is a fascination in his reckless steps
as he threads the narrow and fearful windings of
the precipice, or carelessly buffets the waves of
the raging waters. There are other sensations of
a high and lofty character in this disjointed state
of the faculties. The very ease and rapidity with
which ordinary dangers are surmounted, serves to
keep up the delusion, and were it not for the
irresponsible
condition of the mind, there would
doubtless
be impiety in its developments. Such were
Bacon's
sensations as he wildly stemmed the torrent.
He imagined that he was absolved from the
ordinary
responsibilities and hazards of humanity! and
to his excited fancy, it seemed as though petty
fears and grovelling cautions were all that lay
between
humanity and the superior creations of the
universe! that power also came with this
absolution
from the hopes, fears and penalties of man's
low estate. In imagination he rode upon the
storm and managed the whirlwind. The
monsters
of the deep were his playmates,
t
he
ill-omened
birds of the night his fellows. The wolves
howled in dreadful concord with the morbid
efforts
of his preternaturally distorted faculties, as
the noble and panting animal first struck the shore
with his forefeet.
Emerging from the water, he stroked down the
dripping mane with a wild and melancholy
affection
.
The very consciousness of such a feeling
yet remaining in his soul, which he dared indulge,
produced for the moment a dangerous and kindred
train of emotions. These as before led him upon
forbidden ground, and again the wild tumult of
his soul revived. Striking his heels into the
animal's
flanks, and bending upon his neck, he urged
him over the ground at a pace in unison with the
impetuosity of his own feelings.
The fire and gravel flew from his heels, as he
bounded through the trackless forests of the
unsubdued
wilderness. The frightened birds of night,
and beasts of prey, started in affright, wild at the
appearance
upon the scene of one darker and
wilder
than themselves. The very reptiles of the earth
shrunk to their hiding places, as the wild horseman
and his steed invaded their prescriptive dominions.
Mrs. Fairfax and her daughter, according to
the commands of Sir William Berkley, were
conveyed
to his mansion. To them all places were
now alike. The mother after a long and death-like
trance, revived to a breathing and physical
existence
;
but her mind was overrun with horrors.
Reason was dethroned, and her lips gave
utterance
to the wildest fantasies. Events with which,
and persons with whom, none of those about her
were conversant, were alluded to in all the
incoherency
and unbridled impetuosity of the maniac.
The depletion and anodynes of the physician were
administered in vain. The ravages upon the seat
of nervous power had rendered the ordinary
remedies
to the more distant chords of communication
utterly powerless. From a mild, bland, feeble and
sickly state of melancholy, she was suddenly
transformed
into a frenzied lunatic. Her muscular
power seemed to have received multiplied
accessions
of strength. Yet there was a method in her
madnessthe same names and scenes
frequently
recurred in her raving paroxysms. That of
Charles was reiterated through the wild
intonations
of delusion; sometimes madly and
revengefully
,
but more frequently in sorrow.
There was occasionally a moving and touching
pathos
in these latter demonstrationstearless it is
true, but thrilling and electrifying in the subdued
whisper in which they were sometimes uttered. A
flood of pent up emotions was poured forth with
a thrilling eloquence which had their origin in the
foundations of the soul. Scenes of days long past,
were revived with a graphic and affecting power,
which imagination cannot give if their
mysterious
source and receptacle be not previously and
abundantly stored with the richest treasures of the
female heart and mind.
Because the by-standers do not happen to be in
possession of all the previous history of the
sufferer
,
so as to put together these melancholy and
broken relics, they are generally supposed to be
the creations of a distempered fancy.
So it was with Mrs. Fairfax; her detached
reminiscences
fell upon the dull and uninstructed
ears of her attendants as the wildest hallucinations
of the brain, yet there was more connexion in these
flights than they imagined. They supposed that
she thought herself conversing in her most
subdued
and touching moments with young Dudley,
merely because his name was frequently
pronounced
,
and that he happened to be present at the
disastrous
ceremony, which resulted so dreadfully to
all parties.
Among all these, Virginia's was the hardest lot
so delicately and exquisitely organized, so
gentle
so
susceptibleso full of enthusiasmso rich
in innocence and hope, and all so suddenly
prostrated
.
Bacon was nerved with the wild yet
exalted
heroism of manhood in despair. Her
mother
was wrapt in a blessed oblivion of the present,
but she was sensitively and exquisitely alive to the
past, present and future. One fainting paroxysm
succeeded to another in frightful rapidity, for hours
after she was removed to her uncle's house.
The painful intervals were filled up with a
concentration
of wretched reflections, which none but
a finely organized and cultivated female mind
could conceive or endure. No proper conception
of these can be conveyed in language, unless the
reader will suffer his imagination to grasp her
whole condition at once.Beginning at the first
inception of the unsuspected passion for the noble
youth who is the hero of our talein her earliest
infancy; and afterwards following her as it
matured
and strengthened by the reflections of riper
years.Every faculty, both perceptive and
intellectual
,
had combined to impress his image in the
most indelible colours upon her heart. He had
himself ripened these very faculties into maturity
by the most assiduous culture, and won her esteem
by the most touching, delicate, and respectful
attentions
.
All these things in detail were painfully
revolved
in her mind. Every landscape, every book,
every subject, reminded her most forcibly of him
whom it was now criminal to think of. Her's
was the sorrow that no sympathy could soften, no
friendship alleviate. The sight of her intimate
and confidential friend drove her mad, for her
presence instantly revived the horrid recollections
of the chapel. Long after the clouds had cleared
away, the thunder still roared in her ears. The
sudden slamming of a door sounded to her nervous
irritability, like the report of a cannon. Her own
shadow conjured up horrible images. The most
violent and the most acute paroxysms of the
human
organization, however, have a tendency to
wear themselves out, when left uninterruptedly to
their own action. Such was necessarily, in some
measure, the case with Virginia; her mother's
more alarming condition calling so much more
loudly for attention, and Wyanokee having fled,
and Harriet's presence proving so evidently
hurtful
,
she was consequently left with a single sable
domestic. Essentially she was in profound
solitude
;
and after the first paroxysms which we have
described, her mind naturally and irresistibly fell
into a train of retrospective thought. Startling
and horrifying they certainly were at first, but
still the mind clung to them. Many of the
circumstances
of the late disastrous meeting were
to her as yet unexplained. To these she clung as
to the last remnants of hope; they were the straws
at which she grasped with the desperation of the
drowning wretch. She had at first received her
mother's tacit acknowledgment of the mysterious
stranger's statement, or rather the effect produced
by that statement as irresistible confirmation of
its truth. But now she doubted the propriety of
her hasty conviction. She marvelled at the effect
produced upon her motheryet there were other
means of accounting for it. Would she not have
exhibited a like sensibility, had a like statement
been made, however false, under such
circumstances
?did
she not deny it, positively deny it
at the moment? Such was the train of reasoning
by which her mind began to reassure itself; and
it must be recollected that she had never heard
more of her mother's history, than that she was a
childless widow when her father married her.
Sufficient was left however of first impressions to
render her situation one of intense suffering and
suspense. She dared not ask for Bacon, yet a
restless and gnawing anxiety possessed her, to
know whether he acknowledged the truth of the
dreadful tale without a murmur, and without
investigation
.
But her physical organization could
not keep pace with the ever elastic mind; her
gentle
frame gave sensible evidence that the late violent
shocks had made sad inroads upon her system. One
chill was succeeded by another, until they were in
their turn followed by a burning fever. In this
condition
she fell again into the hands of the physician,
and all mental distress was soon lost in the
paramount
demands of the suffering body.
Toward the hour of midnight, the storm
subsided
.
Fragments of the black curtain which had
hung over the face of the heavens, shot up from
the eastern horizon in stupendous blue masses,
every now and then illuminated to their summits
with the reflection of the raging elements beyond.
The violence of the conflict in Bacon's breast had
also subsided. He rode along the banks of the
Chickahominy, his charger dripping with wet and
panting with the exhaustion of fatigue. The bridle
hung loose upon his neck, and his rider bent over
his mane like a worn-out soldier. His own locks
had unbent their stubborn curls to the driving
storm, and hung about his neck in drooping
masses
.
His silken hose were spattered with mud,
and his gay bridal dress hung about his person in
lank and dripping folds. His horse had for some
time followed the bent of his own humour, and
was now leading his master in the neighbourhood
of human habitations. The boughs of the tall
gloomy pines were fantastically illuminated with
broad masses of light, which ever and anon burst
from the smouldering remnants of a huge pine log
fire. Its immediate precincts were surrounded by
some fifty or more round matted huts,
converging
toward the summit like a gothic steeple.
Around the fire, and under a rude shelter, lay
some hundred warriors, wrapped in profound
slumber while one of their tribe stood sentinel
over the camp.
When Bacon had approached within a short
distance of this picturesque group, the sentinel
sprung upon his feet, and uttered a shrill
warwhoop
.
The horse stood still, erected his neck
and pricked up his ears, while his master folded
his arms upon his breast and calmly surveyed the
scene. Those warriors who slept under the sheds
near the fire, assumed the erect attitude with a
simultaneous movement, joining in the wild
chorus
of the sentinel's yell as they arose.
Hundreds of men, women, and children poured
from the surrounding huts,most of the grown
males, with their faces painted in blue and red
stripes, their heads shaved close to the cranium,
except a tuft of hair upon the crown, and all
armed
in readiness for battle. Bacon assumed the
command of his horse and rode into the very
centre
of this wild congregation,the fore hoofs
resting
upon the spent embers of the fire.
He was greeted with another yell, after which
the savages stood back and viewed his strange and
untimely appearance with wonder not unmixed
with awe. His bridle again fell from his hand,
and his arms were crossed upon his breast. His
countenance was wild and haggard, and a flash of
Vol. II. 2
maniacal enthusiasm shot athwart his pale features.
His dress under present circumstances was
fantastical
in the extreme.
A grim old warrior with savage aspect after
staring
some time intensely at the intruder, was
suddenly
struck with something in his appearance,
and stepping out a few paces from the mass of his
companions began to address them in his own
language
,
now and then pointing to the horseman, and
using the most violent gesticulations. At another
time the youth would have been not a little
alarmed
at certain significant signs which the speaker
used when pointing to himself. These consisted
in twirling his war club round and round, as if he
was engaged in the most deadly conflict. Then
he placed his hand to the side of his head and bent
it near the earth as if about to prostrate himself,
and finally pointing to Bacon. When he had done
this, several of the crowd closed in toward his
horse, and seemed intensely to examine the
lineaments
of his countenance. Having satisfied
themselves
,
they set up a simultaneous yell of savage
delight. He was quickly drawn from the
saddle
,
his hands tied behind him, and then placed
in the centre of the assembled throng.
Their savage orgies now commenced; a
procession
of all the grown males moved in a circle of
some fifty feet in diameter round his person.
Several of the number beat upon rude drums,
formed
of large calabashes with raw hides stretched
tight and dried over the mouths; while others
dexterously rattled dried bones and shuffled with
their feet to their own music. Others chanted
forth a monotonous death song; the whole
forming
the rudest, wildest, and most savage spectacle
imaginable.
Bacon himself stood an unmoved spectator of all
these barbarous ceremonies. He felt a desperate
and reckless indifference to what might befall him.
Human endurance had been stretched to its utmost
verge, and he felt within him a longing desire to
end the vain struggle in the sleep of death. To
one like him, who had in the last few hours endured
the mental tortures of a hundred deaths, their
savage cruelties had no terrors. A faint hope
indeed
may have crossed his mind, that some
warrior
more impetuous than his comrades, might
sink his tomahawk deep into his brain in summary
vengeance for the death of their chief. But they
better understood the delights of vengeance. After
performing their rude war-dance for some time,
they commenced the more immediate preparations
for the final tragedy. His hands were loosed, his
person stripped and tied to a stake, while some
dozen youths of both sexes busied themselves in
splitting the rich pine knots into minute pins.
These being completed, a circular pile of finely
cleft pieces of the same material was built around
his body, just near enough for the fire to convey
its tortures by slow degrees without too
suddenly
ending their victim. A deafening whoop from
old and young announced the commencement of
the ceremony. Each distinguished warrior
present
had the privilege of inserting a given
number
of splinters into his flesh. The grim old
savage
who had first identified Bacon as the slayer of
their chief, stepped forward and commenced the
operation. He thrust in the tearing torments with
a ferocious delight, not a little enhanced by the
physical convulsive movements of his victim at
every new insertion. Worn out nature however
could not endure the uninterrupted completion of
the process, and the victim swooned away.
His body hung by the thongs which had bound
his waist and hands to the stake, his head
drooping
forward as if the spirit had already taken its
flight. He was immediately let down and the
tenderest care observed to resuscitate him, in order
that they might not be cheated of their full
revenge
.
His head and throat were bathed in cold
water and his parched lips moistened through the
medium of a gourd. At length he revived, and
strange as it may appear, to a keener consciousness
of his situation than he had felt since he left the
church. All the wild horrors of his fate stared
him in the face. The savages screamed with delight
at his returning animation. Copious drafts of
water were administered as he called for them.
The most intense pain was already experienced
from the festering wounds around each of the
wooden daggers driven into his flesh. Again he
prayed that some of them might instantaneously
reach his heart, but his prayer was not destined to
be granted. He was again fastened to the stake,
and the second in dignity and authority proceeded
to perform his share of the brutal exhibition. At
this moment a piercing scream rent the air, and all
tongues were mute, all hands suspended.
The sound proceeded from the extreme right of
the encampment. Here a larger hut than the rest
stood in solitary dignity apart from the others, like
an officer's
marque
in a military encampment. In
a few moments the rude door was thrust aside and
an Indian female of exquisite proportions rushed
to the scene of butchery, and threw herself
between
the half immolated victim and his
bloodthirsty
tormentors. Upon her head she wore a
rude crown, composed of a wampum belt tightly
encircling her brows, and surmounted by a circlet
of the plumes of the kingfisher, facing outwards
at the top. Around her waist was belted a short
frock of dressed deer-skin, which fell in folds
about her knees, and was ornamented around the
fringed border with beads and wampum. Over
her left shoulder and bust she gracefully wore a
variegated skin dressed with the hair facing
externally
;
from this her right arm extended, bare to
the shoulder, save a single clasp at the wrist; and
she carried in her hand a long javelin mounted at
the end with a white crystal. The remaining parts
of her figure exhibited their beautiful proportions
neatly fitted with a pair of buck-skin leggins,
extended
and fringed on the seam with porcupine
quills, copper and glass ornaments. Similar de
2*
corations were visible on her exquisitely
proportioned
feet and ankles. Thrusting her javelin in
the ground with energy, and proudly raising her
head, she cast a withering glance of scorn and
indignation
upon the perpetrators of the cruelty.
Her address, translated into English, was to the
following
purport: Is it for this, and she pointed
to Bacon's bleeding wounds, that I have been
invested
with the authority of my sires? Was it to
witness the perpetration of these cruelties that I
have been almost dragged from the house of my
pale faced friends? Scarcely has the fire burned out
which was kindled to celebrate my arrival among
you, before it is rekindled to sacrifice in its flames
him who redeemed me from captivity. Is this the
return which Chickahominies make for past
favours
?
If so, I pray you to tear from my person
these emblems of my authority among you.
She was immediately answered by the old
warrior
who had commenced the tortures; Did not
the
[1]
[1]
This term originated in Virginia.
long knife slay the chief of our nation?
He was answered by a yell of savage delight
from all the warriors present. Wyanokee (for it
was she, as the reader has no doubt already
surmised
)
continued, Ay, he did slay King Fisher
and his sonbut were they not unjustly
attempting
to take away the property of the pale faces?
and did they not commit the deed against their
solemn promise and treaty, and after they had
smoked the pipe of peace? For shame, warriors
and menwould ye turn squaws, and murder a
brave and noble youth because he had fought for
his own people and for the preservation of his own
life?
Her harangue was not received with the
submission
and respect which she expectedmany
murmured at her defence, and claimed the death of
the captive as a prescriptive right and an act of
retributive justice. She advanced to cut the cords
which bound the prisoner, but twenty more
powerful
arms instantly arrested her movement.
Tomahawks
were raised in frightful array, while deep and
loud murmurs of discontent, and demands for
vengeance
rent the air. She placed herself before the
captive, and elevating her person to its utmost
height, and extending her hands before him as a
protection
,
she cried, Strike your tomahawks here,
into the daughter of your chief, of him who led you
on to battles and to victory, but harm not the
defenceless
stranger. The principal warriors held
a consultation as to the fate of the prisoner. It was
of but short duration, there being few dissenting
voices to the proposition of the old savage, already
mentioned as principal spokesman of the party.
They soon returned and announced to their new
queen that the council of the nation had decreed
the prisoner's death. Never, never!
exclaimed
the impassioned maiden, unless you first
cleave off these hands with which I will protect
him from your fury. Ha! she cried, as a
sudden thought seemed to strike her; there is
one plan of redemption by your own laws. I will
be his wife! A deep blush suffused her cheeks
as she forced the reluctant announcement from her
lips. An expression of sadness and
disappointment
soon spread itself over the countenances of
the revengeful warriors, for they knew that she
had spoken the truth. Another council was
immediately
held; at which it was determined that
their youthful queen, might according to the usages
of the nation, take the captive for her husband, in
the place of her kinsman who was slain. When
this was proclaimed, Wyanokee slowly and
doubtingly
turned her eyes upon Bacon to see whether
the proposition met a willing response in his breast.
A single glance sufficed to convince her that it did
not. Instantly, however, recovering her
self-possession
,
she cut the cords and led him to her hut,
where after having been reinvested with the sad
remnants of his bridal finery, we must leave him
for the night.
CHAPTER II.
The
several causes of discontent in the
colony
of Virginia long nourished in secret, or
manifesting
themselves in partial riots and insurrections,
were now rapidly maturing, and only the
slightest
incident was wanting to precipitate them into
open rebellion.
Since the death of Opechancanough, the
Indians
,
deprived of the benefits of federative
concert
,
had made but few attempts to disturb the
tranquillity of the colony. Several of the tribes
had retired westward, and those which remained,
reduced in their numbers and still more in strength
by the want of a common leader, lingered on the
frontiers, exchanging their superfluous productions
at stated marts with their former enemies. A long
peace, added to a deportment almost invariably
pacific
,
had in a great measure relaxed the vigilance
of the colonists, and the Indians were admitted to
a free intercourse with the people of all the
counties
.
It was scarcely to be expected that during
an intercourse so irregular and extensive no
grounds of uneasiness should arise. Several thefts
had been committed upon the tobacco, corn, and
other property of the colonists.
These depredations were becoming daily more
numerous and alarming, and repeated petitions had
been sent in from all parts of the colony calling
upon Sir William Berkley in the most urgent
terms to afford them protection. The Governor
remained singularly deaf to these reasonable
demands
,
and took no steps to afford that protection
to the citizens for which government was in a
great measure established. Some excuse was
offered
by his friends and supporters by pleading his
great age and long services. Sir H. Chicerly,
who had some time before arrived in the colony,
clothed with the authority of Lieutenant Governor,
and who had till now remained an inactive
participator
of the gubernatorial honours, began to
collect
the militia of the state; but Sir William was
no sooner informed of these proceedings, so well
calculated to allay the rising popular ferment, than
he at once construed it into an attempt to
supersede
his authority, and forthwith disbanded the
troops already collected, and countermanded the
orders for raising more, which had been sent by his
subordinate through the several counties. These
high-handed measures of an obstinate and
superannuated
man, inflamed the public mind.
Meetings
were called without any previous concert in
almost every county in the province, and the most
indignant remonstrances were sent in to the
Governor
.
These, however, only served to stimulate his
obstinacy, while the continued depredations of the
Indians wrought up the general feeling of
dissatisfaction
into a blaze of discontent. While these
things were in progress, a circumstance happened,
which, while it brought the contest to an
immediate
issue, had at the same time an important
bearing upon all the principal personages of our
narrative
.
On the night succeeding the melancholy
catastrophe at the chapel, related in the last
chapter
,
the tribes of Indians which had formerly been
leagued together in the Powhatan confederacy,
simultaneously
rose at dead of night and perpetrated
the most horrid butcheries upon men, women, and
children, in every part of the colony. The
council
had scarcely convened on the next morning
before
couriers from every direction arrived with the
dreadful tidings. Among others, there came one
who announced to the Governor that his own
country
seat had been consumed by the fires of the
savage
incendiaries, and that Mrs. Fairfax, who had
been removed thither for change of scene by the
advice
of her physician, was either buried in its ruins
or carried away captive by the Indians. Public
indignation was roused to its highest pitch, but it
was confidently expected, now that his excellency
himself was a sufferer both in property and
feelings
,
that he would recede from his obstinate
refusal
to afford relief. But strange to say, in
defiance
of enemies, and regardless of the
remonstrances
of his friends, he still persisted. The result
ensued which might have been expected;
meetings
of the people, which had before been called
called from the impulse of the moment, and
without
concert, were now regularly organized, and
immediate
steps taken to produce uniformity of
action
throughout the different counties.
While these elements of civil discord are
fermenting
,
we will pursue the adventures of our
hero, whom we left just rescued from the hands
of the relentless savages. The new queen of the
Chickahominies, after having conducted Bacon to
her own rude palace, retired for a short period in
order
to allow him just time to prepare himself for
her reception. An Indian doctor was
immediately
summoned and directed to extract the
splinters
and dress the wounds. The departure of this
wild and fantastical practitioner of the healing art
was the signal for her own entrance. Slowly and
doubtfully she approached her visiter, who was
reclining
almost exhausted upon a mat. Upon her
entrance he attempted to rise and profess his
gratitude
,
but overcome with pain, sorrow, and
weakness
,
he fell back upon his rude couch, a grim
smile and wild expression crossing his features.
She gracefully and benignantly motioned him to
desist, and at once waived all ceremony by seating
herself on a mat beside him. Both remained in a
profound and painful silence for some moments.
Bacon's mind could dwell upon nothing but the
horrid images of the preceding hours of the night.
Regardless of her presence and her ignorance of
those circumstances which dwelt so painfully upon
his memory, he remained in a wild abstraction,
now and then casting a glance of startled
recognition
and surprise at his royal hostess.
She examined him far more intently and with not
less surprise, after the subsidence of her first
embarrassment
.
Her sparkling eyes ran over his
strange dress and condition, with the rapidity of
thought, but evidently with no satisfactory result.
She was completely at a loss to understand the
cause of his visit, and the singular time and
appearance
in which he had chosen to make it. It is not
improbable that female vanity, or the whisperings
of a more tender passion, connected it in some way
with her own recent flight. These scarcely
recognised
impressions produced however an evident
embarrassment in her manner of proceeding. She
longed to ask if Virginia was his bride, yet
dreaded
to do so both on her own account and his. She
had lived long enough in civilized society to
understand
the signification of his bridal dress, but
she was utterly at a loss to divine why he should
appear in such a garb covered with mud, as if he
had ridden in haste, in the midst of a warlike
nation
,
and on the very night appointed for the
celebration
of his nuptials, unless indeed she might
solve the mystery in the agreeable way before
suggested
.
Catching one of the originally white bridal
flowers of his attire between her slender fingers,
she said with a searching glance; Faded so
soon? He covered his face with his hands, and
threw himself prostrate upon the mat, writhing like
one in the throes of expiring agony.
His benevolent hostess immediately called a
little Indian attendant, in order to despatch him
for the doctor; but her guest shook his head and
Vol. II. 3
motioned with his uplifted hand for her to desis.
She reseated herself, more at a loss than ever to
account for his present appearance and conduct.
She had supposed that he was suffering from the
pain of his wounds, but she now saw that of these
he was entirely regardless. She became aware
that a more deeply seated pain afflicted him. Again
he turned his face toward the roof of the hut, his
hands crossed upon his breast, and his bosom
racked
with unutterable misery.
Is the pretty Virginia dead?
The blackness of hell and horror was in his
face as he turned a scowl upon his interrogator,
and replied, Is this a new method of savage
torture
?
If so, call in the first set, they are kind and
benignant compared to you. But seeming
suddenly
to recollect that she was ignorant of the pain she
inflicted, he took her hand kindly and respectfully,
and continued, Yes, Wyanokee, she is indeed
dead to me. If you regard the peace of my soul,
or the preservation of my senses, never whisper
her name to the winds where it will be wafted to
my ears. Never breathe what she has taught you.
Be an Indian princess, but for God's sake look,
speak, or act not in such a way as to remind me of
passed days. Tear open these wounds, inflict
fresh torturesyea, torture others if you will, so I
but horrify my mind with any other picture than
her's. O God, did ever sister rise before man's
imagination in such a damning form of loveliness?
With most men, that little word would suffice to
dispel the horrid illusion! but with me, cursed
as I have been from my birth, and as I still am
deeper cursed, the further I pursue this wretched
shadow called happiness, I would wed her
to-morrow
,
yea were the curse of the unpardonable
sin denounced upon me from the altar instead of
the benediction. For her I would go forth to the
world, branded with a deeper damnation than ever
encircled the brows of the first great murderer. I
would be the scorn, the jest, the by-word of
present
generations, and a never dying beacon to
warn those who come after me.
As he proceeded, Wyanokee fixed her dark
penetrating eyes upon his face, until her own
countenance settled into the expression of
reverential
awe, with which the Indian invariably listens
to the ravings of the maniac. At every period
she moved herself backward on the mat, until at
the conclusion, she had arrived at a respectful
distance
,
and crossed her hands in superstitious dread.
A single glance conveyed her impressions to his
mind, and he resumed, No, no, my gentle
preserver
,
reason is not dethroned, she still presides
here, (striking his forehead,) a stern spectator of
the unholy strife which is kept up between her
sister faculties. Leaning toward her upon his
elbow, he continued in a thrilling whisper, You
have heard me read from the sacred volume of the
tortures prepared for the damned! of a future
existence
,
in which the torments of ten thousand
deaths shall be inflicted, and yet the immortal
sufferer find no death! His soul will be prepared
for the endurance! I have already a foretaste of
that horrible eternity! And yet you see I preserve
the power to know and to endure! Is it not a
dread mystery in this frail compound of ours
and portentous of evil to come, that this faculty
of supporting misery so long outlives the good?
The wise men of our race teach us that every
pain endured is a preparation of the opposite
faculty
to enjoy pleasure! that our torpid fluids would
stagnate without these contrasted stimulants; 'tis
all a delusion, a miserable invention of the enemy.
Man can suffer in this life a compound of horrors,
for which its pleasures and allurements have no
equivalent; yea, and he suffers them after all chance
for happiness has vanished for ever. The pleasures
of the world are like the morning glories of a sea
of ice. The sun rises and sparkles in glittering
rainbows for an hour, and then sinks behind the
dark blue horizon, and leaves the late enraptured
beholder, to feel the chill of death creeping along
his veins, until his heart is as cold and dead as the
icebergs around `an atom of pleasure, and a
universe
of pain.'
His hearer sat in the most profound
bewilderment
;
much of his discourse was to her
unintelligible
,
and notwithstanding his protestations to
the contrary, she still retained her first impressions
as to the state of his mind. She knew something of
the various relations existing between the most
important personages of our story, and in her own
mind, had already begun to account for his present
state. She supposed him to have been rudely torn
from his bride. Her object therefore in the
following
words, was to learn something more of these
particulars, and at the same time to soothe the
excited
feelings of her guest.
The great Father of the white man at
Jamestown
will restore your bride. Does not your
good book say, `whom the' Great Spirit `has
joined together let no man put asunder?'
Ay! replied Bacon, but what does it say
when they are first joined together by the ties of
blood? Besides, he never did join us together in
the holy covenant. He stamped it with his curse?
He denounced his veto against it at the very foot
of the altar. The same voice which thundered
upon mount Sinai spoke there. His servant stood
up before him and asked, `If any man can show
just cause why they may not lawfully be joined
together let him now speak, or else hereafter
forever
hold his peace.' And lo, both heaven and
earth interposed at the same moment. The
thunders
of heaven rent the air, and that most fearful
man appeared as if by miracle. Again lowering
his voice to a whisper, he continued, As I rode
upon the storm last night, and communed with the
spirits of the air, some one whispered in my ear,
that the heavens were rent asunder and he came
upon a thunderbolt. And then again as I walked
upon the waves, and the black curtains gathered
around, a bright light darted into my brain and I
3*
saw the old Roundheads who were executed the
other day, sitting upon a glorious cloud, mocking
at my misery! yea, they mouthed at me. Ha, ha,
ha! The sound of his own unnatural laughter
startled him like an electric shockand instantly
he seemed to recollect himself.
He covered his face with his hands, and rested
them upon his knees in silence. Some one entered
and spoke to the queen in a low voice, and she
immediately
informed her guest that his horse was
dead. Dead! said he, as he sprang upon his
feet. His lastbestmost highly prized gift
dead! All on the same nightam I indeed
cursed
in
going out and in coming in? Are even
the poor brutes that cling to me with affection,
thus cut down? but I would see him ere he is cold.
A torch-bearer soon appeared at the summons
of his mistress, and the royal hostess and her
guest proceeded to the spot. There lay the noble
animal, his once proud neck straightened in the
gaunt deformity of death. His master threw
himself
upon his body and wept like an infant. The
tears, the first he had shed, humanized and soothed
his harrowed feelings. Slowly he arose, and
gazing
upon the lifeless beast, exclaimed with a piteous
voice, Alas poor Bardolph, thy lot is happier
than thy master's!
The day was now dawning, and the morning air
came fresh and invigorating to the senses, redolent
of the wild perfumes blown upon the moor and
forest, from the influence of a humid night. These
reviving influences however fell dead upon the
benumbed
faculties of our hero. In accordance with
the urgent solicitations of his hostess, he agreed to
swallow an Indian soporific, and try to lose his
sorrows and his memory in that nearest semblance
of death. He did not fail, as he re-entered the
wigwam
,
to observe that the whole village (called
Orapacs) was busily preparing for some imposing
ceremony, and that great accessions had been made
to the numbers of the previous night.
Long and soundly he slept; when he awoke the
sun was coursing high in the heavens. The air
was balmy and serene, and his own monomaniacal
hallucinations were dissipated, partly worn out by
their own violence and partly dispelled by many
hours of uninterrupted repose. Dreadful is that
affliction which sleep will not alleviate. It is true
that one suffering under a weight of misery which
no hope lightens, no reasoning assuages, wakes to
a present sense of his condition with a startling
and miserable consciousness, yet upon the whole,
the violence of grief has been soothed and
moderated
.
So it was with our hero, and he walked forth
a new and revived creature.
But as he stepped from the wigwam, a
spectacle
greeted his eye more akin to the fantasies of
the previous night than to stern reality. The
village
was situated on a plain near the banks of the
river. The forest remained much as it first grew,
save that the undergrowth had been burned away
and the ground afterwards overgrown with a
luxuriant
coat of grass. This summary method of
trimming the primitive forest gives it much the
resemblance
of a noble park, cleared of its shrubs,
undergrowth, and limbs, by the careful hands of
the woodman. The scene, as Bacon looked along
the woodland vista, had a wild novelty, and its
aspect
would doubtless have been sedative in its
effect
had it not been for the spectacle already alluded
to, which we shall now endeavour to describe.
An immense concourse of Indians was collected
just without the external range of wigwams. They
were seated in groups, in each of which he
recognised
the distinguishing marks of separate tribes,
the representatives of each distinct nation of the
peninsula having a distinct and separate place. At
the head of this warlike assemblage, on a rude
throne sat the youthful Queen of the
Chickahominies
.
Immediately around the foot of this
elevation
were seated the few grim warriors yet
remaining
of that once powerful nation, and on her right
hand the Powhatans. A fantastically dressed
prophet
of the latter tribe, with a curiously coloured
heron's
feather run through the cartilage of his nose
stood in the centre of the assembled nations, and
harangued the deputies with the most violent
gesticulations
,
every now and then pointing in the
direction
first of Jamestown, and then of Middle
Plantations
,
(now Williamsburg,) and in succession after
these, to the other most thickly peopled settlements
of the whites. His rude eloquence seemed to have
a powerful effect upon his warlike audience, from
the repeated yells of savage cheering by which
each appeal was followed. He concluded his
harangue
by brandishing a bloody tomahawk over
his head, and then striking it with great dexterity
into a pole erected in the centre of the area.
Numerous
warriors and prophets from other tribes
followed with similar effect and like purpose, to
all of whom the stern savages listened with an
eager yet respectful attention. When they had
concluded, the youthful queen of the
Chickahominies
descended one step from her throne, and
addressed
the assembled nations; but her discourse
was received in a far different spirit from that
which had attended the eloquence of her
predecessors
.
She was evidently maintaining the
opposite
side of the question which occupied the grave
assembly, and it was apparent that the feelings of
her auditors were hostile to her wishes and
opinions
.
No evidences of delight greeted her
benevolent
counsels, and she resumed her seat almost
overpowered by the loud and general murmurs of
discontent which arose at the conclusion of her
talk. She felt herself a solitary advocate of
the plainest dictates of justice and humanityshe
felt the difficulty and embarrassment of addressing
enlightened arguments to savage ears and
uncultivated
understandings, and a painful sense of her
own responsibility, and of regret for having
assumed
her present station, pressed heavily upon
heart.
Bacon saw only the eloquent language of their
signs and gestures; but some knowledge of the
outrages
already perpetrated easily enabled him to
interpret their intentions. He knew that
bloodshed
and murder were the objects of their meeting,
and he resolved to seize the earliest opportunity to
escape, in order to take part in the defence of his
country. His mind turned eagerly to this
wholesome
excitement, as the best outlet which was now
left for the warring impulses within his breast.
CHAPTER III.
The
retirement of Wyanokee from her
temporary
presidency in the grand council of the
confederated
nations, was the signal for beginning
the general carouse, by which such meetings were
usually terminated. Two huge bucks, with their
throats cut, had been some time suspended from a
pole laid across a pair of stout forked saplings,
driven into the ground at the distance of a few
feet from each other; these were now brought
into the centre of the area, and quickly deprived
of their skins. The neighbourhood of civilized
man had already introduced that bane of savage
morals, whiskey; and plentiful supplies of this,
together with pipes and tobacco, were now served
to the representatives. A general scene of rude
and savage debauch immediately followed. Meat
was broiled or roasted upon the coalswhiskey
was handed round in calabashes, while the more
gay and volatile members of the assemblage found
an outlet for their animated feelings in the violent
and energetic movements of the Indian dance.
The sounds which issued from the forest were a
mingled din of tinkling metalsrattling bones,
and the monotonous humming of the singers,
occasionally
enlivened by a sharp shrill whoop from
some young savage, as his animal spirits became
excited by the exercise. The squaws performed
the part of menials, and bore wood, water, and
corn, to supply the feast for their lords and
masters
.
The new queen of the nation, upon whose
ground these carousals were held, retired to her
own wigwam, as much disgusted with the moral
blindness and depravity of the deputies, as with
the commencing revels. Besides her disgust of
what was left behind, there was an attraction for
her in her own sylvan palace, which, till a few
hours back, it had sadly wanted in her eyes; not
that she approached it with any hope that her
passion would now or ever meet with a return
from its objectbut still there was a melancholy
pleasure in holding communion with one so far
superior to the rude, untutored beings she had
just left. She felt also a longing desire, not only
to learn more of the mysterious transactions of
which she had gathered some vague indications
from Bacon's discourse, but to take advantage of
present circumstances in returning some of the
many favours heaped upon herself by her white
friends. There was a nobler motive for this than
mere gratitude; she wished to show to Bacon and
Virginia, that she could sacrifice her own
happiness
to promote theirs. She felt now satisfied that
both of them had discovered the existence of her
passion, long before she was aware of the
impropriety
of its exhibition according to civilized
usages, and she was anxious to evince to them how
nobly an Indian maiden could cover this false step
with honour. Full of these ennobling, and as it
proved, delusive ideas, she entered the wigwam
with a mien and step which would not have
disgraced
a far more regal palace.
Bacon was found upon a mat, reclining in
melancholy
mood against the side of the apartment,
intently
eyeing the movements of the savages upon
the green. She followed his eye for a moment in
shame and confusion for the spectacle exhibited
by the men of her own race.
Do you mark the difference, said Bacon,
between the dances in yonder forest and those
at Jamestown? Why do not the women join in
the merry-making? We consider them worthy to
partake of all our happiness.
Ay, 'tis true, there is no Virginia there!
His brow settled into a look of stern displeasure
and offence, as he replied, Would you renew the
scenes of the last night?
No, Wyanokee desires not to give pain, but
to remove itas she came here now to show. You
heard me claim you last night as a husband.A
crimson tint struggled with the darker hue of her
cheek, as she forced herself to proceed.But it
was only to save you from the cruel hands of my
countrymen. You may, therefore, give up all
uneasiness
on that subjectI know well that the Great
Spirit has decreed it otherwise that I desired, and
I submit without a murmur. It is useless for me to
Vol. II. 4
conceal that I had learned too quickly to feel the
difference between a youth of your race, and one
of yon rude beings; but it was more owing to my
ignorance of your customs than any want of
proper maidenly reserve. That is now passed,
you are a married man, and as such I can converse
with you in confidence.
Yes, said Bacon, a bitter smile playing over
his countenance, I am married to stern
adversity
!
'Tis a solemn contract, and binds me to a
bride from whom I may not easily be divorced.
Death may cut the knot, but no other minister of
justice can. I must say too, that the ceremonies
of last night were fitting and proper. I wooed my
bride through earth, air, and water; in thunder,
lightning, and in rain. Nor was she coy or prudish.
She came to my arms with a right willing grace,
and clings to me through evil and through good
report. I am hers, wholly hers for ever. It is
meet that I should learn to love her at once. Ay,
and I do hug her to my heart. Is she not my
own? do we not learn to love our own deformities?
then why not learn to love our own sorrows?
Doubtless we shall be very happya few little
matrimonial bickerings at first, perhaps, but these
will soon be merged in growing congeniality. Man
cannot long live with any companion, without
bestowing
upon it his affection; the snake, the spider,
the toad, the scorpion, all have been loved and
cherished: shall I not then love my bride? Is
there not a hallowed memory around her birth?
was she not nurtured and trained by these very
hands? Is there not wild romance too, in her
adventures and our loves? Is she not faithful and
true? yea, and young too! not coy perhaps, but
constant and devoted.
Although this language was prompted by very
different states, both of heart and head, from that of
the preceding night, yet its literal construction
by the Indian maiden betrayed her into very little
more understanding of its import. She better
comprehended the language of his countenance.
That, she saw, indicated the bitterness of death, but
the cause was still a mystery. She therefore
continued
her kind endeavours with something more
of doubt and embarrassment. My intention was
to offer you and Virginia a home as soon as these
warlike men are pacified and gonethat you might
come here and live with me until her grand uncle
will receive her and you. Oh, it will make
Wyanokee
very happy.
She would, no doubt, have continued in this
strain for some time, but his impatience could be
contained no longer. Is it possible that you do not
yet understand the depth and hopelessness of my
misery? Know it then in all its horrors. I was
half married last night to my own half sister! Did
fate, fortune or hell ever more ingeniously
contrive
to blight the happiness of mortal man at one
fell blow? View it for a moment. There was the
game beautifully contrivedthe stake was
apparently
trifling, but the prize glittered with India's
richest rubiesthe very thoughts of them conjured
up scenes of fairy land. The richest fantasies
of romance sparkled before the eye of the player.
The wildest dream of earthly happiness allured
him to each renewed attempt. First a little was
stakedthen another portionthen another to
insure
the two former, and so on until houses and
lands and goods and chattelsyea and life itself, or
all that made it valuable, were hazarded upon the
throw. Lo, he wins! Joy unutterable fills his
breasthe is about to place the jewels next his
heart, but behold they turn into scorpions. Rich
and beautiful in all their former ruby colourbut
there is a fearful talismanic power in their beauty.
There is a deadly poison in the sight! They charm
to kill. Lay them not near the heart or else the
great magician, the king of evilthe prince of
darkness himself, has bought you body and soul!
That was my case. I won the glorious stake, I
had it here (striking his breast), yea, and have it
now, and the devil is tempting me to lay it next
my heart. I have wrestled with him all the night,
but again he is at work. See that you do not help
him!
Again she was lost in reverential awe. As his
paroxysm by slow degrees returned, she exhibited
in the mirror of her own countenance the passion,
the wild enthusiasm, reflected from his, until the
final charge to herself, when she was overcome with
wonder and fear. His own preternaturally quick
perceptions caught the effect produced, and he again
folded his arms and leaned back in grim and
sullen silence, but with the keen eye of the serpent
watching the changing countenance of his auditor.
She was sunk in abstraction for some moments, and
then, as if rather thinking aloud than communing
with another, she said, Is it possible?
Yea, as true as that the serpent infused his
poison into the ear of the mother of mankind. As
true as that man was the first creature that died on
the face of the earth by the hands of his fellow.
As true as death and hell! As true as that there
is a hereafter. Happiness is negative! Misery
positive. There is always a subtle doubt
lingering
upon our most substantial scenes of happiness;
but with misery it is slow, certain and enduring;
the proof conclusive and damning. It is more real
than our existence, and exists when it is no more.
Our nerves are strung to vibrate to the touches of
harmony and happiness only when played upon by
inspirations from above, but they vibrate in
discord
to the earth, the air, the winds, the waves,
the thunderthe lightning. They are rudely
handled
by men, beasts, reptiles, devils, by famine,
disease and death. Am I not a wretched
monument
of its truth? Are not these miserable and
faded trappings, the funeral emblems of my moral
decease? Am I not a living tomb of my own soul?
A memento of him that was, with an inscription
on my forehead, `Here walks the body of
Nathaniel
Bacon, whose soul was burned out on the ever
memorable night of his own wedding, by an
incendiary
4*
in the mortal habiliments of his own
Father
,
with a torch lit up in pandemonium itself?
His body still walks the earth as a beacon and a
warning to those who would commit incest!'
The door was darkened for a moment, and in
the next the Recluse stood before him. His giant
limbs lost none of their extent or proportions as
viewed through the dim light which fell in scanty
and checkered masses from the insterstices of the
sylvan walls. He stood in the light of the only
door,his features wan and cadaverous, and his
countenance wretchedly haggard. Why
lingerest
thou here in the lap of the tawny maiden, when
thy countrymen will so soon need the assistance of
thy arm? This night the torch of savage
warfare
and cruelty will in all probability be lighted
up in the houses of thy friends and kindred.
Is it becoming, is it manly in thee to seek these
effeminate pastimes, in order to drown the images
of thy own idle fancy? If thou hast unconsciously
erred, and thereby cruelly afflicted thy nearest
kindred, is this the way to repair the evil? Set
thou them the example! Be a manthe son of a
soldier. Thy father before thee has suffered
tortures
of the mind, and privations of the body, to
which thine are but the feeble finger-aches of
childhood as compared to the agonies of a painful
and protracted death. Rouse thyself from thy
unmanly stupor, and hie thee hence to the
protection
of those who should look up to thee. Be not
anxious for me, maiden; I see thy furtive glances
at the besotted men of thy race, and thence to me.
I have long watched their movements. They see
me not; they will attempt no injuryand if they
should their blows would fall upon one reckless of
dangerwho has nought to gain or lose,who
has long had his lights trimmed, and lamp burning,
ready for the welcome summons.
When he first entered the wigwam, Bacon
sprang upon his feet, and gazed upon the
unwelcome
apparition as if he doubted his humanity;
but as his hollow and sepulchral voice fell upon
his ear in the well known, deep excited
intonations
of the chapel, he moved backward, his
hands clasped, until his shoulders rested against
the wall. There, shuddering with emotion, he
gazed earnestly and in silence upon his visiter,
whose words fell upon an indiscriminating ear.
The Recluse perceived something of his
condition
as he continued, Hearest thou not?seest
thou not? Rouse thee from this unmanly
weakness
.
I saw thy dead horse upon the moor. I
will leave thee mine at the head of the
Chickahominy
Swamp. When night closes upon yonder
brutal scene, mount and ride as if for thy life, even
then thou mayst be too late! Remember! This
night be thou in Jamestown!
Having thus spoken, he stooped through the
door, and vanished among the trees behind the
wigwam, as he had come. Bacon still gazed upon
the place where he had been, as if he still occupied
the spot, his eyelids never closing upon the
distended
iris, until he fell upon the floor in a swoon.
Such restoratives as an Indian wigwam afforded,
were speedily administered, and very soon the
desired effect was produced. While he lay thus
worn down by the sufferings produced by the
tortures of the previous night, and the cruel
excitement
of his feelings, Wyanokee discovered,
as she was bathing his temples, the small gold
locket, which he had worn suspended from his
neck, since the death of Mr. Fairfax.
Apparently
it contained nothing but the plaited hair
and the inscription already mentioned. She caught
it with childlike eagerness, and turned it from
side to side, with admiring glances, when her
finger
touched a spring and it flew open; the interior
exhibited to view the features of a young and
lovely
female.
At this juncture Bacon revived. His
countenance
was pale and haggard from the exhaustion
of mental and bodily sufferings. His perceptions
seemed clearer, but his heart was burdened and
oppressed
he
longed for speedy death to terminate
the wretched strife. The prospect was dark and
lowering in whatever direction he cast his thoughts;
no light of hope broke in upon his soulall before
him seemed a dreary joyless waste. In this mood
he accidentally felt the open trinket within the
facings of his doublet, and inserting his hand he
drew it forth. His head was elevated instantly,
his eyes distended and his whole countenance
exhibited
the utmost astonishment. His first
emotion
was any thing but pleasantas if he had drawn
from his bosom one of his own figurative scorpions,
but this was speedily succeeded by one of a
different
nature. The first sensation of pleasure which
he had felt since he left Jamestown beamed upon
his mind; it was mingled with the most unbounded
surprise; but quick as thought the light of hope broke
in upon his dark and cheerless prospects. Again and
again the picture was closely scrutinized, but with
the same conviction, never before had he beheld that
face. It was resplendent with smiles and beauty.
The dark hazel eyes seemed to beam upon him with
affectionate regard. The auburn tresses almost
fluttering
in the breeze, so warm and mellow were
the lights and shadows. But what rivetted his
attention
was the want of resemblance in the picture
to the lady whom he had been so recently and so
painfully taught to believe his mother. The
latter
had light flaxen ringlets and blue eyes, and the
tout ensemble
of the features were totally
dissimilar
.
He imagined he saw a far greater resemblance
between the picture and himself, and hence the
ray of hope. But in the place of despair came
feverish suspensehe now longed again to meet
the Recluse, whose presence had so lately filled
him with horror. His mind sought in vain
within
its own resources for means to bring the
question
to an immediate issue. Was he the first-born
son of Mrs. Fairfax or not? Perhaps Brian O'
Reily could tell something of the picture, or had
seen the original. No sooner had this faint
glimmering
prospect of unravelling the mystery
dawned
upon his mind, than he was seized with the
most feverish desire to set out for Jamestown.
The savages still kept up the carouse, but it
would be hazardous in the extreme, as he was
assured
by his hostess, to attempt to leave Orapacs
until the conclusion of the feast, which perhaps
would last till night. At that time they were all
to proceed to the Powhatan domain. He was
compelled therefore to content himself with
reading
the lineaments of the interesting countenance
just opened to his view.
Upon what a frail foundation will a despairing
man build up his fallen castles in the air. Such
was the occupation of our hero until the light of
the sun had vanished over the western hills. He
lay upon his mat in the twilight gloom, indulging
in vague uncertain reveries. He had examined
the picture so long, so intently, and under such a
morbid excitement of the imagination, that he
supposed
himself capable of recollecting the features.
He had called up dim and misty shadows of
memory
(or those of the imagination nearly
resembling
them) from a period wrapped in obscurity
and darkness. He endeavoured to go back step
by step to his years of childhood, until his excited
mind became completely bewildered among the
fading recollections of long passed days. As the
rippling waters of the purling stream mingled with
the monotonous whistling of the evening breeze,
his versatile imagination fell into a kindred train.
The music of the nursery, by which his childish
struggles had been lulled to repose, floated over his
memory in the tenderest and purest melancholy.
Who that has music in his soul has not, at a like
season and hour, refreshed his heart with these
early impressions? Nor are they entirely
confined
to an inviting melancholy mood and the hour
of twilight. In the full vigour of physical and
mental power, and when the spirits are bounding
and elasticin the midst of dramatic
representations
or the wildest creations of Italian musical
genius, these stores of memory's richest treasures
will suddenly flood the soul, touched perhaps by
the vibration of some kindred chord. Bacon's
harassed mind was refreshed by the tender and
softened mood into which he had fallen. Besides,
he was now stimulated by the glimmering dawn
of hope. When therefore darkness had completely
covered the face of the land, he arose to go upon
his mission, a different being. Although his own
emotions on parting were faint compared to those
of Wyanokee, they were yet sorrowful and
tender
.
He lamented the lot of the Indian maiden,
and respected the virtues and accomplishments
which elevated her so far above those by whom
she was surrounded. He bade her adieu with the
most heartfelt gratitude for her services, and
aspirations
for her welfare.
When he stepped from the wigwam he was
astonished to see the huge fires, upon which they
had cooked the feast, still burning with
undiminished
brilliancy, and still more startled to observe
twenty or more savages lying drunk around them,
and half as many sober ones holding vigils over
their slumbers. He immediately changed his
intended
direction, and skirted round the forest in
which they lay, so as to arrive at the place
pointed
out by the Recluse by a circuitous rout.
When he came opposite to the fires, and half way
upon his circuit, he was not a little alarmed to hear
the astounding warwhoop yelled by one of the
sentinels. Casting his eyes in that direction he saw
that all the guard were on the
qui vive
, and some
of the slumberers slowly shaking off their
stupidity
.
He supposed that one of the sentinels had
heard his footsteps, and thus alarmed the rest.
Taking advantage of the trees, and the distance
he had already gained, he was enabled to elude
their vigilant senses. But when he came to the
spot pointed out by the Recluse, a greater difficulty
presented itself. The horse was already gone, but
not taken by the one who brought him there, as he
saw evidently from the impressions of his feet in
the earth, where he had stood most of the afternoon.
He soon came to the conclusion that the Indians
had found and carried him off. This was the more
probable as they adjourned their council about
the time he must have been taken. His call to
Jamestown was too urgent to be postponed, and
however feeble in body he determined to exert
his utmost strength to arrive there during the night.
CHAPTER IV.
Our
hero reached Jamestown late on the very
morning when the couriers arrived in such rapid
succession, with the startling intelligence of the
Indian massacres. All night he had wandered
over the peninsula, vainly endeavouring to
discover
his way; light after light shot up amidst the
surrounding gloom, and more than once he had
been misled by these, almost into the very clutches
of the swarming savages. His heart sank within
him as he saw plantation after plantation, in their
complete possession; the illumination of their
incendiary
trophies lighting up the whole
surrounding
country. It seemed indeed to his startled
senses as if the Indians had simultaneously risen
upon and butchered the whole white population of
the colony. With the exception of a small
remnant
,
they had already once perpetrated the like
horrible deed, and he again saw in his imagination
the dreadful scenes of that well remembered night.
Feeble old men, women and children
indiscriminately
butcheredperhaps Virginia, whom he once
again dared to think of, among the number. True,
Wyanokee had assured him otherwise, but might
not the grand council have determined upon the
Vol. II. 5
deed at the more appropriate time of their
nightly
meeting?
As the dawning day unfolded to his view the
relative bearings of the country, these gloomy
anticipations were partly realized. Every
avenue
to the city, both by land and water, was
crowded with people of all sexes, colours and
conditions
,
flying to the protection of the Fort.
Wagons
,
carts, negroes, and white bondsmen, were
laden with furniture, provisions, and valuables.
Ever and anon a foaming charger flew swiftly by,
bearing some Cavalier to the city, doubly armed for
retributive vengeance. By these he was greeted
and cheered upon his way, as well as informed of
the depredations committed in the neighbourhood
whence they had come. From one of these also
he procured a horse, and joined a cavalcade of his
associates and friends, proceeding to the same
centre of attraction. To them also he unfolded
so much of his recent adventures as related to the
general interests of the colony. Long, loud, and
vindicative were their denunciations, as well of
the treacherous savages as the stubborn old man
at the head of affairs in the colony.
Although evident traces of his late bodily
sufferings
were perceptible in Bacon's countenance, no
vestige of his mental hallucinations on one
particular
theme was perceived; his mind was
intently
occupied upon the all absorbing topic of
common
safety. As they proceeded together to the
city, it was proposed to him to assume the
command
of a volunteer regiment, which they
undertook
to raise as soon as they arrived in Jamestown.
His military talents and daring bravery were
already
well known by most of his associates, but he
doubted whether he was the most proper person
in the colony to assume so responsible a command.
As to his own personal feelings, never did fortune
throw the chance of honourable warfare more
opportunely in the way of a desperate man. True,
it would have come still more seasonably
twenty-four
hours sooner, but then he would only have been
better qualified for some desperate deed of personal
daring, not for a command upon which hung the
immediate fate of all the colonists, and the ultimate
supremacy of the whites in Virginia. He
promised
,
however, to accede to their proposal, provided,
after the regiment was raised, in which he must
be considered a volunteer, the majority cheerfully
tendered him their suffrages. He stated the
hostility
of the Governor to him personally, without
enlightening them as to its most recent cause; but
they were now as resolute upon disregarding the
feelings and wishes of Sir William, as he had
already
shown himself in disregarding their own. In
short, they resolved at once to assume that
authority
to protect their lives and property, which they
now felt, if they had never before known, was an
inalienable right. Here was sown the first germ
of the American revolution. Men have read the
able argumentsthe thrilling declamations, the
logical defence of natural and primitive rights,
which the men of '76 put forth to the world, with
wonder at the seeming intuitive wisdom that burst
so suddenly upon the world at the very exigency
which called it into action. But in our humble
opinion, the inception of these noble sentiments
was of much earlier datetheir development not
so miraculous as we would like to flatter ourselves.
Exactly one hundred years before the American
revolution, there was a Virginian revolution based
upon precisely similar principles. The struggle
commenced between the representatives of the
people and the representatives of the king. The
former had petitioned for redress, time after
time,remonstrance after remonstrance had been
sent in to Sir William Berkley, but he was deaf
to all their reasonable petitions. The Cavaliers
and citizens of the colony now arrived at the
infant capital, resolved to take upon themselves
as much power as was necessary for the defence
of life, freedom, and property. While the
gathering
multitude flocked to the State House and
public
square in immense numbers, Bacon alighted at
the Berkley Arms, in order to change his dress,
and before he joined them, perform one act of duty
which it would have been difficult for him to say
whether it was anticipated with most pain or
pleasure. It was a visit to Mrs. Fairfax and her
daughter. He walked immediately from the hotel
to the quarters usually occupied by the servants
of the Fairfax family, in hopes of finding O'Reily
to despatch for his effects, which he supposed
he could not obtain in person, without suddenly
and unpreparedly exposing himself to the notice
of the family. But the house was silent as the
tomb! No gently curling smoke issued from the
chimney; no cheering light broke in at the
windows
;
all was dark, noiseless, and desolate. The
domestic animals still lingered around their
accustomed
haunts, apparently as sad in spirit as he
who stood with his arms folded gazing upon the
deserted mansion. The streets were indeed
crowded
with the eager and tumultuous throng, but
after
the first unsuccessful essay at the door of the
servant's hall, he had passed round into the
garden
of the establishment, and stood as we have
described him, a melancholy spectator of the
painful
scene. There hung Virginia's bird cage against
the casings of the window, perhaps placed by her
own hands on the morning of the unfortunate
catastrophe
,
but the little songster was lying dead upon
the floor. The blooming flowers around her
windows
hung in the rich maturity of summer, but
seemed to mock the desolation around with their
gay liveries. The dogs indeed lazily wagged their
tails at his presence, and fawned upon him, but
they too, slunk away in succession, as if conscious
of the rupture which had taken place in his
relations
with the family.
What a flood of tender recollections rushed upon
his memory as he stood thus solitary in the flower
garden of her who was the sole object of his
youthful
and romantic dreams, and gazed upon the well
5*
known objects,each one the memento of some
childish sport or pleasure. There too stood the
shaded seats and bowers of more mature
adventures
,
redolent of the richest fruits and flowers,
and teeming with the hallowed recollection of
love's young dream. Nor were tears wanting to
the memory of that early friend and patron who
had given him shelter in his helpless days, from
the cold neglect and inhospitality of the world,
and thus, perhaps, saved him the degradation of a
support at the public expense. These softened
and subdued emotions humanized the savage mood
which sprung up from similar reminiscences on a
previous occasion. The current of his feelings
had been changed by a single ray of hope. The
fountain was not now wholly poisoned, and the
sweet water turned to gall and bitterness. The
scene therefore, painful and melancholy as it was,
produced beneficial results. But he marvelled
that the house should be so totally deserted. He
supposed that the lady and her daughter might be
sojourning for a time with the Governor, but what
had become of their numerous domestics? They
too could not be quartered at the gubernatorial
mansion. And above all, what had become of his
own Hibernian follower? Certainly, he was not
thus provided for. He knew his privileged
servant's
warm partialities and hatreds too well to
believe
that he had accepted any hospitality from his
master's bitterest enemy. At that moment a
servant
of the Berkley Arms was passing, and having
called him into the garden, Bacon raised a window
leading to his own apartments, procured such of
his garments as he most needed, and despatched
them to the hotel. When he had encased himself
in these, somewhat to his own satisfaction (and
most young Cavaliers in those days wore their
garments
after a rakish fashion) he sallied out to
perform
the duty which he felt to be most incumbent
on him. He knocked at the door of Sir William
Berkley's mansion, with very different feelings
from any he had before experienced on a similar
occasion. The relations so lately discovered to
exist between himself and those for whom his visit
was intended, as well as his feelings toward those
who had the right of controlling in some measure
the persons admitted to visit at the mansion,
awakened
anxious thoughts not a little heightened by the
anticipation of meeting Beverly, with whom an
unexpected
interview promised few agreeable
emotions
.
The family seemed determined too that he
should have the benefit of all these reflections, from
the length of time they kept him standing in the
street. At length the porter opened the door with
many profound inclinations of the head, still
standing
however full within the entrance, and
continuing
his over wrought politeness. Is Mrs.
Fairfax
within? was the inquiry.
She is dead! may it please your honour!
Dead! uttered Bacon with a hoarse and
trembling
voice. When and how?
His Excellency has just received the news
she was murdered last night at his country seat by
the Indians.
Was Miss  was his niece there also? he
asked with a bewildered doubt whether he had
better
inquire any further.
No, Sir, she lies ill of a fever up stairs. Dr.
Roland scarcely ever leaves her room, except to
tell Master Frank the state of his patient.
I will enter for a moment and speak a few
words with the good doctor.
Pardon me, your honour, it gives me great
pain to refuse any gentleman admittanee, but my
orders are positive from Sir William himself to
admit no one to the sick room, and above all not
to admit your honour within these doors. I have
over and over again turned away Miss Harriet, who
seems as if she would weep her eyes out, poor
lady, at my young mistress' illness and the
Governor's
cruelty, as she calls it.
I see you have a more tender heart than your
master; here is gold for you, not to bribe you
against your duty or inclinations; but you will
fully earn it by informing Dr. Roland that Mr.
Bacon wishes to speak with him for five minutes
at the Arms, upon business of the last importance.
I will tell him, sir; but I do not think he will
go, because he has himself given the strictest
injunctions
that your name shall not be whispered in
the room, or even in the house. No longer than
this morning, sir, she heard them announce the
death of her mother down stairs. Her hearing is
indeed extraordinary, sir, considering her so
poorly
.
Since that she has been much worse.
Bacon did not choose to expose himself to the
chance of insult any longer by meeting some of the
male members of the family, he therefore took
his departure from the inhospitable mansion, and
skirted round the unfrequented streets, in order to
avoid the immense multitude collected in the
square and more frequented passages. He could
hear the shouts and cheering which echoed against
the houses as he proceeded, but little did he
imagine
that they welcomed his own nomination to
the responsible station of commander to the
colonial
forces. His intention was to proceed to the
Arms, and there await the arrival of the doctor;
but he no sooner entered the porch than he was
seized by the hand in the well known and
sympathizing
grasp of Dudley.
While the friends were yet uttering their words
of greeting, and before they had propounded one
of the many questions which they desired to ask,
Bacon was seized under each arm with a rule, but
not disrespectful familiaritysaluted by the title of
General, and borne off toward the state house in
spite alike of remonstrances and entreaties.
It was with great difficulty they could gain the
square, so dense was the barricade of ox carts
loaded
with furniture, and wagons thronged with negro
children; while families in carriages and on
horseback
,
and thousands of the multitude
promiscuously
huddled together, increased the difficulty of
making way. Since he had heard the startling
news of the death of Mrs. Fairfax, his mind was
more than ever bent upon joining the proposed
expedition; and had it not been for the interruption
to the anticipated meeting with the Doctor, no one
could have appeared upon the rostrum with greater
alacrity.
The contumaceous conduct of the Governor
toward
the respectful remonstrances and petitions of
the citizens, and more especially his unwarranted
and disrespectful treatment of himself, recurred
to his mind in good time. He mounted the rude
platform hastily erected in front of the state
house, burning with indignation, and glowing with
patriotism.
[2]
[2]
This is an abstract of the speech really delivered by Bacon.
He thanked the people for the
unexpected
and unmerited honour they had just
conferred
upon him. He accepted the office
tendered
to him with alacrity, and none the less so
that yonder stubborn old man will not endorse it
with his authority, and sanction our proceeding
under
the ordinary forms of law. What has
produced
this simultaneous explosion in the colony?
What are the circumstances which can thus array
all the wealth, intelligence and respectability of
the people against the constituted authorities. Let
your crippled commerce, your taxed,
overburdened
and deeply wronged citizens answer? The
first has been embarrassed by acts of parliament,
which originated here, the most severe,
arbitrary
and unconstitutional, while your citizens
both gentle and hardy, have been enormously and
indiscriminately taxed in order to redeem your
soil from the immense and illegal grants to
unworthy
and sometimes non-resident favourites.
There was a time when both Cavalier and
yeoman
dared to be free; when your assembly, boldly
just to their constituents, scrupled not to contend
with majesty itself in defence of our national and
chartered rights. But melancholy is the contrast
which Virginia at this time presents. The right
of suffrage which was coeval with the existence of
the colony, which had lived through the arbitrary
reign of James, and with a short interruption
through that of the first Charles, which was again
revived during the commonwealth, and was
considered
too sacred to be touched even by the
impure
hands of the Protector, is now sacrilegiously
stolen from you during a season of profound peace
and security.
The mercenary soldiers, sent from the mother
country at an immense expense to each of you,
fellow-citizens
,
where are they? Revelling upon the
fat of the land at distant and unthreatened posts,
while our fathers, and mothers, and brothers, and
sisters, are butchered in cold blood by the ruthless
savage. Where is now the noble and generous
Fairfax, the favourite of the rich and the poor?
Where his estimable and benevolent lady?
Murdered
under the silent mouths of the rusty cannon
which surmount yonder palisade. Look at his
sad and melancholy mansion, once the scene of
generous hospitality to you allbehold its
deserted
halls and darkened windows. But this is only
the nearest evidence before our eyeswithin the
last twenty-four hours hundreds of worthy citizens
have shared the same fate.
Shall these things be longer borne,
fellow-citizens
?
No! no! no! burst from the multitude
down with the Governor, and extermination to
the Indians.
He continued. Already I see a noble band
of mounted youths, the sons of your pride and
your hopesflanked by a proud little army of
hardier citizens; from these I would ask a pledge,
that they never lay down their arms, till their
grievances are redressed.
We swearwe swear, responded from all,
and then, three cheers for General Bacon, made
the welkin ring. At this juncture the trumpet,
drum, and fife, were heard immediately behind the
crowd, and a party of the royal guard, some fifty
in number, halted upon the outskirts of the
assemblage
,
while their officer undertook to read a
proclamation from the Governor, ordering the mob,
as he was pleased to style the meeting, to disperse
under penalty of their lives and property. The
army of the people
, already getting under arms,
immediately commenced an evolution by which
the temporary commander of the mounted force
would have been thrown directly fronting the
guard, and between them and the multitude.
Bacon
saw the intended movement, and instantly
countermanded the orders, Let the people, said
he, deal with this handful of soldiers; we will
not weaken our force, and waste our energies by
engaging in intestine broils, when our strength is so
much called for by the enemies of our race upon
the frontiers. The suggestion was immediately
adopted; before the hireling band could bring their
weapons to the charge, the multitude had closed in
upon them, and disarmed them to a man. This
accomplished
,
they were taken to the beach, in spite
of the remonstrances of many of the more staid
and sober of the Cavaliers and citizens, and there
soundly ducked. Very unmilitary indeed was
their appearance, as they were marshalled into
battle array, all drooping and wet, and thus
marched
to the music of an ignominious tune to the front
of the Governor's house.
The frantic passion of Sir William Berkley can
be more easily imagined than described. He saw
that he was left almost alonethat those citizens
most remarkable for their loyalty had deserted
him. However wilful and perverse, he saw the
necessity
of making temporary concessions, although
at the same time more than ever bent upon
summary
vengeance against the most conspicuous
leaders
of the opposing party whenever chance or
fortune
should again place the real power of the
colony in his hands. At present he felt that he
was powerlessthe very means which he had
taken to thwart and provoke the people now
became
Vol. II. 6
the source of the bitterest regret to himself,
namelysending the mercenary soldiers of the
crown to distant posts on fictitious emergencies.
He resolved therefore to disguise his real feelings
until the departure of the popular army, when he
could recall his own regular troops, and thus take
signal vengeance upon such of the agitators as
should be left behind, and thence march
immediately
to the subjugation of the force commanded
by Bacon. Scarcely had the presence of the
dripping
guard, as seen through his window, suggested
these ideas, before an opportunity offered of putting
in practice his temporary forbearance.
A committee was announced, at the head of
which was Mr. Harrison, his former friend and
supporterthey were the bearers of a conciliatory
letter from General Bacon. In this letter the
young commander in chief, in accordance with
the suggestions of the older Cavaliers, respectfully
announced his election to the command of the
volunteer
army, and concluded by requesting the
Governor to heal all existing breaches by
sanctioning
his own appointment, as well as that of the
appended list of young Cavaliers, to the various
stations annexed to their names; and that no delay
might occur in the pursuit of the enemy, an
immediate
answer was requested. The stout old
Cavalier was ready to burst with ill suppressed
rage as he marked the cool and respectful tone of
this epistle, coming from one he most cordially
detested and despised, both on public and private
grounds.
The committee waited until he had penned his
answer, which was cold and formal, but polite.
In it he declined signing the commissions in the
absence of the council, but promised to convene it
early on the ensuing day, when he stated that he
would despatch a courier after the army, if the
council thought proper to approve of the popular
proceedings. He promised also to dismantle the
distant forts, and immediately to call in the foreign
troops for the defence of the capital.
With this answer, the committee, he to whom it
was addressed, and the populace were well
satisfied
.
It really promised more than they had
expected
of the obstinate old Governor. Little did
they dream of the lurking treachery in the old
man's heart, much less did they truly interpret
the equivocal language contained in the note itself,
concerning the foreign soldiers, and the defence
of the capital. Little did they imagine that they
themselves were the foes against whom he
proposed
to employ the mercenaries.
The army now took up its line of march across
the bridge, amidst the cheers and blessings of the
multitude; men, women, and children following
them to the boundaries of the island.
Part of the force was sent up the river in sloops,
in order to co-operate with the main army in their
design of driving the tribes scattered along the
water courses of the peninsula, to a common point
of defence, and thus forcing them, if possible, into
an open, general, and decisive engagement. The
youthful commander in chief was intimately
acquainted
with all the localities between the seat
of government, and the falls of the river, (where
Richmond now stands,) and he very ingeniously
arranged his forces by land and water, so that he
might at the same time drive the treacherous
enemy before him through the peninsula, and
avoiding a premature battle, concentrate the
enemy
at the point already indicated. It was with
this general view, that one part of his force was
now sent up the river, while the other pursued
the route between the Chickahominy and the
Pamunky rivers. These general views were
discussed
,
and the plan decided upon at a council of
war, held on the main land, immediately after the
troops had passed the bridge. Bacon having
imparted
to Charles Dudley, his Aid-de-Camp, such
orders as the emergency required, turned his horse's
head again toward the bridge, and retraced his steps
to Jamestown.
CHAPTER V.
The
martial sounds of drums and trumpets had
scarcely died away over the distant hills, when
Sir William Berkley despatched couriers to the
various military outposts of the colony,
peremptorily
ordering the commanders to march forthwith
to Jamestown with the forces under their
command
.
To these couriers also were given secret
instructions for the private ears of such of his
loyal friends among the Cavaliers living on their
routes, as he knew would adhere to him under any
circumstances, urgently soliciting their immediate
presence at the capital. After these were
despatched
,
he summoned a secret conclave of such friends,
equally worthy of his trust, as were yet to be
found in the city.
Thus were they engaged, as General Bacon,
habited in the rich military fashion of the day,
rode along the north western skirt of the city, his
own gay attire, and the splendid trappings of his
horse wretchedly mocking the desolation
within
.
He drew up at the back court of the Berkley
Arms, dismounted, and passed immediately into
a private room. Having despatched a servant for
the landlord, he employed the time before he
6*
made his appearance, in meditations upon the
singular and protracted absence of Brian O'Reily,
the new responsibilities which he had just assumed,
and the present condition and future destinies of
the fair invalid at the gubernatorial mansion.
When the landlord entered he quickly
demanded
if Doctor Roland had inquired for him during
the forenoon, and was answered that he had not.
A servant was despatched with a note to the
Doctor
repeating his request for an interview of five
minutes at the Arms. After he had waited some
time in the most intense impatience, the servant
returned with a verbal message stating that the
doctor would wait on Gen. Bacon immediately.
From whom did you obtain this answer?
From the porter at the door, sir.
Very well, you may retire!
As he sat impatiently listening for the heavy
footsteps of the doctor, he heard a light fairy foot
tripping up the stairs toward his room, and in the
next instant a gentle tap at the door. His heart
almost leaped to his mouth as he indistinctly bade
the applicant to come in. Can it be possible,
said he to himself, that Virginia has escaped from
her jailers? Was the story of her illness but an
invention of the Governor's?
Before he had answered these questions to his
own satisfaction, the door was suddenly thrust
backward and Harriel Harrison stood before him.
She was pale, agitated, and gasping for breath,
as she threw herself unasked into a seat. Bacon
was from his previous emotions scarcely more
composed, and his heart beat tumultuously against
his doublet, as he endeavoured vainly to offer the
courtesies due to her sex and standing.
Oh, Mr. Bacon! (gasped the agitated girl)
fly for your life.
On what account, my dear young lady?
I'll tell you as quick as I can. I had just
obtained
admission to-day to Virginia's room for
the first time, when, after having spent the time,
and more, allotted to me by the doctor, as I was
coming down the stairs I had to pass the door of
Sir William's library, and I accidentally overheard
him giving orders to an officer to collect some
soldiers from the barracks and make you a
prisoner
in this house. How he knew you were here
I know not; but I was no sooner out of the door
than I flew to the back court below, demanded of
the servant holding your horse to point out your
room, and rushed in in this strange manner to put
you on your guard. Now, fly for your lifeyou
have not a moment to lose!
One word of Virginia, your fair friend, and I
am gone. Will she survive? Is her reason
unsettled
?
Does she believe the strange story of the
Recluse?
In a word then, she is betterof sound mind,
and in her heart does not believe one word of that
story, though sober reason is strangely perplexed.
One word more, and I have done. Does she
inquire for me?
The very first word she said to me was, `Does
Nathaniel believe it?' Now go, while yet you may.
Should any new emergency arise in your absence
I will despatch a courier after you.
Yet one message to Virginia. Tell her that
I have accidentally discovered in the trinket
preserved
by her father, and worn by me in the days
of my infancy, the likeness of her whom I have
every reason to believe my mother. Tell her not
to hope too sanguinely, but to give that
circumstance
its weight, and trust to the developments of
time; and now I commit you both, my dearest
friends, to the protection of an overruling
Providence
;
farewell.
With these parting words he rushed down stairs,
mounted his fleet charger, and swiftly left the court
just as the Governor's emissaries entered the front
porch of the house to arrest him.
Harriet drew her veil closely over her face, and
almost as fleetly sought her father's dwelling.
Our hero in a very few minutes placed the river
which separates the island from the main land
between
him and his pursuers. The sun was yet
above the western horizon, and the clouds which
spread in fleecy and stationary masses, were tinted
with the softest hues of the violet and the rose,
filling the mind with pleasing images of repose,
cheerfulness, and hope. These soothing and
delightful
influences of the summer evening were in
a great measure lost however upon our hero as he
pursued his solitary way through the unbroken
forest
in the immediate footsteps of the army.
Besides the inevitable suspense attending the
developments of his own origin and destinythere
were immediate anticipations before him of no
pleasing character. He had just assumed the
responsibilities
of an office, which at the very outset
was attended with the most painful embarrassments.
His keen military eye ran over the ground
occupied
by the enemies of his country, and perceived
at once that to make his enterprise completely and
permanently successful, the savages must be driven
entirely from the peninsula.
The very first on the list of these nations was
the Chickahominy, at the head of which was the
youthful queen, who had so lately perilled her
life and her authority for his own salvation from
the tortures of her countrymen. His decisive and
energetic mind perceived the stern necessity
which existed of driving these melancholy relies
of once powerful nations far distant from the
haunts of the white man. The question was not
now presented to his mind, whether a foreign
nation
should land upon the shores of these aboriginal
possessors. That question had long since been
decided. It was now a matter of life or death
with the European settlers and their descendants
a question of existence or no existence
permanent
peace or continual murders. The whites
had tried all the conciliatory measures of which
they supposed themselves possessed. Peace after
peace had succeeded to the frequent fires and
bloodshed of the savages. The calumet had been
smoked time after time, and hostage after
hostage
had been exchanged, yet there was no peace
and security for the white man. The right of
the aboriginals to the soil was indeed plain and
indisputable; yet now that the Europeans were in
possession, whether by purchase or conquest, the
absolute necessity of offensive warfare against them
was equally plain and unquestioned in his mind.
These views had been hastily communicated to the
council of officers held on the banks of the river, at
the commencement of the march, and
unanimously
concurred in by them. Notwithstanding this
unanimity of opinion among his associates in
command
,
the very first duty which presented itself
in accordance with these views, harrowed his
feelings
in the most painful manner. His imagination
carried him forward to the succeeding morning,
when his followers would in all probability be
carrying
fire and sword into the heart of the
settlement
ruled by his preserver. As the refined and
feeling surgeon weeps in secret over the necessity
of a painful and dangerous operation upon a
delicate
female friend, yet subdues his feelings and
steels his nerves for the approaching trial, so our
youthful commander silenced the rising weakness
in his heart, and urged his steed still deeper into
the forest. He determined to temper and soften
stern necessity with humanity.
A few hours' ride brought him up with the
baggage and artillery of the army. The sun had
already gone down, but a brilliant starlight, and
a balmy and serene air revived his drooping spirits,
as he swiftly passed these lumbering appendages.
Scarcely had he placed himself at the head of the
marching column, and perceived that the flower
and chivalry of his commandthe mounted
Cavaliers
,
were still in advance of him, before the
sharp quick report of their firearms was heard at
some three quarters of a mile distance in advance.
These were quickly succeeded by the savage
warwhoop
,
and in a few moments a bright red column
of fire and smoke shot up towards the heavens
immediately in front. His spurs were dashed into
his charger's flanks, and he flew through the
fitfully
illuminated forest toward a gently swelling
hill from beyond which the light seemed to
proceed
.
When he had gained this eminence, a sight
greeted his eyes which awakened all the tenderest
sympathies of his nature. Orapacs, the sole
remaining
village of the Chickahominiesthe scene
of his late torturesas well as his preservation,
was wrapped in flames. Ever and anon a terrified
or wounded savage came darting through the
forest
heedless alike of him and of the martial sounds
in his rear. He reined up his courser on the
summit and sadly viewed the scene.
His commands were no longer necessary for the
existing emergency. The deed, for which he had
been so laboriously and studiously preparing his
mind was done. The royal wigwam, the very
scene of his shelter, and of Wyanokee's hospitality,
was already enveloped by the devouring element.
A few struggling and desperate warriors still kept
up the unequal contest, but in a few moments, even
the despairing yells of these were hushed in the
cold and everlasting silence of death. Painfully
and intently he gazed upon the crumbling walls of
the once peaceful home of his Indian friend. He
could perceive no appearance of the unfortunate
queen. His imagination immediately conjured
up the image of the heroic maiden, her form
bleeding
and mutilated as it lay among the last
defenders
of the land of her fathers. By a singular
sophistry of the mind, he consoled himself by the
reflection, that the orders had not proceeded from
his lipsthat his hand had no part in the matter,
although he had himself laid down the plan of the
campaign, of which the scene before him was the
first result. True, he had mentioned no exact
time for the accomplishment of this measure, and
the ardour of his young companions in arms had
outstripped his own intentions; nevertheless, the
design was his, however much he might soothe his
own feelings by the want of personal
participation
.
By the time that the infantry and heavy
artillery
had arrived upon the spot occupied by their
General, the village of Orapacs was a heap of
smouldering ruins. The scene was again covered
with darkness, save when it was illuminated at
intervals by a fitful gleam, as some quivering ruin
fell tardily among the smouldering embers of the
walls which had already fallen. He assumed the
command of his troops, and marched them into
the plain between the place they then occupied,
and the site of the melancholy scene we have
described
.
By his orders also, the trumpets were
ordered to command the return of the impetuous
Cavaliers. Dudley and his compatriots soon
came bounding over the plain, exhilarated with
the first flush of success, and not a little surprised
at the cold and respectful salutations which greeted
them from their commander. Most of them,
however
,
were acquainted with his late sufferings and
feeble bodily health, and to this cause they were
willing to attribute his present want of euthusiasm.
Bacon had no sooner issued the necessary orders
for the night than, taking Dudley by the arm, he
walked forth into the forest beyond the sentinels
already posted.
Tell me, Dudley, (said he in a hurried and
agitated voice,) was she slain?
Was who slain?
The queen of these dominions!
No, I believe not. I think she was borne
from the scene early in the conflict, by some of
her tribe.
Thank God! he fervently ejaculated, and
then addressing himself to his aid, he continued,
Return, Dudley, to the campsuperintend the
execution of the orders I have issued for our
security
,
Vol. II. 7
in person, but follow me not, and suffer no
one, either officer or soldier, to approach the ruins.
I will return in the course of a couple of hours.
Having thus spoken, he suddenly disappeared
through the forest, and his companion returned to
the camp.
With slow and melancholy steps our hero
approached
the late busy and animated scene. The
beasts of prey were sending up their savage, but
plaintive notes in horrible unison with his own
feelings. The cool evening breeze fanned the
dying embers, and occasionally loaded the
atmosphere
with brilliant showers of sparks and flakes
of fire. As these rolled over his person and fell
dead upon his garments, he folded his arms, and
contemplated the ruins of the wigwam in which
he had found protection.
There, said he, was perhaps the
birth-place
of a hundred monarchs of these forests. Until
civilized man intruded upon these dominions, they
were in their own, and nature's way, joyous,
prosperous, and happy. They have resided amidst
the shades of these venerable trees, perhaps since
time began! The very waters of the stream
bubbling
joyously over yonder pebbles, have borrowed
their name. Where are they all now? The last
male youth of their kingly line was slain by these
hands, and the last habitations of his race fired
and plundered by soldiers owing obedience to my
commands. The plough and the harrow will soon
break down alike their hearth-stones and the
scene of their council fires. Yea, and the very
monuments of their dead must be levelled to
meet the ever craving demands of civilized
existence
.
But pshaw! is this the preparation to
steel a soldier's heart, and fire it with military
ardour and enthusiasm? Let me rather ponder
upon my own sufferings on this spot. Let me
remember the groans of dying old men, women,
and children, which rent the air twelve hours
since. And above all, let me bear in mind the
despairing shrieks of her, who was more than a
mother to me, of her who clothed and fed and
protected me in infancy. Where is she now?
She is alive and well! answered a feeble and
plaintive voice from the wild flowers and
shrubbery
which grew upon an earthen monument
erected
to the savage dead.
Who is it that speaks?
One that had better have slept with those who
sleep beneath!
Wyanokee?
Ay, who is left but Wyanokee and these
mouldering bones beneath, of all the proud race
that once trod these plains unchallenged, and free
as the water that bubbles at your feet.
He approached the rude monument as she spoke.
It consisted of a grass-grown mount some thirty
feet in length, by ten in height and breadth, and
was surmounted by thick clustering briers and
wild flowers. The youthful queen was sitting
upon the margin of the tumulus, her head resting
upon her hand, and it in its turn supported on her
knee. As the officer approached, she stood erect
upon the mount. Her person was clad and
ornamented
much as when he had last seen her, except
that above one shoulder protruded a richly carved
unstrung bow, and from the other, a quiver of
feather-tipped arrows crossing the bow near her
waist. The soldier replied,
It is almost useless for me to profess now, how
wholly, how profoundly, I sympathize with you
in witnessing this scene of desolation. Naught
but the dictates of inevitable necessity could have
induced the army under my command to
perpetrate
this melancholy devastation. But I trust
that the soothing influences of time, your own
good sense, and the ministrations of your kind
white friends, will reconcile you to these stern
decrees of fate.
Kind indeed is the white man's sympathy
very kind. He applies the torch to the wigwam
of his red friend, shoots at his women and children
as they run from the destruction within, and then
he weeps over the ruins which his own hands
have made.
It is even so, Wyanokee. I do not expect
you to understand or appreciate my feelings upon
the instant; but when you are once again
peacefully
settled at Jamestown with your sorrowing
young friend, and will cast your eyes over this
vast and fertile country, and see to what little
ends its resources are wasted, and on the other
hand, what countless multitudes are driven hither
by the crowded state of other parts of the world,
you will begin to see the necessity which is
driving
your red brethren to the far west. You can
then form some conception of the now unseen
power behind, which is urging them forward. You
will see the great comprehension and sublime
spectacle
of God's political economy! you will see it
in its beauty and its justice. You feel the partial
and limited effects of these swelling waves of the
great creation now upon yourself and your nation.
I grant they are hard to be borne, but once place
yourself above these personal considerations, and
compare the demands of a world with the handful
of warriors lying dead around those ruins, and you
will bow to the justice of the decree which has
gone forth against your people!
Does your Great Spirit then only care for the
good of his white children? You taught me to
believe that he too created the red men, and
placed them upon these hunting grounds, that he
eared as much for them as he did for their white
brethrenbut now it seems he is angry with the
poor red man, because he lives and hunts as he
was taught, by the Great Spirit himself. These
hunting grounds are now wanted for his other
children, and those to whom he first gave them,
must not only yield them up, but they must be
driven by the fire and the thunder, and the long
knives of those who have been professing
themselves
our brethren.
7*
Your view of the case is a very natural and
plausible one, yet it seems to me you have
over-looked
that point in it, upon which the whole
matter turns. Let us for one moment grant the
necessity of making room on your hunting grounds
for your white brethren, who are crowded out of
the older countries. There seemed at first no
need to disturb the red men, there was room
enough here for all, we were content to live upon
this kind and neighbourly footing. Had your
brethren been equally content, the great purposes
of the Creator would have been answered
without
any destruction of his red or white children.
Have the red men so demeaned themselves
toward
the whites that we could all dwell here
together
?
Let the massacre of last night speak!
You point to yonder smouldering ruins and bloody
corpses. I point to the bleeding bodies of my
countrymen and friends, and their demolished
dwellings as the causethe direct cause of the
desolation you behold.
The white man talks very fastand very well
he talks for the Great Spirit and himself too; but
who talks for the poor red man, but Wyanokee.
All you say is very good for the white men
upon our hunting grounds, and the white men
driven from over the great waters, and for the
white men left behind. It leaves room to hunt and
plant corn
there
for the white men, and finds room
here
to hunt and plant corn, but you do not give
the poor red man any hunting ground. You say
we must go to the far west, but how long will it
be the far west? How many of your white friends
are coming over the big waters? How far is this
place, where the red man will not be driven from
his new hunting ground? If we cannot live and
smoke the calumet of peace together, we must have
separate hunting grounds. Where are our
hunting
grounds? Ah, I see your eye reaches where the
clouds and the blue mountains come togetherto
the end of the world, we must go, like those beneath
us to the hunting grounds of the Great Spirit.
Not so, Wyanokee, we would willingly spare
the effusion of blood, and when our arms have
taught the men who assembled here two days ago,
our firm determination always to avenge the
murder
of our friends and the plunder of their property,
it is our intention to propose a fair and permanent
peace. We will endeavour to convince them of
the necessity of abandoning for ever the country
between these two great rivers, and moving their
hunting grounds where the interests of the two
races cannot come in conflict.
O yes, you will run the long knives through
their bodies, and then smoke the calumet! You
will drive us from our homes, and then you will
persuade us to give them up to the white man.
You are not now in a proper mood to reason
upon this subject calmly, my gentle friend, nor do
I wonder at it; but the time will come when your
views of this matter will be similar to my own.
No, Wyanokee cannot see through the white
man's eyes; she has not yet learned to forget her
kindred and her country. She came here to-night
to sit upon the graves of the great hunters and
warriors who slept here with their calumets and
tomahawks beside them, long before the long
knives came among us. She will carry away from
this place to night, this little flower planted by
her own hands over the graves of her fathers and
brothers. She would leave it here to spread its
flowers over their ancient war paths and their
graves, but even these silent and peaceful bones,
and these harmless flowers must share the fate of
them who buried the one and planted the other.
Wyanokee will never see this place morenever
again be near the bones of her fathers, until she
meets them all at the hunting ground of the Great
Spirit. Farewell, home and country and friends,
and fare thee well, ungrateful man; when next the
Indian maiden steps between thee and the
tomahawk
of her countrymen repay not her kindness
with the torch to her wigwam and the long knife
to her heart.
With these bitter words of parting, she
descended
from the mound with dignity, and disappeared
through the forest, notwithstanding the urgent
entreaties
of Bacon, that she would return. She
gave no other evidence of heeding him than
turning
back the palm of her hand toward him, and
leaning her head in the opposite direction, as if
she were exorcising an evil spirit. He made no
other attempt to stay her progress; once indeed
the thought occurred to him to hail the sentinel
and arrest her for her own sake, but the idea was
as speedily abandoned. He determined to leave
her destiny wholly in the hands of him who first
decreed it. For a moment he ascended the mount
and cast his eye over the wide-spread and
melancholy
desolation, and then rapidly retraced his
steps to the camp. When there, his first orders
were to have the slain warriors of the expatriated
tribes, buried in the tomb of their forefathers,
while his own personal attention was bestowed
upon the condition of the prisoners taken during
the demolition of the village.
They sat round the tents appropriated to their
use, in stern and sullen dignity. Wounded or
whole, no sound escaped their lips; and their
food and drink remained untouched before them.
They noticed the entrance of the commander in
chief no more than if he had been an
insignificant
creeping reptile of the earth; no signs of
recognition lighted up their features, though most
or all of them must have been present at the
scene of his own tortures. While Bacon stood no
unmoved spectator of the calm unshaken
fortitude
with which they bore their misfortunes, an
incident occurred that served to exhibit the stern
qualities of their pride in still bolder relief. One
of the old warriors had been taken while
attempting
to escape with one of his children, after
having
fought until there was not a vestige of hope
remaining for the preservation of his people and
their homes. He was brought into the camp,
together with his child. While the prisoners
were all sitting round in sullen dignity, and the
general of the invading army stood surveying
them as we have mentioned, this little child came
entreatingly to its father's knees, and begged for
the food which stood untouched before his face.
He made no verbal replya momentary weakness
softened his countenance as he gazed into the face
of the tender petitioner, but in the next, he raised
his tomahawk and sank it deep into the brain of
his child before any one could arrest his arm. The
innocent and unconscious victim fell without a
groan or struggle, and the stern old warrior
reinserted
the handle of his weapon in his belt, crossed
his arms upon his breast, and resumed his former
attitude of immobility. Bacon gazed at him in
astonishment and horror for an instant, and then
wheeled suddenly round to retire from an
exhibition
of humanity, so rude, ferocious, and appalling.
But as he was about to emerge from the portal
of the tent, Wyanokee was rudely thrust into the
door, and they stood face to face.
His first impulse was to draw his sword, and
rush upon the two soldiers who had guarded the
prisoner, but a moment's reflection served to
remind
him that they had but obeyed his own general
orders. He returned the half drawn weapon
therefore
,
and stood an embarrassed spectator of the
captive maiden's searching glances, as her eyes
wandered around the room, first resting upon her
unfortunate companions in captivity, next upon
the corpse of the slain infant, and lastly upon the
commander himself. He had seen her previously
when her subdued manners and lady-like
deportment
,
inclined him in communing with her to
forget
her Indian origin, but he saw her now with all
her native impulses roused to their highest tension.
Her eye flashed fire as it rested upon him after
completing her survey, and she thus addressed him,
stepping a few paces backward, while her person
was drawn up to its utmost height, and her bosom
heaved with struggling emotions.
Are you the same person who sometime since
undertook to inspire noble sentiments into the
mind of the purest being that ever honoured a
white skin? Are you the same youth who aspired
to her hand and renounced it on the marriage
night, because of kindred blood? Are you the
youth whose fair and deceitful form, and
apparently
noble nature, once made Wyanokee look with
contempt upon this heroic race of warriors? If
the form, the person be the same, the Great Spirit
of evil has poisoned the fountains of your heart,
and turned your goodness and your honour to
cruelty and cunning. How far has the great light
gone down behind the sea, since you stood upon
the ruins of all that Wyanokee loved, and
professed
sorrow for their destruction, and sympathy in
her misfortunes? When you stood before her,
and dared not lay your own hands upon her
person
!you
could leave her untouched upon the
grave of her great warriorsyou dared not seek
to injure her, lest their spirits should return from
the happy hunting ground and kill you on the
spot. But you could deceitfully order these poor
long knives to stand in her path and prevent her
from taking the last look, and heaving the last
sigh that should ever be looked and uttered in
these forests.
I gave no orders for your arrest, Wyanokee;
I have not spoken to the sentinels since I saw
you!
But you could stand and mourn with
Wyanokee
over the ashes of her fathers' wigwam,
when you had just come from ordering these to
carry her into captivity. They told me
themselves
that they acted by your orders. Oh how
cruel, how deceitful is the white man! He
gladdens
the poor Indian's eyes with his glittering toys,
till he cheats him of all the corn laid up for his
squaws during the winter. He smokes the
calumet
with the chiefs, while his own followers are
burning down the houses of their nation. You,
sir, redeemed Wyanokee from captivity, to carry
her into a more galling bondage. You taught her
the knowledge of the white man, only that she
might multiply her sorrows, when this long
fore-seen
night should come. Was it for this that she
redeemed you from the red hot tortures of these
chiefs? Did you come upon their hunting ground
to learn how to torture in preparation for this
occasion
,
and trusting to Wyanokee's soft and
foolish
heart for your safe return? Lead them and her
to the stake! we will show the white warrior how
to endure the tortures of our enemies without
fainting like women.
You will not listen to me, Wyanokee, else I
could have told you long ago, that I had given no
orders to the sentinels. We do not desire your
captivity? you are free to go now whithersoever
you choose, provided you keep beyond the range
of our sentinels. What our race has done against
yours, has only been done to protect their own
lives and property, and to make that protection
secure and permanent. You know that we never
torture prisoners; when the war is ended and peace
obtained, these warriors shall go free and
unharmed
.
I see that they have refused to touch their
food, under the belief that they are to suffer, but
I will leave you to undeceive them, after which you
are free to go or to remain. If the latter be your
choice, a tent shall be provided for your sole
accommodation
.
Having thus spoken, he hastily left the tent and
sought the marque occupied by the higher grade
of officers and the more aristocratic of the Cavaliers.
Gay sounds of song and minstrelsy greeted his ears
as he approached the spotBacchanalian scraps
promiscuously chimed in chorus with more
sentimental
Vol. II. 8
ditties, and all occasionally drowned in
boisterous shouts of laughter. These evidences
of the mood in which he should find his associates
deterred him from entering, under his present
feelings
,
and he therefore passed on to his own solitary
quarters. In a few moments he was extended
upon such a bed as a camp affords, with no
external
source of interruption to his repose, save the
distant cries of the wild beasts, and the more
monotonous
tread of the sentinel, as he paced his
narrow limits in the performance of his duty.
The sun rose the next morning over the ruins
of Orapacs and the scene of the late strife in
unclouded
splendour. The enlivening notes of drums
and trumpets had long since roused the soldiers
from their slumbers, and having despatched their
morning meal, they were speedily forming into
marching order. The commander of this
imposing
little army mounted his charger, and galloped
along the forming battalions; his eye bright and
serene, his spirits, in comparison with the previous
night, bounding and elastic. Having detailed to
his council of officers his intention of next
attacking
the king of Pamunky, the orders for the
march were given, and the lines wheeled into
columns, headed by the gay and brilliant
cortge
of youthful Cavaliers.
The prisoners were marched into the centre of
the column, and as they assumed their station, the
general ran his anxious eye eagerly over their
persons, to ascertain whether his former pupil had
availed herself of the accommodations provided by
his orders. But no such graceful form greeted
his sight, and he learned from the Captain of the
guard that she had departed soon after he had
himself left the prisonersentirely alone. A
momentary
sadness shaded his brow, as he reflected
upon the desolate condition of the Indian maiden,
but it was soon lost in the absorbing duties of his
station.
Toward evening, of the ensuing day, as the army
pursued their route between the Chickahominy and
Pamunky Rivers, the vanguard discovered several
of the Pamunky tribe, skulking among the trees of
the forest immediately in advance of them. The
general, apprehending an ambuscade, immediately
ordered the Cavaliers to fall back upon the main
body of the army, while a practised band of rangers
were ordered to examine the cover of the wood.
Scarcely had these orders been transmitted to their
various destinations, before a bright beacon fire shot
its spiral column of smoke and flame high above
the surrounding trees. What this new device
portended
the commander could not divine, nor could
the council, which was immediately summoned,
give to it a satisfactory interpretation. The
Rangers
returned without discovering any signs of an
ambuscade, though they had penetrated to the
huge fire which lighted up the forest. Not an
Indian was to be seen there or beyond. Bacon
and his staff rode forward to the scene in person
but the aid of a glass enabled him to discover
nothing more.
The army was again put in motion, and every
precaution used which some experience in Indian
warfare had taught the general was so necessary.
For miles they proceeded with the most watchful
caution, until the absence of the undergrowth in
the forest taught them that it had been fired, and
thereby disclosed the probability of their being in
the near neighbourhood of the town of the
Pamunkies
.
The verdant glades were lighted up at
intervals by broad masses of red light from the
setting sun, as they fell between the natural
interstices
of the trees. The appearance of the
woodland
vista before them was romantic and
picturesque
in the extreme. The forest had the aspect
of a country which had been settled for ages. The
venerable trees, surmounted with green and brown
moss, were now occasionally richly bronzed with
the rays of the sun as they fell horizontally upon
their hoary trunks, and the whole more resembled
an ancient and venerable park, which some wealthy
gentleman had inherited from careful and
provident
ancestors, than a wild woodland, fresh from
the hands of nature, in which the woodman's axe
had never been heard, and upon which no other
care or culture had been bestowed than the
occasional
torch of the savage.
They were not left long to revel in these wild
beautiesa more appalling scene awaited them.
The sun was fast declining behind the river hills of
the Chickahominy and darkness encireling the
sombre
groves in which they rode, when suddenly a
hundred fires cast a lurid glare across their path,
and the army instinctively halted on beholding the
town of the Pamunkies wrapped in flames. Again
they were put in motion, and cautiously approached
the spot. Bacon fearing that some treachery
lurked
beneath these unexpected measures of the
Indians
,
could scarcely restrain the impetuosity of
his mounted force, spurred on by curiosity to see
in what new device of savage warfare they would
terminate.
They arrived upon the skirts of the town,
however
,
and within the influence of the heat,
without
hindrance or adventure; and what no less
surprised them, not a living creature was
perceptible
,
around or near the conflagration.
The first idea that suggested itself to the mind
of Bacon was, that the savages had, in despair,
thrown themselves into the burning ruins of their
own dwellings. He now understood the meaning
of the beacon light on their route; it was the
signal for commencing the tragedy, he muttered
to himself as he reined up his steed and ordering
his troops to halt, brought them into line along the
outskirts of the burning village, which, like the one
they had themselves fired, was constructed upon the
banks of the Pamunky river. While the troops
thus stood upon their arms, some of the officers
rode through the blazing wigwams, very much
8*
against the will of their rearing and plunging
chargers
.
It was completely deserted; but while they
were consulting upon the measures to be taken, a
tumultuous
and astounding yell burst suddenly upon
their startled ears. The intense light of the
burning
village rendered the twilight gloom around as
dark as midnight by the contrast, and not a savage
could anywhere be seen. The mounted troop
made a wide sweep round the alignment, but
with no better success. Another astounding shout
of savage voices ascended to the clouds. Many
of the frail and tottering wigwams tumbled in at
the same momentthrowing the light in a lower
line of vision over the water, so that they were
enabled to discover a large body of mounted
Pamunkies
drawn up like themselves on the opposite
bank of the river. Their grim and painted
visages
,
close shaven crowns, scalp locks, and gaudy
feathers, appeared through the medium of the red
and flickering light reflected from the water, in
horrible distinctness. A legion of devils from the
infernal regions, clothed in all the horrors of
German
poetry, never startled the senses and aroused
the imagination more than did this spectacle its
amazed beholders. With another yell and a
flourish
of their tomahawks above their heads, the
Indians simultaneously wheeled their horses and
flew over the plain towards the source of the river.
In a few moments all was silent as death, save the
crackling of the burning wigwams. The squaws
and children seemed to have been long since
removed
.
Again the colonial armyor to speak
more properly, the army of the people, encamped
before the ruins of an ancient and venerable
settlement
.
Here were no painful reminiscences for the
sensitive
but energetic commander. The savages
were flying before his as yet scarcely tried army,
in the very direction in which it was his purpose
to drive them. He knew them too well to believe
that the whole peninsula would be thus tamely
abandoned, and he issued his orders, before lying
down to rest, for redoubled vigilance through the
night, and an early march in the morning toward
the falls of the Powhatan, where he had every
reason to believe that the tribes of the former
confederacy
were again drawing to a head.
CHAPTER VI.
Our
hero was not deceived in his supposition,
that the savage tribes inhabiting the Peninsula
would make a desperate effort to retain possession
of a country so admirably adapted to their mode
of life. Two noble rivers, one on either hand,
abounding with a variety of fish, and a fertile soil,
yielding its treasures with little culture, were
considerations
in the eyes of these ignorant but not
misjudging sons of the forest, not to be
surrendered
without a struggle.
As the army of the colonists pursued its march
toward the point already indicated as the
rendezvous
of the again confederated tribes, it was
constantly
harassed with alarmssignal fires and
flying
bodies of mounted warriors, first cutting off
their communication with the rivernow
assailing
the vanguard, and then hovering upon the
rear. Three weeks and more were thus
consumed
in partial and unsatisfactory engagements;
the skirmishers first approaching one river, upon
the representation of some treacherous savage, and
then hurrying back in the opposite direction to meet
some illusive demonstration made by the cunning
enemy. The youthful commander soon perceived
that this mode of warfare was the one exactly
suited
to the nature and condition of his foes, and the
least adapted to the impetuous courage of his own
troops. He saw too, that the savages had the
double design of wearying out their invaders in
the manner we have described, and of collecting
and concentrating their forces, at some point where
their own mode of warfare could be rendered
available
,
without exposing themselves to the
destructive
discharges of artillery which they still held
in superstitious terror. A very little reflection
satisfied him that there would be no
immediate
danger in pursuing the direct route between the
Powhatan and Chickahominy rivers, toward the
falls of the former, where he had already some
intimation
that the enemy were collecting in great
force. He was well satisfied that the tribes already
dislodged had removed all their winter provisions,
and their wigwams being destroyed, there could
be little hazard to the city in disregarding their
daily demonstrations in his front, flank, and
rear. Accordingly his troops were concentrated
in a solid column, and marched directly toward the
falls, entirely disregarding the petty annoyances
which had already detained them so ingloriously
in the Peninsula.
While they were marching toward the scene of
the great and final struggle for supremacy between
their own race and the Aborigines, in this narrow
neck of land, which had so long been the scene of
contention, we will retrace our steps for a short
space, in order to bring up the proceedings at
Jamestown to the point at which we have just
arrived
.
In doing so, however, it is not our intention to
fatigue the reader with a minute account of the
long and tedious days, and still more wretched
nights, spent by our heroine after the shock given
to her delicate constitution by the painful and
unexpected
adventure in the chapel, and by the
subsequently
reported death of her mother under
peculiarly
awful and afflicting circumstances. The
reader has doubtless more truly imagined her
condition
during the first paroxysms of the fever,
than we could describe it. Down to the time when
her favourite and confidant was permitted to enter
her room, the daily occurrences of her yet
endangered
life were sad and monotonous enough, but
the paramount cravings of diseased nature once
assuaged, her mental excitement once more rose in
the ascendant. Not that her reason ever became
deranged, except from violent febrile action during
the height of the attack; however feeble her
physical
organization, her mental powers were clear
and unclouded, and her spirits, though of necessity
somewhat broken, were firm and elastic. The
truth is, that she did not believe the assertion of
the Recluse by which the nuptial ceremony was
so dreadfully interrupted. She had indeed a
feeling
of superstitious reverence for whatever came
from his lips, but she had also seen the wild fire
of his eye when under deep excitement, and she
did not therefore give implicit confidence to any
declaration he should make.
This questioning of his oracular authority was
an after-consideration it is true, and was itself
prompted by other feelings, having their
foundation
in the affections of the heart. She could not
believe that her lover was her own brother; her
feelings toward him were peculiarpowerful, and
different from the love of mere kindred. Besides,
there were little almost undefinable circumstances
in the intercourse of their halcyon days, which
she did not believe, could in the nature of man,
have taken place between brother and sister. She
most truly thought that her lover and herself were
expressly created for each other; that their union
had been decreed in heaven. That in the first
dawnings of their mutual understanding of each
other, there had been electrical, spiritual and ever
sublime transmissions of mutual intelligence and
exquisite pleasure, which could not exist between
children of the same parents. These were some
of the reasonings which first led her to doubt the
infallibility of the Recluse, or rather this was
something like the process by which she arrived
at firm and undoubting conviction. She viewed
the case in this light from the very first moment
of unclouded perception, but at first it was a wild
tumultuous and suffocating mixture of vague
perceptions
,
and scarcely permitted hopes. As she
gradually analyzed her feelings, and examined the
reasons for her convictions, the truth dawned
more and more clearly upon her view. She was
one day sitting, propped up on her couch, during
the three weeks in which Bacon was engaged in
his Indian campaign, the doctor sitting by her
side with his finger upon her pulse. Both were
silent and abstracted. The pale beautiful
countenance
of the invalid was fixed in deep and earnest
thought. Her eyes wandered through an open
window, and sought a resting place upon some
sunny spot of green and refreshing nature. Her
lips moved just perceptibly, as if she were
conversing
with some one in an under tone. At length she
slightly raised her head, her eyes sparkled with the
brilliancy of stars, waxing brighter and brighter,
and her head rising higher and higher from her
pillow, until she screamed in wild delight, The
light of heaven and love's inspiration itself declare
it false.
The doctor rose with a grave and anxious look,
and placing one hand upon her shoulders, and with
the other removing the pillows that supported
her, laid her gently down, saying,
I fear there is more excitement about your
head to-day, my dear young lady; if it continues
you must lose blood again.
Oh, dear doctor, there is indeed excitement
about my head and my heart too, but it is not the
excitement of fever; or if it is, it is a dear
delightful
fever, which I trust in God will never leave
me, for it came just now wafted on my brain as if
by the music of the spheres.
Your room must be darkened again, and the
cold applications to your head repeated.
You think I am losing my senses again, dear
doctor, but I assure you I am just regaining them,
as I will show you from this time forward. I
have now done with physic. I have a medicine
here, (and she laid her hand upon her heart,
while a bewitching smile played around her
mouth, that staggered the good doctor,) which
is worth more to me than all the costly drugs of
India, or the islands of the sea.
And the event justified her words. Her mind
was no sooner settled in deep conviction, and her
heart comparatively at ease, than she began
rapidly
to recover. It was some days before the scene
just related, when Harriet Harrison was admitted
to her presence, and when, as the reader has
already
learned from that maiden herself, Virginia
propounded to her the questions touching her
lover's belief in their reported relationship, which
were repeated by Miss Harrison to Bacon.
So long as that interview continued between the
two intimates, untramelled by the presence of a
third person, it was one of deep interest; but
unfortunately
the heir of the house had too much
reason to suspect that Harriet's feelings were
engaged
in another's interest, long to indulge them
with an unoroken interview. Virginia barely
had time to ask those questions, and whisper to
her friend the tidings of her own dawning hopes,
before the doctor entered, attended to the door
Vol. II. 9
as Harriet perceived through the partial opening,
by Frank Beverly himself; she therefore took her
leave, promising a speedy return.
As she retired from the chamber of the invalid,
she accidentally overheard the Governor's orders
for Bacon's arrest, the result of which has already
been related. Her next visit to the house was on
the day of the scene between the doctor and his
patient, which we have just attempted to describe.
She was ushered into the room of state, usually
occupied by the Governor for the reception of his
most distinguished guests. No formality was
neglected in duly receiving her at the door, and
conducting her to this presence chamber of his
Excellency, by the official who acted as master of
ceremonies.
I have no business of state to communicate to
the Governor, Sir Porter; I came to see his niece!
The porter bowed profoundly as he replied,
But his Excellency has some business with you,
madam, as he informed me, when he directed me
to usher you into this apartment. Another
profound
inclination followed, with an accompaniment
of rubbing hands and shuffing his feet backward;
while the arch, but somewhat alarmed and
astonished
maiden, was left to con her speech to the
Governor
at her leisure. After a most tedious interval
of half an hour, the formal representative of
majesty
made his appearance, with such a profusion
of bows that his merry master himself would have
smiled to witness them. Of course Harriet bit her
lips in order to restrain their mirthful inclinations.
While the old knight drew a chair, and after
sundry
hems and stroking his chin, thus gravely
addressed her: I am informed, Madam, that
you are desirous of an interview with me; will
you be so good as to enlighten me as to the cause
of the unexpected honour?
Some one must have deceived you with a most
egregious story, Sir William. I desired no such
thing. I came here to see my friend, Virginia
Fairfax
.
I am exceedingly pained to inform you, Miss
Harriet, that from certain late circumstances, which
it is needless to particularize, and in which you
were somewhat a participator, I, as Virginia's
natural
guardian, have thought proper to end the
intercourse
between you at once. My niece is
destined
soon to become the wife of my young
kinsman
,
Beverly, and it is most prudent to keep her
from the sight of such persons and things as might
remind her of that most strange and disgraceful
transaction of which I will not speak more openly.
I am very sorry to give you pain, but there was
no other course left for me to pursue than to be
plain and candid with you.
And does this marriage take place with
Virginia's
consent?
She has not been consulted as yet; her health,
in the first place, did not admit of it, and in the
second, the evidence which she so lately gave o
being utterly incapable of choosing a husband
calculated
to secure her own happiness, or reflect
honour upon her family and connexions, has caused
that duty to devolve on me.
But, Sir William, suppose she should refuse
to accept the husband of your choice? You
certainly
will not enforce your determination.
Her lamented father and myself entered long
since into a covenant by which these young people
were to be united. On the very morning of his
death, we talked the matter over; he freely and
fully consented to the completion of the
engagement
,
and forthwith it shall be carried into
execution
,
if sufficient authority remains to me in these
turbulent and rebellious times to enforce it.
But you will give her time to assuage her
grief, and make up her mind to the lot which
awaits her. You surely will not precipitate her
into the celebration of these nuptials?
You talk, young lady, as if it were some
horrible
and revolting monster to whom I intended
uniting her, instead of the presumptive heir and
mearest kinsman of Sir William Berkley, well
favoured and highly accomplished, as you must
acknowledge that he is. She has had time
enough to recover her equanimity, and as soon
as her health is equally restored; the
ceremony
shall be performed; and whether or not, it
is my purpose to complete it before the return of
that arch-rebel Bacon to the city. Please God,
however, I intend he shall return in irons to
undergo
the penalty demanded by the outraged laws
of his country.
And you will not permit me to see my friend
for five minutesonly five minutes?
No! lady, you are now advised of my
intentions
touching the disposal of my niece, and you
may readily comprehend the reasons of your
exclusion
from her presence, without my entering
into further and more painful explanations.
With this answer, Harriet was compelled to be
content, and therefore making a reverence, more
than usually formal, to his Excellency, she
withdrew
.
It was not in her nature, however, to
resign
her friend to the fate which threatened her,
without an effort to relieve her. From the
gubernatorial
mansion she immediately hastened in
pursuit
of O'Reily, in order to despatch him with a
communication for his master. But Brian was
nowhere
to be found; her own researches and those
of the servant whom she despatched in pursuit of
him were of no effect; she was therefore
compelled
to entrust her message to one of her father's
negroes, who was well mounted, and despatched
upon his errand, within less than two hours from
the time of her interview with his Excellency.
During the absence of the army in the
Peninsula
,
Sir William Berkley had not been idle, as
has already been intimated. The commands borne
by his couriers to those Cavaliers throughout the
colony, who were yet well affected to his
government
,
began now to bring them in from all
directions
,
9*
and the regular soldiers stationed at the forts,
which were so offensive to the citizens, were
marching rapidly upon the capital from every
quarter
.
Some had already arrived, and the city was
once more thronged with eager faces. Sounds
of martial music were again heard through the
streets, and the more quiet citizens again disturbed
with the stern preparations for war.
The present military and Cavalier assemblages
in the capital were, however, of a very different
political character, and brought together with
very different motives from those which had
preceded
them. They were not less in numbers,
spirit and appointments; but their object was not
to cope with the savageit was to measure arms
in deadly strife with their own countrymen and
fellow-citizens. The army now assembling, was
intended by the Governor to suppress what he
called the rebellion, and his purpose was, as soon as
his forces should all arrive, to march at once to the
Falls of the Powhatan, and while the popular army
were engaged in front with the savage enemies of
their country, to fall upon their rear, and either
cut them in pieces, or compel them to surrender
as rebels found bearing arms against his majesty's
authority in the colony.
Seldom have political parties of any country
presented so strange an aspect as did those of
Virginia
at this period. First, the people of the city
had been divided between the Cavaliers and
Roundheads
.
The latter were no sooner brought into
complete subjection, than a new amalgamation
took place, by which their distinctive character
was lost. Then, growing out of the puerile
obstinacy
of Sir William Berkley, in refusing to repel
the incursions of the Indians merely because he
had at first maintained that there was no danger
to be apprehended from their hostility, the
popular
or conservative party sprang into existence.
Against these were now arrayed the loyalist
faction
,
and most of those descended from noble
ancestors
or bearing titles, headed by the Governor
himself.
In a very few days this latter party had
assembled
their whole military force in the city, and
the most active preparations were made to march
against Bacon and his followers who were carrying
fire and sword into the very heart of the country
occupied by the real enemies of the colony.
The temporary duties of the government were
resigned into the hands of Sir H. Chicherley,
while Sir William Berkley, Sir Herbert Jeffries,
Francis Beverly, Philip Ludwell, and their
compeers
,
assumed the most important stations of
command
in the army of the loyalists. Much the larger
portion of the regular troops were composed of
foreign mercenaries, sent over from England to
perform those very duties which Bacon and his
followers were now to be punished for assuming.
The very soldiers who ought to have protected the
whites against the incursions of the Indians were
to be turned against the patriot band which had
volunteered to perform a service no longer to be
deferred with safety to the colony. It is true that
the commissions of Bacon and his officers were not
legally signed by the constituted authorities; but
an emergency had arisen which threw the citizens
back at once upon their original rights and
powers
.
The government having failed to afford
them protection for their lives and property, they
had assumed that office for themselves. This was
the condition of the colony at the juncture of
which we write.
While Sir William and his coadjutors were thus
busily collecting and disciplining their forces, the
citizens of the capital were not uninterested
spectators
of this unwonted succession of military
preparations
.
Most of those remaining in the city
had friends and relations in the ranks of the
popular
army, and though they dared not openly
express
their disapprobation of the Governor's
proceedings
,
their discontent was deep and settled,
and only awaited the departure of the present
overpowering
force, again to burst into open resistance
against the government.
While these preparations for civil strife were
going on in the streets of the city, a discussion of
not less interesting import to some of the leading
characters of our story, was carried on within the
walls of the Governor's mansion. The stout old
Cavalier had fixed upon the day preceding the
departure
of his army, for the solemnization of the
marriage between his niece and his kinsman
Beverly
.
He had himself held several interviews
with the former, but had failed to make the least
impression on her mind, either by his reasoning or
his more artful appeals to her filial duty and
affections
.
In vain had he detailed her father's plans and
expectations. In vain had he appealed to her love
and respect for his memory. In vain had he
descended
from his dignity to reproach her with the
late disastrous occurrence at the chapel. In vain
had he coarsely charged her with desiring an
alliance
,
contrary alike to the laws of God and man.
She was deaf to his arguments and his threats.
But the time approached with fearful rapidity,
which he had appointed for the ceremony. The
intended bridegroom held an important command
in the expedition now preparing, and it was Sir
William's intention that he should be married and
set out on the succeeding morning.
Notwithstanding
our heroine's apparent firmness, therefore, in
presence of her stern relative, every note of
preparation
which was wafted into her chamber sent
the blood oppressively to her heart. Her naturally
mild and gentle nature shrunk from the
contemplation
of the violence which her fears and her
knowledge of her kinsman induced her to believe
would be used to overcome her resolution.
His pretended dread of the disgrace which he
charged her with desiring to bring upon his family
she knew was exactly the apology he wanted for
the arbitrary measures necessary to the completion
of the plan.
She was alone in the world. No one now stood
ready to give her rescue from the relentless hands
which placed restraint upon her inclinations. Her
nearest kindred had, as she believed, fallen by the
savage tomahawk, and her only remaining relative
was about to force her into a marriage which she
detested. Notwithstanding all these depressing
circumstances, her elastic mind and sanguine
temperament
had hitherto risen above the
accumulating
weight of her misfortunes. She had still
preserved
the vague yet constant hope, so natural to
youth, that some fortunate occurrence, some
unexpected
accident would yet take place to mar the
well laid plans of the Governor. But as the time
approached, and the preparations moved steadily
forward without any evidence of coming succour,
or the fortunate event which was to release her
from her dreadful situation, her heart began to
misgive hershe was compelled in some measure
to assume an humbler posture towards the stern
old man in whose hands her destiny seemed
placed. Her ingenuity had turned the subject
in all its various aspectsevery chance of
escape
was provided against. Even the presence
of her friend Harriet, upon which she had
founded
most of her hopes, was rigidly and
perseveringly
denied to her. As a last and desperate
resort, she humbly supplicated her uncle for an
uninterrupted interview with him to whom he
purposed to marry her; and Sir William seeing
nothing in this request calculated to defeat his
plans, but on the contrary hoping that it proceeded
from a wavering resolution, granted the request.
She sat upon a large leathern-backed chair, her
head leaning upon the window sill, and her flaxen
ringlets clustering around her pale and attenuated,
but still beautiful features. Her
robe de chamber
was white and simple in its fashion, and her hands
were listlessly and languidly twined into its folds,
seeming, every now and then, as if her delicate
fingers would pierce the yielding texture. A
solitary tear seemed as if it had already departed
from its pure fountain, as tremblingly it hung upon
the long dewy eyelash, the mere closing of which
dissipated it into a thin misty veil of sadness to
her liquid melancholy blue eye, as it was turned in
fearful expectation towards the door.
At length Beverly entered. She had until
this moment strenuously resisted all endeavours to
promote an interview, and once, on a former
similar
occasion, had covered her face and
pertinaciously
resisted all attempts on his part to lead her
into conversation. He now entered with the
knowledge that the invitation came from herself;
he felt his supposed power; and a lofty smile
played
upon his proud but handsome features. As he
approached, she sank upon her knees, and clasped
her hands in supplication. The tears had now
burst the restraints of thought and internal
oppression
,
and rapidly coursed each other down her
cheeks as she spoke, You see before you, sir,
a solitary female and an orphan, bereaved
suddenly
and cruelly of her natural protectorsdeserted
or oppressed by those who should have supplied
their place. Before the distracting grief for these
afflictions has had time to lose its first intensity,
she has been cruelly beset and importuned to
become
a party to a marriage, of which she had
never before thought. You, sir, are the other
party! I entreat, I implore you on my knees, at
least to postpone this intended ceremony. If it is
performed to-night, as my uncle has appointed,
the wrath of Heaven will be poured out upon such
a desecration of its holy institutions. You, sir,
will wed a corpse or a raving maniac! Interpose
then, I pray you. Petition Sir William, as from
yourself alone, for its postponement, at least until
your return from the intended campaign, and I
will pray for your happiness until the end of my
existence. I will then indeed believe that you
desire mine.
He made several attempts to raise her from her
supplicating posture, during her appeal, but she
maintained her attitude. Having paused to catch
her exhausted breath, he seized the opportunity
to say, Are you sure, madam, that there is no
lurking weakness, no sinister design, in this
demand
for farther time?
Of what design, what weakness do you suspect
me? she exclaimed, raising her head boldly, and
losing almost instantly the subdued tone of entreaty.
Of base and criminal affections for one who
should be blotted from the tablets of your memory
for his villany, if not for his kindred blood!
She was on her feet in an instant; her ringlets
wildly tossed back by a quick motion of the head,
and a corresponding effort with both hands, which
she held still clasped in her hair, as she stared at
him an instant before she replied,
Are you a man? A gentleman? A Cavalier?
That you come here to insult and trample upon
one already deserted of all mankind? Her whom
you pretend to desire for a companion through joy
and wo! How base, how cowardly, to insult a
helpless
female, and that female your kinswoman
one whom you pretend to love. Out upon you,
sir, for a dastard! Were he now here whom you
so basely slander, you would not dare employ such
language!
Softly, softly, my dear lady. You are only
betraying your own feelings, and counteracting
the relenting mood into which your well acted
appeal was near betraying me.
Oh, then, forget what I have said, and be
indeed
the high minded, generous Beverly, I once
believed you! We were children together, caressed
by the same friends and owning a common
origin
.
Can you then witness unmoved my forlorn
condition, without one feeling of compassion?
Vol. II. 10
Beverly was not wholly without tender
feelings
,
although they were so concentrated upon
himself, that it required the touch of a master hand
to reach his heart. Selfish men, however, are
sometimes easily worked upon by allusions or
appeals to their family pride. Their connexions
are a constituent part of the idol of their worship
self; and it is not the least remarkable feature
in their characters, that such men are almost
always
affectionate husbands and devoted parents.
These are but a part of self; their kindred by a
farther remove are generally valued in proportion
to their ability to confer honour upon the
common
stock.
He that feels not love, says Goethe, must
learn to flatter. Doubtless the great German
poet was contemplating the difficulties of the
supremely selfish man in love, when he penned
this aphorism. But Beverly was not so
profoundly
skilled in the human heart; he ardently
desired
to possess the hand of his fair kinswoman,
as well on account of her many personal
attractions
,
as of the rich inheritance of which she was
the heiress; but he had not learned his own harsh
defects of character, and of course could not
substitute
the arts of flattery for the softer eloquence
of love. He felt and enjoyed his power, as
compensating
in some degree for the want of
admiration
of himself in his intended bride, and such
were the feelings operating upon him when he
entered her chamber; but her last appeal seemed
to move his selfish nature, as he paused to
contemplate
the eloquent suppliant before he replied.
Suppose that I obtain from Sir William his
consent for the postponement of the ceremony,
will you then give me your hand of your own free
will?
She paused before replying. The case was
desperate; no succour seemed now within the
bounds of probability. The shades of evening
were fast gathering around the gloomy precincts of
her secluded apartment. She knew her uncle's
determination of character. One only chance of
escape appeared remaining open to her, and she
desperately resolved to seize it. Such was the
train of reasoning by which she rapidly arrived at
this conclusion, and replied,
Our inclinations are not always within our
own control, but if you obtain this reprieve, I
promise to give you my hand upon the return of
the present expedition, provided that nothing
occurs
in the mean time to free me from the
necessity
.
For I will be plain and honest with you,
and avow mydetermination to escape this marriage
if I can.
I understand you, fair cousin; you expect
deliverance at the hands of your degraded and
new found kinsman; but trust me, he will need
succour himself before that time arrives. I expect
to march him through these streets in irons on my
wedding-day. Frown notgather no storms of
indignation upon your browit shall be even so.
But time wears apace; so pledge yourself before
Heaven, that if I obtain Sir William's consent to
this delay, you will be mine upon the return of
the army.
Before Heaven I promise you, under the
condition
I have named.
It is then a bargain, and I will seek the
Governor
to fulfil my part of it; should he consent,
see that you remember your plighted faith. As
for your condition, I take no thought of that;
and with this remark he left the room.
It was with the greatest difficulty that she could
suppress her rising indignation, upon his again
alluding to her new found kinsman; but she did
so far suppress it as to force herself through the
required promise. The door had no sooner closed
upon his retreating footsteps, than she clasped her
hands, and exclaimed fervently, raising her eyes
toward heaven, Thank God! I am now freed
from the immediate apprehension of this most
hated union. Oh, if he does but come within the
allotted time! and come as my flattering hopes
persuade me that he willa conqueror! hailed a
the deliverer of his countrythe champion of her
oppressed and outraged people, and the preserver
of the most wretched of her maidens! what
blessings
will be his! Be he brother or kinsman or
lover, he shall live for ever in this grateful heart.
Brother indeed! He is a brother in kindness,
devotion, and disregard of self; but a brother in
kindred blood, my heart assures me he is not.
The door was again opened after the lapse of
a short time, and Beverly entered to say, I have
seen Sir William, and presented my request; he
refused at first, but when I told him that you had
promised to be mine at the expiration of the
required
time, he yielded his consent. I purposely
concealed from him that there was any condition
in the case, first, because I take no heed to it
myself
,
and secondly, because it might have precluded
his concurrence, and would most certainly be a
motive with him for placing you under still more
rigid restraint. You see, sweet coz, that I study
your happiness far more than you give me credit
for. Why will you not freely then make me its
guardian for life?
How very different is the selfish man, thought
Virginia, who thus blazons his own little acts of
merest charity, for refined and delicate attentions,
from him who possesses innate benevolence and
gentleness of heart? He would have studiously
concealed a hundred greater kindnesses than this.
But under present circumstances, even such
unfavourable
comparisons did not prevent her from
replying,
For every act of kindness towards me, Mr.
Beverly, I am sure I try to feel very grateful, and
since I have been within these walls, my feelings
have been so little exercised in that way that it is
really refreshing to feel under their influence,
10*
even in the smallest degree. The very servants
treat me as a lost and abandoned creature. Those
of my own sex that once professed love and respect
for me, fly from the apartment when I speak to them,
as if there were contamination in my very voice.
I know that some horrible tale has been told them
about me: would you but take the trouble to
correct
the false impression, before you depart, my
solitary lot might be greatly softened, and I would
then have double cause for gratitude.
With the domestic arrangements of the house
I dare not interfereSir William has directed all
those things himself.
And is it by his orders too that my aunt comes
not to see me, nor sends a kind word of inquiry
as to my health these long sad days, or a book to
while away the longer and more gloomy nights?
It is. She has wept as many foolish tears almost
as yourself, since your confinement to this room.
Thank God! You have taken a load from off
my heart. There is then one soul within the
house, of my own sex and blood too, who
sympathises
with me during these stern severities.
Your trials will soon be over, my pretty coz,
and then we will remove to a house of our own,
and you shall lord it over some of these blackies,
in revenge for their want of respect, to your heart's
content. Attempting to chuck her under the
chin, as he spoke, she was compelled to turn her
head suddenly toward the window, for the double
purpose of placing herself beyond the reach of his
hand, and of concealing the rising flush of anger
and contempt that glowed upon her countenance.
She saw that he treated her as a childthat he
imagined such conversation suited to the level of
her capacity, and longed to humble his proud
self-sufficiency
,
but dared not under present
circumstances
.
For the first time in her life, she found
herself compelled to disguise her natural feelings,
and suppress the bitter words which rose upon her
tongue. She therefore, by way of changing the
conversation, and knowing not what else to say,
inquired, How soon does your army expect to
return?
Soon, my dear coz, very soon. In ten days
at farthest, I hope to lay some of the trophies of
victory at your feet, and twine you a bridal
turban
from the standard of the rebel chief. Again
she was forced to turn her head away. And the
harmony of their meeting, constrained and
unnatural
as it was, would probably very soon have
been ruptured by the almost bursting indignation
which agitated her bosom, had not the martial
summons to the evening parade called her
tormentor
from her presence.
By dawn of day, on the morning after the
interview
just related, the army under the command
of Sir William Berkley took up its line of march
toward the falls of the Powhatan.
Virginia was a sad and silent spectator of the
imposing pageant. She stood at her window facing
one of the cross streets, through which their march
was directed, and examined the devices of
banner
after banner, as they moved along in martial
pomp, to the soul-inspiring music of the drums
and trumpets. No sympathizing emotions or half
embodied supplications to the Ruler of Nations for
the safety of their persons or the success of their
arms burst from her lips. She saw the proud
and self-satisfied Beverly curvetting by on his
equally proud steed; she even saw him gayly wave
his towering plumes in recognition of her presence
without an answering nod or a single indication of
approval. Her heart and hopes followed the
standard
of the youthful Captain who commanded the
force which these were summoned to scatter and
destroy. Long after the last ensign had passed
from her sight, and the music was heard only in
faint and distant echoes as it swelled and died
away upon the air, she stood in the same spot, her
eyes apparently still occupied with passing objects.
It was not soshe was endeavouring to look into
futurity. She pictured in her imagination the
army of the Cavaliers, under Bacon, struggling in
the murderous ambuscade of the concentrated
savage
tribes in front, and mercilessly cut down by
their own countrymen in the rear. She saw the
stern and uncompromising Sir William and his
veteran compeers, brandishing their sabres over
the heads of the younger Cavaliers, and Beverly
and Bacon engaged in the deadly contest of
personal
rivalry and political hatred.
Notwithstanding
the disadvantages of the latter's position,
youthful
hopes and a sanguine temperament, awarded
the victory to the cause which she believed the
just one. She had already, as by miracle, escaped
a fate which she considered far more to be deplored
than death, and resolved to trust her own cause,
and that in which it was involved, to him who
rules the destinies of battles. She remembered,
with feelings of adoration, that he had said that the
race was not always to the swift nor the battle to
the strong.
CHAPTER VII.
The
army under the command of General
Bacon
had succeeded in concentrating the
confederated
tribes of the Peninsula, which had so long
annoyed its flank and rear, at the falls of the
Powhatan. Here they had erected a rude
fortification
,
composed of fallen trees, having an
entrenchment
surrounding it, with the excavated
earth thrown up as an embankment. This was
situated upon an eminence commanding the more
even ground on each side of a small stream, which
ran nearly at right angles with, and fell into the
river below the falls. The army of the Colonists
arrived within sight of the Indian fires, just after
the sun had sunk behind the horizon. General
Bacon's plantation
[3]
[3]
Historical.
was situated but a short
distance
from the very spot on which the savages
had erected their fort, and consequently he was
well acquainted with the ground. After halting
a short time to examine the position of the enemy,
he marched his troops to the open plain beneath
their strong hold, in perfect silence. Here they
bivouacked for the night, with the intention of
storming the intrenchments at the first dawning
of the morrow. Every thing was noiselessly put
in readiness for this final struggle for supremacy
between the whites and the Aborigines. The
latter
had collected in overwhelming numbers, and
seemed determined to make a desperate effort to
regain their lost footing in the land of their fathers,
while the former, having daily improved in
discipline
,
were in high health, buoyant with the
youthful hope and courage, and impatient for the
dawn, that they might strike a blow at once, to
answer the high expectations of their friends at
home, and terminate the war. Little did they
imagine that an army of those very countrymen
was treading in their footsteps, under the
command
of Sir William Berkley, with the avowed
purpose of meting to them that chastisement which
they were so impatient to bestow upon the enemy
before them.
Their commander was not long left in ignorance
upon this point, however, for scarcely had the
columns made their arrangements for the night
along each side of the small stream, before a
courier from the capital was brought into his
quarters, by one of the sentinels stationed upon
the outskirts of the encampment. He was the
bearer of a proclamation, signed by Sir William
Berkley as Governor of his Majesty's Colony in
Virginia, in which Bacon and his followers were
denounced as traitors and rebels, and commanded
forthwith to lay down their arms and return to
their allegiance, under pain of death, and
confiscation
of their property. The surprise and
indignation
occasioned by this singular document had not
subsided, when another messenger was dragged
into the presence of the commander in chief. It
was a negro, trembling from head to foot with
visible terror at the very uncivil treatment which
he had received, and more, perhaps, at the warlike
preparations around, and the glaring effects of the
Indian fires on the hill. All attempts to gain
an intelligible account of his mission proved for
a length of time, utterly unavailing, until Bacon,
recognising something of old acquaintance in his
features, dismissed his attendants. He then quickly
disclosed, in his mongrel dialect, that he had been
ordered to deliver a letter into the general's own
hands, and when no person was present. A greasy
and rumpled document was then drawn from his
pouch, which, notwithstanding its hard treatment,
and discoloured exterior, Bacon instantly
recognised
as the writing of Harriet Harrison. The date
was rather more remote than seemed necessary for
its regular transmission to its present destination,
which the sable messenger explained by stating
that he had been some days dodging in the
footsteps
of the army, but that as often as he approached
it he had been frightened back again by the flying
hordes of savages, hanging upon their skirts. If
Bacon felt disposed to indulge in merriment at the
ludicrous detail of poor Pompey, the contents of
the note, which he now began to decipher by the
light of a lamp, speedily restored his gravity.
Harriet briefly related to him the nature of the
conversation she had held with Sir William
Berkley
at his own house, and the treatment which
Virginia suffered at his hands; she concluded by
stating the preparations then making in
Jamestown
by the Governor and his party, to pursue and
capture, or cut them to pieces. This information
was truly startling to the youthful general; that
concerning Virginia was most moving; but the
imminent peril of those gallant spirits entrusted to
his command required his immediate attention.
He despatched a chosen mounted band on the
instant, to scout along the late route of his army,
far enough to ascertain whether that under the
command of Sir William was within such a
distance
,
as to enable him to interrupt the
contemplated
attack upon the savages at the dawning of
the coming day.
Bacon's character was eminently prompt and
decisive. He determined, should such be the
case, to commence the attack upon the instant he
should receive such information.
Having provided for the safety and
accommodation
of Pompey, and ordered the courier of the
Governor into close but respectful keeping, he
sallied out along the outposts, to examine the scene
of future operations. The stars twinkled
brilliantly
in the heavens around the horizon, but the
glaring light of the savage fires upon the hill threw
the mellowed rays of the heavenly orbs into dim
contrast immediately round the two camps. As
he walked along the margin of the little stream,
Vol. II. 11
upon the borders of which his own troops were
stationed, toward the river, the night-scene
presented
to his view was reviving and exciting to his
imagination. The ascending columns of fire upon
the hill reflected the trees and other objects upon
its brow in gigantic shadows over the plain
beneath
.
The bright red light fell upon the broad
sheet of water below the falls, in long horizontal
rays, stretching far away over its shining surface
toward the opposite shore. The island in the
middle of the stream, a little higher up than the
point at which he stood, was clothed in verdant
impenetrable shrubberythe darkness gathered
around its shores more palpable from the contrast
of the neighbouring fires. The roar of the falls fell
monotonously upon his ear, ever and anon
interrupted
by the sharp shrill whoop of some
overjoyous
savage, engaged in orgies within the fort
surmounting the hill. As he pensively stood upon
the banks of the Powhatan, and surveyed the
illuminated scene immediately around, and the
darker shadows of the hills stretching away in the
distance and skirting the margin of the river, the
shining waves beneath his feet, and the dusky
outlines
of the rocks and islands beyond, it little
entered
his imagination that upon that romantic spot, in
future time, there should spring up a noble citythe
capital of an empire statethat the natural lawns
upon which he stood, would be exchanged for
docks and quaysthat the hills on his right hand
(which to a scholar might, even then, have recall
ed the Acropolis) should support classic colonnades,
and spires pointing to the clouds; and that the
diminutive stream upon the banks of which his
troops were bivouacked, should receive, from the
sanguinary battle in which he was about to engage,
a name to outlive the very monuments of his
generation
.
[4]
[4]
The little rivulet skirting the south eastern end of Richmond is
called Bloody Run to this day.
Without these deeply interesting
associations
,
however, the scene in its natural and
unreclaimed
features was eminently captivating and
romantic. No site in the country abounded more
with bold and enchanting objects. On the one
hand were the picturesque hills,
On one of these the present capital of Virginia stands.
commanding a
prospect seldom equalled, never surpassed, of
landscape
varied with woodland, dell and meadow,
through which the shining waters of the Powhatan
were now visible, glowing like a sheet of fire, and
now lost in the shadows of the towering forests, as
it held its devious course beyond the reach of the
reflected fires in the back ground.
Our hero might have stood gazing upon this
enchanting
scene until the sound of the reveill in
the morning had roused him from his revery, had
not his quick eye caught a glimpse of moving lights
within the Indian encampment. With hurried
steps he retraced his way through the line of
sentinels
,
and issued immediate orders for his
subordinates
in command to assemble in military
council
.
He was satisfied in his own mind, as he
walked
up the stream, that some unusual occurrence
had taken place within the palisade of the Indians
perhaps the presence of his own stationary
columns
,
as they stood in their dark irowning
outlines
,
had been discovered by the ever cunning and
watchful enemy. He had more than once stood
in wonder at the apparent absence of their usual
stratagems and devices. He supposed, however,
that, trusting to their immense superiority of
numbers
,
and the protection of their breastworks,
they had resolved to risk an engagement, in which
courage and strength alone should be the
implements
of victory.
The council of war had scarcely assembled,
before they were astounded with the report of
musketry in answer to the usual accompaniments
of a savage sortie, in the most remote direction
of the camp. General Bacon issued his orders
promptly and decisively. The columns whose
rear had been surprised by a sortie from the
enemy
,
were, by a prompt movement, instantly
wheeled into line, changing their front so as to
face the assailants, while the mounted Cavaliers,
under the command of young Harrison, fiercely
attacked them in flank. The desperate band of
warriors were speedily driven within their
breastworks
.
It was doubtless only their intention to
harass the outskirts of the army, and then, by
retreating, draw their pursuers within reach of
the ambuscade stationed behind the breastwork.
They were pursued by the mounted troops, who
had no sooner driven them within the palisade,
than they in their turn suddenly wheeled and
retreated upon the main body.
These sallies were kept up through the first
watches of the night, with so much perseverance
on the part of the enemy, and so much annoyance
to the ardent and impatient troops of the patriot
army, that General Bacon determined to give way
to their martial ardour, and at once storm the
strong hold of the enemy.
The plan of battle in this straight-forward mode
of warfare was simple in the extreme. Seldom
had the Aborigines given their white enemies a
chance of testing the relative valour of the two
races; and protected as they were even now by a
formidable breastwork, General Bacon did not
hesitate as to the propriety of trusting to the
discipline
and skill of his soldiers, and the immense
superiority of their arms, against the greater
numbers
and defensive preparations of the enemy.
The fires within the palisade were apparently
flickering upon their dying embers, and an
unsteady
flash, gleaming at intervals, was the only
light shed over the contemplated battle-ground.
A profound quiet reigned within the camp of
the enemy, indicative to the mind of Bacon of
some new treachery or savage scheme. Having
warned his officers against these, he despatched
mounted scouting parties to hover round both
camps, and took every other human precaution
11*
against surprise; orders were now issued
preparatory
to a general attack upon the enemy's
entrenchments
.
By a prompt evolution, his battalions of foot
were wheeled into a solid column of attack on
the northern side of the stream, while the
mounted
Cavaliers were stationed as a reserve on the
right. The former were marched in compact
order, directly up the face of the hill, not a
trumpet
or a drum disturbing the silence of the
funeral-like
procession. The various colours of their
plumes, as they waved in the night breeze, and
the occasional glitter of burnished arms, as a flash
of light fell athwart the solid phalanx from the
flickering fires above, presented one of the most
striking scenes imaginable.
General Bacon assumed the immediate
command
of his columns in person. He sat upon his
impatient charger on the right wing, and
examined
the ominous appearance of the enemy's camp
with intense interest. Not a warrior's head was
to be seen above the breastwork as they
approached
.
All was silent, gloomy, and portentous; not
a sound was heard, save the measured tramp of
his own troops, as they moved through the bushes.
Once indeed he thought he heard the wild shrill
scream of a female, very different in its intonations
from the harsh voice of the savage squaw. But so
many unearthly sights and sounds had haunted
both his sleeping and waking hours of late, that
he drove the impression from his mind, to rest
with hundreds of others of like import.
When the front lines had arrived within some
forty yards of the dark and frowning breastwork,
a sudden and momentary check was given to their
farther progress. A rushing sound, as of the
flight of many birds, and the clatter of Indian
arrows against their arms and persons,
simultaneously
struck upon their senses, followed by the
fall of many soldiers, and the short nvoluntary
exclamations of pain, which, from the impulse of
the moment, escaped the unfortunate individuals.
Trumpets and drums instantaneously broke the
stillness of the march. Their martial notes
reverberated
over the surrounding solitudes in
enlivening
peals. The ill-omened birds of night
flapped their wings, and swooped through the
unsteady lights of the scene in utter dismay at
this untimely invasion of their prescriptive
dominions
.
These were quickly followed by a discharge
of musketry, poured into the formidable palisade.
It was scarcely discharged, however, before Bacon
discovered the utter uselessness of such a waste of
ammunition. He saw that the breastwork was so
constructed, that, while it admitted of the
discharge
of missiles from within, it afforded a secure
protection to its occupants against the. musketry of
their assailants. In the mean time his soldiers
were exposed to the murderous discharges of
poisoned arrows.
In this emergency no time was to be lost;
placing himself, therefore, at the head of his
troops, he ordered the walls to be torn down.
These, as before related, were composed of large
trees piled one upon another, with their green
boughs still protruding in many places over the
shallow
intrenchment, and the earth excavated from the
latter thrown up on the outside agaist a rude
wicker work of fine bushes, filling up the
interstices
of the trees. Trumpets sounded the charge,
and the columns moved at a quick pace to the onset.
Still not a savage head was seen until they had
arrived at the very borders of the intrenchment.
Here some two hundred of the stoutest and
ablest bodied of his soldiers were marched up to
the projecting limbs of the largest tree, forming
the basis of the breastwork. Bacon saw at a
glance that if he could manage to seize hold of
these projecting arms and turn the tree across the
fosse, it would at once open the way for his
mounted troops, and perhaps carry with it some
forty or fifty feet of the palisade, and thereby
bring the opposing armies face to face. They
had already seized the projecting limbs, and were
shaking the frail protection of the savages to its
very foundations, when simultaneously a
thousand
lights gleamed over forest, hill, and dale
A thousand voices united their shrill clamours in
one deafening yell of savage ferocity. The troops
engaged in tearing down the breastwork
instinctively
loosed their hold, and flew to their arms,
as they threw their eyes upward to the spot
whence these blinding lights and deafening noises
came. It was but the work of an instant, for
little more time were they permitted to
examine
,they
were called upon to act, and that
vigorously, for their own preservation. In a
single instant, and apparently at a given signal,
the whole of the rude terrace surmounting the
fortification literally swarmed with painted
warriors
,
each bearing in his left hand a pine torch,
and in the other, a tomahawk, a war-club, or a
battle-axe.
[5]
[5]
These were made of stones ground into the shape of our axe,
with a groove round the centre for a handle made of withe.
They sprang from their
commanding
position into the midst of their assailants, and
scattered themselves in every direction through
that part of the army already advanced to the
breastwork.
Human ingenuity could not have devised a
mode of warfare better calculated to suit their
numbers, position, time, courage, and limited
means of resistance. It at once rendered the
mounted troops uselessprevented the colonists
from using their fire-arms, because those
immediately
engaged were at too close quarters, while
those at a greater distance were as likely to kill
friends as enemies. The savages dealt their
murderous blows with wonderous rapidity and
precision, and though the hardy planters in the
front ranks turned upon them with the butt ends
of their muskets, the savages had evidently the
advantage. The blazing fagots were often thrust
into the very faces of their opponents, and while
writhing under the confusion and agony of the
fire and smoke, they were stricken down like
helpless beasts.
Bacon saw the imminent peril of his troops,
and though he was at first astounded by the
rapidity
and daring courage with which the plan
was executed, he did not despair, nor yet sit
listlessly
upon his horse to see his friends and
countrymen
slaughtered. He saw at a glance too that
only the front columns were engagedthat a part
of these must now necessarily fall, but he
determined
at the same time, that their deaths should
be dearly avenged, and his remaining troops
brought off victorious. He immediately placed
himself between the forces already engaged and
those rushing to the rescue. The latter he wheeled
into line immediately in front of his mounted
reserve
,
thereby changing their front to the flank of
the contending parties, while their own right wing
rested upon the top of the hill, and the left on the
little stream already mentioned. Having
completed
this evolution to his satisfaction, the mounted
Cavaliers were brought round to the position just
occupied by the foot, so that they immediately
faced the struggling combatants, and the latter
were ordered to give way. The retreat was
sounded from the brazen mouths of the trumpets
over their heads, and Bacon in person and his
mounted aids, rode furiously and recklessly among
them, crying for them to fall back toward the line
stationed on the right.
These various movements were but the work of
a few moments. Meantime the painted and
ghastly
warriors, rendered still more horrible by the
flaring lights which they bore in their hands, and
by the reeking instruments of death which they
swung over their head with such unerring precision,
were pouring over the walls upon the devoted
band in countless hordes. So intently were they
engaged, that the evolutions of their enemies had
entirely escaped their attention; and indeed the
Colonists themselves, who were fighting hand to
hand with the savages, had not observed the
movement
,
until the voices of their commanders urged
them to fall back upon the newly formed line. As
Bacon had calculated, no sooner were the engaged
troops made to understand the orders, and induced
to recede, than a partial separation was effected,
which was fatal to the Aboriginals. The
retreating
Colonists were almost immediately under the
protection of the line already braced in solid
column, and standing to the charge
[6]
[6]
The bayonet was just then coming into use, but was inserted
into a round piece of wood, which was thrust into the muzzle of
the musket.
ready for the
expected pursuers. A company of the mounted
Cavaliers was broken up into squads, and these
were actively engaged in hewing down the
pursuers
,
or cutting off their retreat to the protection
of the fort. In a short time a complete line of
separation
was formed between the two armies, save
where, here and there, two athletic men of the
opposite
races, both having lost their arms in the
contest
,
struggled in the death gripe. Here an iron
handed mechanist of the city clenched a warrior's
throatthe eyes of the victim protruding
frightfully
from his head in the glaring light, and his
tongue hanging from his mouth like that of a rabid
animal, until he fell as a lump of clay among the
hundreds of both parties who had gone before.
There a grim warrior struggled with another,
making desperate efforts to reach his knife, which
the soldier as constantly struggled to prevent.
Yonder among the heaps of slain, lay two of the
differing races, fallen to the earth in a mutual but
deadly clasp, each holding the other by the throat,
until the struggle became one of mere endurance,
and, strange to say, the white man generally
conquered
.
While, however, these desperate personal
struggles
were occurring, the tide of battle was fast
turning against the most numerous party. It was
with the greatest difficulty that Bacon could restrain
the ardour and impetuosity of the troops stationed
in line for the protection of the devoted corps
which had led the van, the straggling members of
which were momentarily retreating behind the
solid bulwark of their countrymen's pikes and
bayonets. But no sooner was this duty of
humanity
performed, and a complete line of
demarcation
distinctly drawn, than all restraints were
removed
.
A volley of musketry was poured among
the scattering savages along the face of the hill, in
order to convince them that hereafter they would be
kept at a respectful distance. A simultaneous
movement of horse and foot now swept the brow
of the hill; the horse charged immediately in front
of the palisade, while the infantry drove in the
extended line of savages at the point of the
bayonet
.
The most inextricable confusion ensued in the
ranks of the red warriors. While the cavalry cut
them down on one hand, and the bayonets of the
infantry transfixed them on the other, hundreds
were tumbling over hundreds as they
tumultuously
leaped over the palisade. Some hung by
the projecting bushesothers fell upon the terrace,
and were cast down and trodden under foot by
their companions; while multitudes were cut to
pieces in making the attempt. In a short time the
open field was left in complete possession of the
whitesthe brow of the hill was literally covered
with the wounded and the slain, both of white and
red. Yet the battle was not ended; hundreds upon
hundreds had escaped within the fort. The savage
force amounted at the commencement to something
like three thousand warriors of various tribes, and
that of the Colonists to about one thousand.
[7]
[7]
Burke says 600.
Bacon
earnestly desired to spare the effusion of
human
blood, and hazardous as the Indians were as
neighbours, either professing friendship or enmity,
he resolved to send them a flag of truce and
propose
a permanent peace upon condition of their
Vol. II. 12
abandoning the Peninsula for ever. He knew that
they understood the sacred rights and privileges of
that peaceful banner, for it had already been
recognised
among some of their own tribes.
Accordingly
a young and promising officer was thrust
up to the top of the palisade. He waved his flag
and laid his hand upon his heart in token of
friendship
,
and grounded his sword in order to convince
them that he came upon a peaceful errand, but
instead
of sending out their interpreter or prophet,
he was treacherously murdered by a tomahawk
thrown some twenty yards by the hand of a
warrior
,
and buried in his brain. All hopes of peace
were now abandoned, and Bacon determined to
complete the victory which he had commenced,
and won thus far at the expense of so many valued
lives.
Orders were again issued for tearing down the
palisade, while a chosen band of prompt and
expert
marksmen were stationed at the distance of
some thirty yards, to shoot down the savages as
they should show their heads above the breastwork
Instead of the infantry being stationed to protect
the miners as before, the cavalry formed a column
flanking the marksmen, so that they could at a
moment's warning, rush in between the
descending
hordes and the corps engaged in pulling down
the barricade.
Again the trees composing the palisade were
seized by the projecting limbs, and a sudden
wrench brought the earth piled against its outer
side tumbling into the ditch beneath, and shook
the whole fabric to its foundation. Again an
ominous
and inexplicable silence prevailed within
the enclosure, which was the more remarkable,
as there was left no known method of escape, and
by their own treachery to the officer who had
borne the flag of truce, they were reduced to the
alternative of dying in their ditches or desperately
cutting their way through the solid phalanx which
enclosed them on every side. Hitherto the
marksmen
stationed in front for the purpose of clearing
the terrace of the savages, as they should mount
the breastwork from the inside, had little to do.
At length a group of savages displayed their
painted
faces above the barrier, apparently
endeavouring
to drag some unwieldy burden to the top of
the works. They were instantly shot down, but
their places were as speedily supplied by others.
A faint but piercing shriek rent the air, which
promptly arrested the attention of Bacon, Dudley,
and young Harrison, who sat upon their horses
superintending the operations of the miners, and
holding an occasional discourse among themselves.
The voice came evidently from a female, and
reminded
Bacon that he had once before during the
night heard a like sound from the same direction.
He waved his sword to the marksmen stationed
on his left, to withhold their fire, while his own
attention and that of his two associates were
intently
rivetted to the occupation of the group
ascending
the wall from the other side. At this
moment the large tree which the troops in front
had been some time shaking loose, came crashing
over upon its limbs, and bringing with it those
which had been piled above, thus exposing to
view the interior of the fort, but not yet affording
an uninterrupted passage for the besiegers. The
battalions of foot, however, were tumultuously
rushing toward the breach, reckless of the
interposing
branches and trunks of the prostrate trees, when
Bacon, in a voice of thunder commanded them to
halt! The very moment the fort gave way a sight
was revealed to his eyes, and those of his two
comrades, which made the hair rise on end upon
their heads, and the blood in their veins run cold
with horror. The Indians, who had so long
struggled to ascend the fort some twenty or thirty
yards from the breach, had at length succeeded,
bearing one of the objects which so powerfully
arrested the attention of the officers on horseback.
Two grim warriors supported between them the
body of a woman of the European race, while a
third stood behind her, on the top of the palisade
with uplifted tomahawk. With one hand he held
the weapon suspended over the head of the
drooping
victim, while with the other, he pointed to
the neighbouring breach in the breastwork, with
a look and gesture that seemed to say, advance,
and her fate is sealed! Although the light from
the smouldering fires was dim and unsteady, enough
was caught of the outlines of this figure to thrill to
the very heart-strings of the three spectators; she
was upheld on either side by the mere strength
of her guardsher feet seemed to have sunk from
under herbut her head was erect and turning
with wonderful rapidity from side to side, as she
gazed with wild and glaring eyes upon the scene
around her. Her fair silken tresses fell
unrestrained
upon her shoulders or were blown about
in fluttering streams, as the unsteady light fell
now in broad masses, and then in dim and
shadowy
rays. Her dress was white, and fell in
ample
folds around all that was left of a once
symmetrical
figure. Her features were ashy pale and
attenuated to the last degree of human
wretchedness
,
her eye shot forth the wild flashes of a
frenzied
mind. She was entirely unconscious of her
danger, and though she seemed to examine the
wild scene around, it was not with fear and
trembling
.
A sickly smile played upon her death-like
features, as if she rather took pleasure than suffered
pain in these unusual sights, or saw embodied
before
her in palpable form somewhat of the fleeting
phantasmagoria which had so long eluded her senses,
yet she was speechlessand so were the late
combatants
.
A profound and solemn silence prevailed
throughout
the ranks of both parties. The fate of battle,
or the life of an individual, was suspended upon
the results of the moment. It was soon interrupted,
wildly, fearfully interrupted! The threatened
victim
burst into a convulsion of frantic laughter, the
wild unguided tones of a voice once rich and
12*
musical, were borne along the still night air, and
resounded through the dark forest like some
unearthly
mockery of human merriment. As if a
thunderbolt from heaven had instantaneously
stricken her dumb she ceased. The sounds of
her own voice startled and astonished her;
perhaps
some dim rememberance of its former tones,
as it rose and fell upon the air, floated darkly
through her mind. The grim old warriors who
supported her, were impressed with awe and fear,
and the very executioner was almost overcome
with his native superstitious reverence. The
events we have just described occupied but a few
moments of time,far less than we have taken
to describe them. At this juncture, and while
the three stern Indians maintained their posts,
Wyanokee sprang upon the terrace, struck the
tomahawk from the hands of the ready
executioner
pushed
him backward over the palisade,
and threw herself recklessly upon the unfortunate
lady, encircling her with her arms. At the
same instant her two astounded countrymen fell
lifeless from the terrace, pierced to the heart by
the unerring balls of the sharp shooters.
The Colonial army now broke tumultuously into
the fort. Here another threatened victim had
been held as a suspended pledge over their fires, for
the safety of this their last strong hold, but so
intense
had been the interest excited in behalf of the
unfortunate Mrs. Fairfax, that little attention was
bestowed upon him. It was none other than
Brian O'Reily. When the breach was made in
the fort, he was discovered in the centre of the
area, tied fast to a stake driven into the ground. A
quantity of resinous pine wood was built high up
around his body, and half a dozen torch-bearers
stood ready to apply the flame. The report of the
muskets had no sooner announced the death of their
comrades on the wall, than this pile was fired in a
a hundred places. Already the victim began to
writhe as the intolerable heat scorched his flesh,
and the smoke rushed into his eyes and throat. As
the soldiers entered through the breach with
Dudley
,
who had dismounted, at their head, he rushed
toward the suffering victim, and, assisted by his
followers
,
hurled the burning brands upon the heads
of those who kindled them.
Meanwhile Bacon had also dismounted. He
saw that the contest would now be short, and
giving
his orders to Dudley, he leaped upon the
palisade
where Wyanokee was vainly endeavouring to
support and restrain his former patroness, who
had repeatedly and fruitlessly endeavoured to stand
erect, and as often had fallen back into the arms of
the Indian maiden. As Bacon approached, his whole
soul agitated with deep and thrilling emotions, she
was sitting upon the wall, forcing herself farther
and farther back, like a frighted infant, into the
arms of her protectress. Her eyes started wildly
upon the approaching youth, and the lids fell not
over the painfully distended orbs. She did not
recognise him, even when he approached within a
few paces and kindly and soothingly addressed
her. At one moment she seemed about to make
some reply, but the half formed words died upon
her lipsthey moved as though she held the
desired
discourse, but no sound was audible. The
wild noise and confusion of the onset, breaking
upon her ears, she started up and cried Hah!
see you not that the king's troops put those of the
commonwealth to the sword? Behold his giant
form weltering in gore! 'Tis gone! It was not
he! No, no; I saw not the bloody hand. It was
merely one of these puppet warriors dressed out to
frighten babes. He lives! did he not tell me so,
with his own lips? Do the dead tell the
living
lies? That were a trick of the devil
indeed
.
Again she burst into a horrible and
appalling
laugh, fell back into the arms of Wyanokee,
and her mortal pains and sorrows were for ever
ended.
The long-disputed contest was now drawing to
a close; the Indians fought desperately, as long as
there was a hope left of repulsing the troops which
rushed in at the breach, burning with ardour and
roused to indignation by their wanton cruelties;
but the superior arms and skill of the Colonists
rendered the contest in a short time utterly
desperate
on the part of the besieged. When farther
resistance was put out of their power, by the
besiegers
closing in upon them on every side, and
thus confining their exertions within a narrow
space in the centre of the fort, the stern warriors
threw away their tomahawks and war-clubs, and
fell prostrate on their faces. It was a moving sight
to behold these hardy veterans of a hundred
battles
,
gradually encompassed by a more skilful and
powerful enemy, until they were forced to
surrender
this last foothold upon the land of their fathers.
Their prostrate attitude was by no means intended
to express an abject petition for mercy; it was the
custom established by their people, and its impulse
was utter desperation. They neither desired nor
expected quarter, but threw themselves upon the
earth, to signify their willingness to meet the
tortures
of their enemies. When placed under the
vigilance of the troops appointed to guard them
until dawn, they sat like statues, not a muscle or
feature expressing emotion of any kind.
Bacon stood over the body of his late kind and
unfortunate patroness, as still and motionless as
his own prisoners, contemplating the sad change
which a few short days had made upon her mild
and benignant features, until reminded by Dudley
that he had other duties to perform. The latter
approached and informed him that the garrison
had surrendered. He heeded him not. He
repeated
his information, and touched the general
upon the shoulder. Bacon started wildly for an
instant, but seeing who spoke, a meaningless
smile flitted across his features while he answered,
True, true, Dudley, I will attend you in a
moment
;
and was about to relapse into his former
mood, but rousing himself, he issued orders for
pitching his own marque, and then directed that
the dead body of Mrs. Fairfax should be borne
thither and deposited under its shelter with all due
respect. Till now, Wyanokee had sat near the
cold and lifeless form. Not a tear was shed nor
any other indication given that she had lost a
friend, esteemed by her one of the first of the earth.
There was, perhaps, just a perceptible expression
of wildness and mystery in her steady and
abstracted
gaze on vacancy, as if in thought she was
following the departed spirit to the verdant forests
and blossoming meadows of the happy
hunting-ground
beyond the sky. It is true that she had
been somewhat instructed in the doctrines of our
religion, but he has made little progress in the
study of mankind who does not know that the
peculiar
opinionsthe forms of worship, whether of
superstition or religion, which have been infused
into the mind in the tender years of infancy, will
ever after give a tinge to the views of the
recipient
.
But Wyanokee had by no means renounced
the doctrines of her father's worship, and however
much her mind may have been worked upon while
under the influence of the whites, and of the
imposing
form and ceremonies of the Established
Church, since her abjuration of their friendship,
she had imperceptibly lapsed into most of her
aboriginal notions.
When the body of Mrs. Fairfax was laid out
under the marque of the commander in chief, and
a line of sentinels was established around its limits,
Wyanokee was the sole living tenant of the
apartment
.
She sat by the corpse, in precisely the
same state which we have before described.
In a very short time from that in which Dudley
announced the termination of the conflict to his
commanding officer, profound quietness reigned
over the fort and brow of the hill, so lately the
scene of bloodshed and strife, save where it was
disturbed by the movements of those engaged in
burying the dead, and rescuing the wounded who
lay suffering under the weight of their dead
comrades
.
Never had such a battle been fought in Virginia,
either as regarded the number of Indians engaged,
the consequences depending on the result, or the
sanguinary nature of the conflict itself. It was
the last struggle for supremacy between the whites
and the Indians in the Peninsula.
CHAPTER VIII.
General Bacon
apprehending that the rising
sun might disclose to view the approaching
columns of the army under Sir William Berkley,
had ordered the dismantled fort to be refitted in
such a manner as to afford some protection to his
exhausted troops. The trees were again brought
round to their former position, and the limbs by
which themselves had gained entrance lopped off.
The sun, however, rose above the horizon
without
betraying any sign, either of the expected
army, or of the mounted scouts whom he had
sent out just before the battle. This latter
circumstance
gave him not a little uneasiness, as he could
account for their protracted absence in no other
way than by supposing that they had fallen into
Sir William's hands.
Most of the troops were yet indulging in repose,
after the extraordinary fatigues of the night, and
were cheerfully indulged by their officers, in the
hope that they would rise with renewed ardour
and courage for the expected attack.
At about ten o'clock in the morning, the troops
having been roused from their slumbers, and
partaken
of a hasty breakfast, the sentinel pacing
to and fro upon the top of the walls, announced
the approach of the expected foe. Bacon and his
staff quickly mounted the breastwork to examine
the number and appointments of his confident
enemy; but to his great joy and relief, the
approaching
troops proved to be his own missing
scouts. He mounted his charger and galloped
over the intervening ground in order to learn
the cause of their strange absence; so impatient
was he, not only on that score, but likewise to
learn tidings from his pursuers. He very soon
met the advancing horsemen, who, upon
perceiving
their general, halted in the road. The
information
communicated by the commander of the
party was not less surprising to Bacon than was
the account of the battle to the officer, who had
been absent from its dangers and its glories. The
latter stated, that after having ridden about twenty
miles on the previous night, they suddenly came
upon the encampment of Sir William's army, but
having discovered their fires in sufficient time,
had avoided their pickets. They scouted round
his camp for a considerable length of time,
endeavouring
to learn something of his intended
movementsthe number of his soldiers, and their
disposition toward themselves, but found no
means of gaining information. At length they
narrowly escaped being discovered and
intercepted
by a foraging party, and having discovered
that the troopers composing it, had come last from
the house of a planter, living not far from the en
Vol. II. 13
campment, they resolved to present themselves
before him, candidly explain their business, and
throw themselves upon his patriotism for any
information which he might possess. They did
so, and were fortunate enough to find that the
planter was not only able, but willing to give
them important information, and was anxious for
the success of Bacon's expeditionhis own son
being
engaged in it. The amount of his information
in few words, was, that Sir William Berkley had
that very evening received an express from
Jamestown
,
urgently summoning him back to the
capital
,
with all his forces. That two influential
citizens
residing in the counties south of Jamestown,
by name Walklate and Ingraham,
[8]
[8]
Historical.
having heard of
his expedition to cut off the return of General Bacon
and his army, had immediately raised a force of
horse and foot scarcely inferior to his own, and were
marching upon the capital. Nor was this all the
unfavourable news communicated by the express:
it farther stated that the House of Burgesses, then
in session, (contrary to the promise of Sir William
to dissolve it,) were engaged upon some
resolutions
,
very injurious to the reputation and farther
influence of the Governor, and that they had
already
approved of the proceedings of General
Bacon
,
and resolved to require the Governor to sign
his commission as commander in chief of the
colonial forces, besides having transmitted to the
ministry at home, testimonials of his patriotism,
talents, and bravery.
The foraging party from the army of Sir
William
,
had farther informed the planter, that it was
the intention of his excellency to break up his
camp by dawn of day, and return by forced
marches, to the protection of the capital.
At this juncture, the Colony of Virginia
presented
the singular spectacle of three distinct and
independent
armies, assembled at one time. One
at the falls, commanded by Baconanother in
the Peninsula, commanded by Sir William
Berkley
,
and the third in the south, commanded by
Generals Ingraham and Walklate. The first and
last were nothing more than disciplined assemblages
of volunteers from among the people, while that
under the command of the Governor in person,
was composed in part of veteran regular troops,
and partly of loyal subjects, called together by the
urgent appeals of him who had so long been the
honoured organ of his majesty's authority in the
colony.
When General Bacon returned to the camp,
and had assembled his associates in command, and
communicated to them the foregoing particulars,
he also announced to them his intention of leaving
the temporary command of the army with his next
in rank, and repairing in person immediately to
the capital.
His views having met the approbation of the
council of officers, the sloop which had brought
up the marine part of the expedition was promptly
put in readiness, and forty chosen men embarked
for his escort.
[9]
[9]
Historical.
His unfortunate valet and devoted adherent,
Brian O'Reily, although much enfeebled by long
confinement and want of wholesome food, was,
at his own earnest request, added to the number.
So urgent had been the various claims upon the
time of General Bacon, that he had not yet heard
Brian's account of his sufferings and privations.
Before embarking he issued the strictest orders
for the safety, comfort, and protection of the
numerous
prisoners, and of Wyanokee in particular.
He directed that she should be conveyed in the
same wagon, then preparing for the purpose of
transporting the remains of Mrs. Fairfax to
Jamestown
.
Before taking leave of his comrades in arms, he
entered the marque containing the honoured
remains
.
The sentinel was walking his solitary
rounds of monotonous duty, with solemn aspect.
Strange that the ceremonies attending the laying
out and decently guarding this lifeless body should
more powerfully impress this sturdy soldier than
all the heaps of slain piled into one common grave
during the night.
Bacon entered the marque alone. There sat
the last daughter of the kings of Chickahominy,
in precisely the attitude in which he had seen her
five hours before. She was the sole mourner at
the feet of her whom in life she had most honoured.
He was powerfully affected by the sight of many
little personal ornaments, not worn on the
previous
night, but which had been collected by
Wyanokee and placed conspicuously upon the
corpse. He was struck, too, with the delicate
consideration of the Indian maiden in these native
observances in honour of the dead. Conspicuous
among the things valued by her friend while
living
,
was a small silver clasped pocket bible; it was
spread open upon the neat folds of her white
garments
,
surrounded with a profusion of wild
flowers
,
such as he had often known her to transplant
into her own garden.
But time pressed, and urgent circumstances called
him to the capital; he therefore lifted the covering
(a white handkerchief) from her face, and gazed
for the last time upon those features impressed
upon his heart and memory from infancy.
Almost
involuntarily he drew from his doublet the
diminutive locket, reassured his heart by a
momentary
comparison of the featuresand then forced
himself away and proceeded to the bank of the
river, where the sloop already spread her sails to
the ready breeze.
The prisoners taken at the battle of the Falls,
or of the Bloody Run as it was more frequently
called, were placed in the centre of the army, with
the exception of Wyanokee, and the fort burnt
to the ground, after which the Colonial troops
took up their line of march for the capital.
Toward
13*
this central point three separate armies were
now advancing, while the House of Burgesses were
passing a series of resolutions in which all three
were deeply interested. A more important
juncture
in the affairs of the Colony had never occurred,
and the approach of the various hostile parties
toward
the capital excited the deepest anxiety in all
the reflecting inhabitants of the city.
The courier announcing the successful issue of
Bacon's campaign against the tribes of the
Peninsula
,
which had so long disturbed the peace and
tranquillity of the planters, was received with
general
manifestations of joy and expressions of
gratitude
to the youthful commander of the expedition.
By a resolution of the assembly, the State House
was ordered to be illuminated, and the inhabitants
generally were requested to follow the example.
These, with other voluntary demonstrations of
rejoicing
on the part of the citizens, were about to
be carried into execution, when the vanguard of
Sir William Berkley's army, commanded by the
sturdy old knight in person, arrived at the gates
of the bridge. When he was informed of the
cause of this unusual measure, and of the
resolutions
which had been passed by the House of
Burgesses
,
both in regard to himself and his young
rival in the popular favour, he burst into a most
ungovernable fit of ragethrew his sword into
the river, and swore he would embark for
England
the next morning. He was no sooner
dissuaded
from the rash step, than he resolved upon
an expedient equally inconsiderate. It was
nothing
less than to march his army into the streets of
the city, and thence, with a chosen band of
followers
,
disperse the assembly at the point of the
bayonet
.
It was with the greatest difficulty, and after
long efforts, that his more discreet friends were
enabled to dissuade him from this step likewise,
nor even then until they had compromised the
affair, by agreeing that he should issue a
proclamation
with the same view, and forthwith issue writs
for a new election. Accordingly, having marched
his troops into the heart of the city, and encamped
them immediately round the State House and
public
grounds, he carried his threats into execution.
The dissolution of the assembly was immediately
proclaimed, and writs were issued for the election
of their successors. To such a length had Sir
William Berkley carried his high-handed measures,
from time to time, since his reaccession to the
vice-regal chair, that he imagined the people would
submit to any dictation emanating from so high a
functionary as himselfthat it was only necessary
to make his will and pleasure known to the good
citizens of Jamestown, at once to put an end to all
the demonstrations of joy by which his arrival
was so unwelcomely greeted. He was led into
this error, partly by his own overweening pride,
and partly by the respect which so many years of
unclouded prosperity in the same station had
naturally
engendered in the people. And doubtless
they would have endured much, and did submit
to many oppressions, rather than resist the
authority
of one who had so long held the reins of
government
.
But the true secret of the change in
the character of that government, was in the
erroneous
views conceived by the captious old knight,
during the government of the commonwealth. He
had fallen with his first Royal master and risen
with the secondand thus had come into power
the second time, with all the extravagant notions
of prerogative entertained by his transatlantic
prototype
,
without having derived any wholesome
lessons of experience from the fate of his first
unfortunate
master.
The people heard the proclamation dissolving
the assembly, with murmurs indeed at the spirit
and motive in which it originated, but without
feelings of opposition to the measure, because it
was one which they had themselves demanded
before
his departure. They therefore moodily
acquiesced
,
and even submitted to be bearded by the
foreign mercenaries in their streets and public
walks, but when the Governor, emboldened by
this apparent tameness undertook to issue another
document, proclaiming Bacon, Dudley, Harrison,
Walklate, Ingraham, and their followers, rebels,
the people could submit no longer. The
muttered
thunders of popular discontent burst out into
all the fury of a storm. His officers were forcibly
prevented from reading his proclamations in the
streets, and public placesa general meeting of
the citizens voluntarily assembled at the State
House, surrounded as it was by his soldiers, and
there passed resolutions, condemning his recent
conduct, in the most unmeasured terms. They
also appointed a large committee to wait on him
forthwith, and not only demand the suppression
of the last proclamation, but that he should sign
the commissions, already prepared by the assembly
for the very persons so denounced. After making
these demands of the infatuated old man, they
farther informed him that two expresses were
already
mountedone to be despatched to the army
under Bacon, and the other to that headed by
Ingraham
and Walklate, both of which were
probably
within a short distance of the city. That
besides
these preparations for any extreme measures
to which he might think proper to resort, the
citizens generally were arming themselves, and
even that many members of the late House of
Burgesses, which he had just dissolved, were
taking
up arms, and held themselves in readiness to
assist in disarming and expelling the mercenaries
under his command. Sir William demanded two
hours for deliberation and consultation with his
friends. These were soon assembled, and the
committee withdrew to await the expiration of the
allotted time.
Again the Governor was destined to be
mortified
.
The officers assembled, most of whom had
been with him in his recent expedition, stated that
the popular spirit of revolt and insubordination,
had spread among the soldiery to such an extent
that no dependence could be placed upon them in
case of a rupture with the citizens. In this
emergency
he was compelled to listen to the
admonitions
of the friends, who advised that he should
endeavour to turn the popular current in his
favour
,
by signing the commissions, and withdrawing
the offensive proclamations. To this he was forced
to accede, and accordingly when the committee
of the citizens returned he signed the commissions.
Scarcely had he dismissed them, however, before
he began devising measures to counteract the very
purpose of his act. He ordered a representation
to be immediately drawn up for ministers, in
which the now commissioned officers in question
were represented as traitorsdirected the most
resolute
and trust-worthy of his adherents to embark
for Accomae, whither he resolved to transfer the
seat of Government until the citizens of the
capital
should be taught that respect for his majesty's
representative in which they had shown themselves
so deficient within the last few hours; and
commanded
all the armed ships not engaged in
transporting
his own troops across the bay,
[10]
[10]
See Burke.
(and there
were many of them in the river,) to cruise up the
stream, in order to intercept the sloop conveying
General Bacon and his suite to the city, with strict
orders to bring him dead or alive to Accomac.
Having issued these various orders, and seen them
put in a regular train of execution, he embarked
the same night on board an armed brigantine, with
his own family and suite, not forgetting his
imprisoned
and deeply injured niece.
Meanwhile General Bacon was calmly reclining
upon the deck of his little sloop; it was the second
night from his embarkationthe moon was shining
brightly in the heavens, and the stars sparkled
brilliantly through a hazy but not damp
atmosphere
,
and not a breath of air filled the white sails
as they flapped idly against the mast. The vessel
was drifting slowly toward her place of destination
it is true, but not with a velocity in accordance
with the ardent desires of the passengers. Every
soul on board had retired to rest except himself,
Brian O'Reily, and that part of the crew to which
belonged the duty of the watch. It was the same
night the reader will remember, on which Sir
William Berkley arrived at, and afterward so
suddenly departed, from the capital.
Brian O'Reily was for the first time explaining
to his master the manner in which he came into
the hands of the Indians. Bacon had readily
surmised the whole process, but knowing that
O'Reily must be indulged with the relation at one
time or another, and being unable to sleep in his
present excited state of mind, he had given the
impulse to Brian's garrulity, not inadvertently,
however, by the simple question,
So Brian, you were in pursuit of me when
the Powhatans made you a prisoner?
Ay, by St. Stephen the martyr, and the
twelve Apostles, barrin one iv them that was a
thraitor, I was near bein a martyr myself, only
the bloody nagres had a notion to fatten me, and
that's the rason they kept me tied on me back all
the while, jist as I used to fix the misthress's blind
calf, the saints bless her soul.
Fatten you, Brian, for what?
To ate me, to be sure!
Pshaw, O'Reily, they are not cannibals.
Oh the divil burn my eyes, but I saw thim
roastin babies by the fire, and ating them like
pathriges, widout so much as salt to season them!
You just now told me you were tied in a dark
hole, and fed on parched corn, all the time you
were a prisoner.
Divil a word iv a lie's in that, any way, your
honour, and sure enough I didn't jist see thim
kooking the young ones, but didn't I smell thim
roastin? Sure and Brian O'Reily wouldn't be
after being decaived in the smell of a pig for a
sucking baby. Didn't the divil tempt me wid
that same smell any way? may be he didn't?
Wasn't I starvin myself upon short allowance iv
their murtherin popped corn, and didn't the bloody
nagers roast a baby jist whin me unconscionable
bowels came up into my throat every day,
begging
for muttin and turnips? and didn't they want
to fatten me like the misthress's blind calfme
bowels I mane? and didn't I put thim aff wid a
half score o' parched corns? Oh! if they had
only been stilled into whiskey, may be it wouldn't
iv cured the smotherin I had about the heart.
I suppose, Brian, you were never sober for
such a length of time together in your life before.
Oh! be our Lady you may say thatthere
was jist nothing to ate, and the same to dhrink,
barrin the parched corn, and the babies, and may
be, an oldher sinner for Sundays, by way of a
feast.
You travelled on foot, I suppose, from place
to place, until they concentrated at the falls!
Divil a foot iv mine touched the ghround,
since they pulled me off my horse at yon town of
theirs over the river. I rode on a horse ivery
foot iv the way, your haner, and had one iv the
nagers to attind me; may be he did'nt ride
behint
me on the same baste, and put his arms around
me like a butcher taking a fat wether to the
shambles.
You were in right good case too, when you
fell into the hands of this singular butcher, that
deals in human flesh, according to your account?
Ay was I, but I lost it asier than I got it
by the five crasses, but the sweat run down to me
shoes every time I looked round at the painted
divil sittin on the same baste wid mehis nose
ornamented wid a lead ring like a wild steer.
Sure I thought the ghreat inimy was flyin away
wid me, before I was dacently buried.
What did he say to you, Brian?
Vol. II. 14
Say to me, your haner! By the holy father,
but he addressed none iv his discourse to me.
Maybe he was talkin to the divil that was in him as
big as a sheepdidn't he grunt it all away down
in his pipes like a pig in a passion? Or may be
he was talkin to the horse, for he grunted too, and
one iv thim jist discoursed as well as the t'other,
to my mind.
Could you not tell upon what subject he
spoke, from his gestures or signs.Did he not
point to Jamestown frequently?
Not hehe pointed to the colour iv me hair,
more belikes, and when they gat to you place
where your haner put so many iv thim to slape,
they all gathered round me to see it. They had
their own crowns painted the same colour, and
they wonthered at the beauty iv mine, and faith,
that was the most rasonable thing I saw among
thim, barrin that they brought me the paint-pot,
and wanted me to figure off one iv their beautiful
gourds like Brian O'Reily's. I towld thim it was
a thing out iv all rason, and pulled out some iv
the hair to show thim, and divil burn the bloody
thaives, but they cut it all aff jist for keepsakes
among thim.
They left you a top-knot, I see, however.
Before O'Reily could make a reply, the sailor
on the watch cried out that there was a large ship
bearing down upon them. Bacon sprung upon his
feet, ordered Brian to alarm the soldiers, and
walked
hastily forward. At the first glance, he saw a
crowd of warlike heads, and caught the reflection
of the light upon their arms. A second look at
the strange movements of the vessel, and the
hostile
preparations of those on board served to
convince
him that he was himself the object of their
pursuit. Taking two of the first soldiers who
made their appearance on deck, he silently
entered
the boat swinging from the tafferel of the sloop,
motioned the two soldiers to follow him, and then
ordered the boat to be let down with all silence
and despatch. O'Reily seeing these preparations
as he came on deck from the performance of his
orders, sprung into the boat as one end struck the
water; it was too late, and the circumstances too
urgent for his master to order him backthe frail
bark was pushed off, therefore, with muffled oars,
and as much within the shadow of the
approaching
vessels as their destined course would permit.
Scarcely were they without the protection of these,
before they discovered the yawl of the ship full of
armed men, rapidly gliding into the water, and in
the next moment, they heard musket balls
whistling
over their heads, accompanied by the
momentary
gleam and then the quick report of
fire-arms
.
Seizing an oar himself, and ordering Brian
to follow his example, they pulled with all their
strength for the shore; this once gained, he hoped
that the protection of the forest and the increasing
haziness of the atmosphere settling upon the high
banks of the river, would effectually protect his
retreat. But in spite of their utmost efforts, the
superior power with which the yawl was propelled
through the water was rapidly shortening the
distance
between them. Brian threw off his jerkin,
and strenuously exhorted his master to trust
himself
to the mercy of the waves, though he knew
not the nature of the threatened danger. On this
point, Bacon himself could only conjecture, that
it was some device of his old enemy to get him
secretly into his power, and hence his anxiety to
reach Jamestown at the present juncture. He
knew nothing of the change which had taken
place at the capital in his favour, but he knew his
own power over the populace, and he preferred
being
made prisoner in public, to trusting himself to
the tender mercies of Sir William Berkley. In
spite of all his exertions, and the hopes of reward
held out to the soldiers in case of success, their
boat was cut off from the shore by the pursuers
interposing between it and themselves. He saw
that resistance would be madness, as the boat now
wheeling exactly in front of them contained five
times their number, and would doubtless, in case
of a struggle, be promptly sustained by assistance
from the ship, which was now nearer to them than
their own vessel. His only course, therefore, was
to submit with as much philosophy as he could
muster. He was deeply mortified and chagrined
however, for his presence seemed to him to be
most urgently called for at the capital. These
views were founded upon the information he had
received, now two days old. Could he have known
what had taken place at Jamestown only a few
hours before, and only a few miles distant from
his present position; could he have known that
Sir William Berkley was at that very moment an
adventurer upon the same waters, but a few miles
below, and driven thence by the firmness of the
patriotic citizens who belonged to his own party,
he would doubtless have made a desperate
resistance
.
Perhaps it was more fortunate for all
parties that he was thus ignorant of existing
circumstances
at the capital, for had he fallen at this
juncture, (which was most probable) the fate of
the Republican party in the infant state might
have been very different.
He and his party soon found themselves on board
of the hostile ship, which was commanded by
Capt. Gardiner, an Englishmana devoted
loyalist
and adherent of Sir William Berkley. He was
politely received by that officer, but informed that
he must consider himself a prisoner until he could
exculpate himself before the Governor in person,
at Accomac. Until this moment Bacon had been
partially reconciled to his mishap, trusting to his
known popularity among the people of the city,
which he knew would not be diminished by the
eclat of his Indian victories; but now that he was
informed of the present residence of the
Governor
,
and the destination of the ship, his hopes were
totally prostrated. He began to suspect that
something
14*
was wrong with Sir William at Jamestown,
from his present singular location, and was not a
little uneasy at the secret and unusual measures
he had taken to get him into his power. He
knew the turbulent and impetuous temperament of
the old knight, and how little he was given to
consult right and humanity in too many of his
summary measures of what he chose to call
justice
,
to think that he would hesitate one moment
to summon a court-martial of his own partizans
try, condemn, and execute him and his three
unfortunate followers, if not the more numerous
body, now also prisoners, in the sloop. As he
stood upon deck in the midst of his guard,
weighing
these various aspects of his position, the ship
was silently gliding within view of the lights from
the city. He observed that the captain steered
his course as far from the island as the channel of
the river would permit, which confirmed his
previous suspicions as to the state of popular
feeling
in the capital, and increased his uneasiness as
to the secret designs of the Governor upon himself.
From Captain Gardiner he could gain no
satisfactory
informationhe merely replied to Bacon's
demand for his authority, that Governor Berkley
had commanded him to bring him (Bacon) to
Accomac, and to deliver him dead or alive into
his hands.
When it was too late, Bacon saw the rashness of
the councils which had induced him to abandon
his army, and trust himself among the numerous
ships floating in the river, the commanders of
which were known adherents of his enemies.
The reflections of our hero, as he paced the
quarter deck toward morning, were bitter in the
extreme. He saw all the bright hopes of his
reviving
spirits vanish like a dream, as the vessel
now just emerging from the waters of the
Powhatan
,
and propelled by a fresh morning breeze from
the land, was plunging with every swell of the
buoyant waves into the waters of the Chesapeake,
and receding farther and farther at every plunge
from the objects of his highest and dearest
aspirations
.
That portion of the magnificent bay into which
they were now entering immediately ahead, was
expanded and-lost to the eye on the limitless waves
of the ocean. On the starboard tack, like a black
cloud joining the sea and the sky together, lay
Cape Henry, and on the larboard, still more faintly
pencilled against the horizon, lay Cape Charles.
Between the two, the white bordered waves of the
Atlantic rolled their swelling volumes into the
Chesapeake.
The faint yellow tinge of dawn could just be
discerned, like a moving shadow, now upon the
waves and then upon the hazy clouds, dipping
into their bosom, while hundreds of aquatic birds,
interposed like a black cloud at intervals to
intercept
the view in the distance, or more suddenly
flapped their wings from under the very prow of
the vessel as they swooped along the surface of the
stream and dipped the points of their wings like
a flash of light into the sparkling waters.
A steady breeze was blowing from off the land,
and the white sails of the ship swelled proudly
and the tapering spars bent under its influence, as
she ploughed up the waves foaming and falling in
divided masses before her prow. On any other
occasion than the present, Bacon would have
enjoyed
the prospect on this grandest of all inland
seas, but now his mind was oppressed with gloomy
doubts and forebodings. Every plunge of the
vessel was bearing him more within the grasp of
his relentless foe. But the mishap of his own
personal adventure, every way unfortunate as it
was both for himself and the cause in which he had
engaged, was not that which weighed most
oppressively
upon his mind. Ever since the
discovery
of the miniature contained in the locket,
he had been gradually giving way to his reviving
hopes, and building upon that slender assurance
bright and glorious superstructures of imagination.
He had endured and lived, and fought and
conquered
with that hope, as the polar star to his
otherwise dark and dreary course. Now again
his destinies were almost wrecked by a storm from
a quarter in which he had scarcely cast his eyes.
How could he imagine that Sir William Berkley
would be driven from the capital, by the stern
and independent resistance of the unarmed
citizens
?
How could he know that being thus driven
from it he would yet retain a sufficient naval force
to capture him and his escort upon the very eve
of his triumphal entry into the city? These
were the reflections which made him look with a
feeling of dark misanthropy upon the glorious
beauties of the Chesapeake. His ambition, his
pride, and his conscience were satisfied; but his
love for a bride, already once led to the very steps
of the altar, was again thwarted upon the eve of
what he had supposed and hoped would prove the
final and happy fulfilment of his most ardent hopes.
His feelings toward the devoted and interesting
maiden, who had perilled and suffered so much on
his account, were enthusiastic in the highest
degree
.
She stood toward him not only in the
relation of his betrothed, but his wedded bride;
and the more endearing and captivating she
became
to him as he contemplated her in these
relations
,
the more he cursed in his heart the
hard-hearted
and perverse old man who had been the
cause of all his troubles.
Every chance of escape was intensely examined;
not a word was suffered to fall unheeded from
Captain Gardiner and his subordinates. He noted
carefully the distribution of the prisoners in the
vessel in which he was himself confined, as well as
of those in the sloop following in their wake. He
took careful observations of the most prominent
objects on their routethe state of the tide in the
river which they had just left. He examined the
boatshow they were securedthe equipments
and appearance of the crew on board, and resolved
if he must fall in the midst of his reviving hopes,
to die as became the conqueror of Bloody Run and
the lover of Virginia Fairfax.
CHAPTER IX.
Amid
all his misfortunes and gloomy
anticipations
,
Bacon discovered one bright spot in his
horizon. He had inquired of Captain Gardiner
whether Mr. Beverly had accompanied the
Governor
to Accomac, and was answered in the
affirmative. This was the source of rejoicing,
because he believed that Virginia was yet in
Jamestown. Harriet Harrison's letter had been
perused over and over again, during the first part
of the voyage, and was one cause of that restless
anxiety to escape which we have attempted to
describe.
He chafed the more as his imagination pictured
his rival leading, or rather forcing Virginia to the
altar, while he was thus ignobly detained. But
now having satisfied himself that Beverly was not
left behind, his mind was comparatively at ease on
that score. Nevertheless his desire to escape was
not diminished; the state of parties might change
in the capitalBeverly might return and
perpetrate
his design while he was yet in confinement.
That Sir William Berkley intended more than to
keep him in temporary duress, he could not now
in his cooler moments believehis repinings
were caused by the interruption to his own
cherished
schemes and ardent desires. He had hoped
before
this time, to be in Jamestowna conqueror
the accepted lover of Virginia Fairfax, and to
satisfy the Recluse himself, that he was deceived
as to his birth and parentage. That there was
some mysterious knowledge of Mrs. Fairfax's
history possessed by that strange man, he doubted
not; but he doubted as little that it had led to
error with regard to himself.
The dark shadows of night had already closed
over the broad expanse of waters on whose bosom
our hero was thus far borne without chance of
escape
.
He could discern numerous lights flitting
along the circumscribed horizon, which he
supposed
to be upon the shores of Accomac, from
the dark curtain which skirted along as far as the
eye could reach, between the sky and the water.
He was not left long in doubt upon this point, for
the sailors were busily engaged furling the broad
sheets of canvass and heaving over the anchor.
In a few moments a bright flash illuminated the
darkness around, followed by the booming sound
of a piece of ordnance let off from the ship. This
was answered by another from the shore, and
Bacon perceived the lights which had before
attracted
his attention, moving, as he supposed,
toward
the boat landing, there being no facilities
for running the ship close in upon the land. These
he could perceive now rising and falling with the
swelling and receding waves, and very soon
faintly
distinguished voices in confused murmurs as
they were borne along the water, and lost amidst
the roar of the waves lashing against the sides of
the vessel, and the confused noise and merriment
of the ship's crew.
Captain Gardiner took up his trumpet and
hailed the approaching boat, after which a dead
silence ensued on board, all hands listening
intently
for the expected answer. Hoarse and confused
sounds came sweeping on the wind, as if the
person
answering spoke through his hand instead of
a trumpet, but no distinct words could be made
out. Again the captain hailed, boat ahoy, and
again with the like result. The wind was
unfavourable
for the transmission of sound, and he
gave up the attempt. He had scarcely left the
deck, however, before the boat came riding by on
the buoyant waves, both parties having been
deceived
as to the distance, by their inability to
intercommunicate. The Captain ran eagerly upon
deck, and inquired of those in the boat, whether
the Governor had arrived? The answer was in
the affirmative. Bacon now understood the anxiety
of Captain Gardiner to communicate with the shore.
He learned too, from the dialogue going on, that
the Governor and himself were probably crossing
the bay at the same time.
When it was announced to the boat's crew that
the rebel chief, Bacon, was a prisoner on board, a
loud huzza burst simultaneously from twenty
voices, among which Bacon distinctly recognised
those of Ludwell and Beverly. Bitter indeed
Vol. II. 15
were his unavailing regrets that he had left his
army, and thus fallen a prey to his most violent
enemies. He now remembered, with not less
regret
,
that he had strictly enjoined upon his
temporary
successor, not to march into Jamestown
until he should rejoin the troops. This he saw
would effectually prevent his present situation
from becoming known to his friends, until,
possibly
it would be too late to render him any
assistance
.
The boat very soon returned in order to
ascertain
the Governor's pleasure with regard to his
prisoner, and Bacon waited with the most intense
anxiety for their return. His unavailing regrets
were rapidly forgotten in a fierce and burning
desire
to be confronted with his enemies, alone and
unsupported as he was. His noble mind could
scarcely conceive of that malignity which could
trample upon a solitary and defenceless individual,
placed by accident in the hands of numerous
personal
enemies. He had yet to learn a bitter
lesson
in the study of human nature. His own
impulses
were all high and generous, and he naturally
looked even upon his foes as to some extent
capable
of the like magnanimity. He imagined that
Sir William Berkley, Ludwell, and Beverly
would feel and acknowledge his indignant appeals
to their honour and chivalry. How these
youthful
and sanguine expectations were realized will
be seen in the sequel. The boat soon returned
with orders from Sir William Berkley to detain
the prisoner on board during the night, and to
send him ashore as soon in the morning as it
should be announced by a shot from a piece of
ordnance
,
that the court had assembled. That he was
to be tried by a court-martial had barely entered
his imagination.
At dawn of day a gun from the shore announced
the assembling of the court, and Bacon was brought
upon deck by the orders of the Captain. He
perceived
that the ship's boat was already in the
water
,
supported on each side by larger ones from
the shore, filled with armed soldiers. However
much he may have been surprised by these
prudential
preparations, he was still more surprised,
and more fully began to realize his situation, when
he perceived a man standing ready to secure his
hands in irons. At first sight of this contemplated
indignity, he shrank back instinctively with
something
of the natural feelings of youth, but the
impression
was only momentary; he shook it off
and walked firmly to the smith, near whom stood
Captain Gardiner, and a guard to do his bidding in
case of necessity. As the youthful Chieftain
approached
,
the hardy veteran of the seas was
evidently
embarrassed. He was reluctant to offer
such a needless affront to one of so bold and manly
a bearing. An indistinct apology was commenced,
of which the only parts that Bacon distinguished
or cared to learn was, that the precaution was
taken by the orders of Sir William Berkley. I
doubt it notI doubt it not, sir, he replied;
Do your dutyI am in his power for the
present
,
and must submit with the best grace I can;
but a day of retribution is coming; and even should
I be basely murdered upon these distant shores, as
seems not unlikely from these preparations, and
the tribunal of which I hear they are the
precursors
,
my death will not go unavenged.
His hands were soon confined within the iron
bands, connected by chains some two feet in length,
and then, with the assistance of the Captain and
crew, he was let down into the boat. He was not
long in discovering that the military escort in the
two outer boats was commanded by Mr. Philip
Ludwell. No sign of recognition took place
between
them, notwithstanding they had moved in
the same circles at the Capital before the irruption
of the civil war. Bacon was too much of a soldier
himself, and too well versed in the duties of a
subordinate
to throw any of the blame of his present
condition upon his quondam acquaintance, and
would readily have exchanged the courtesies due
from one gentleman to another, had he not
perceived
a suppressed smile of triumph upon the
countenance of Ludwell as he entered the boat.
Whether the latter viewed him as rebel or
patriot
he felt indignant at his ungentlemanly
conduct
,
and folding his chained arms upon his
manly
chest, took no farther notice of its author.
As they approached the shore, and the mists of
early morning began to break away before the
rising sun, Bacon recognised many landmarks
which had not altogether been unknown to him in
happier days. The house at which Sir William
Berkley now exercised his vice-regal functions,
surrounded by such of the Cavaliers as still
adhered
to his fortunes, became also visible. This
Bacon recognised as the property of the officer in
command of the guard surrounding his own
person
.
The shore was covered with tents, marques
and soldiers, the latter being the English
mercenaries
,
and marshalled for his reception in imposing
array. Two lines were formed from the landing
to the house, between which he was now marched
in the centre of his guard.
When they arrived within the hall he found the
martial tribunal ready assembled for his trial. A
long table was placed in the centre of the room,
upon which lay swords, caps, and feathers. At the
farther end from the entrance sat Sir William
Berkley, as president of the court, and on either
side some eight or ten of his officers, all clad in
the military costume of the day. Their gay
doublets
had been exchanged for buff coats,
surmounted
by the gorget alone, for the vambraces, with
their concomitants, had been abandoned during
the commonwealth. Some of the cavalry and
pikemen, indeed, still wore head and back pieces,
in the king's army,
[11]
[11]
See statues 13 and 14th Charles the 2d.
but the Virginian officers
were generally dressed at that time as we have
described
them.
15*
Among the number of officers now confronting
the prisoner, sat Francis Beverly. He seemed
perfectly calm and collected, and not in the least
aware that there was any impropriety in his
sitting
in judgment upon the prisoner standing at the
foot of the table.
Bacon drew himself up to his utmost height, as
he again folded his arms and ran his indignant eye
over his accusers and judges; as it rested in its
course upon Beverly, a fierce indignation lighted
up its clear hazle outlines, but it was only for an
instanthis glance wandered on over the other
members of the court, while his lip curled in a
settled expression of scorn and contempt. The
old Cavalier at the head of the board rose in
visible
agitationhis eyes flashed fire and his hands
trembled as he took the paper from the scribe and
read the charge against the prisoner.
The merest form of an impartial trial was
indecently
hastened through. Witnesses were not
wanting indeed, and those too, who could testify
to every thing the Governor desired, but no time
had been allowed the prisoner to procure
testimony
in his own behalf, or prepare his defence.
The times were perhaps somewhat out of joint;
but the state of the colony was by no means such
as to require that a prominent citizen, standing
high in the affection of his countrymen, should be
deprived of those inestimable privileges secured
by the laws of England, to every one under
accusation
of high crimes and misdemeanors; and
these laws had been adopted and were in full force
in the infant state. At the very outset of the
trial, Gen. Bacon objected to the military
character
of the court, as well as to the indecent haste
and the retired nature of the place in which it
was held. He contended that his crime, if crime
he had committed, was a civil offence, and ought
to be tried by the civil tribunals of the country.
All these weighty objections were answered by a
waive of the president's hand, and the trial
proceeded
to its previously well known conclusion,
without farther interruption.
Before the final vote was taken upon the question
whether the prisoner was guilty of high treason or
not, he was ordered to be removed from the
court-room
for a few moments, in order that their
deliberations
might be uninterrupted. As the guard
marched the prisoner through the house into the
back court of the establishment, his step still proud
and his carriage elevated with the sense of
conscious
rectitude, he was at once brought to a stand
by the sight of a spectacle which sent the blood,
chilled with horror, back to his heart. This was
a gibbet or gallows, erected in the very court to
which they were conducting him, and upon it
hung two of his own soldiers!
[12]
[12]
See Sanguinary executions of Bacon's followerswithout the
legal forms of trial, in the Histories of the times.
All evidence of
vitality had long since departed, and their bodies
swung round and round, under the impulse of the
morning breeze, in horrible monotony. Bacon's
first sensation was one of unmixed horror, but
this was succeeded by indignation; not a thought
for his own safety occurred to his mind while under
the first impressions of the fearful spectacle. But
as fierce indignation stirred up his torpid energies
to thoughts of revenge, the means began to
present
themselves, and then it was that he shook
the iron fetters which bound him, in savage and
morose despair. Perhaps a chill from some more
personal feeling ran through his veins, when he
reflected how short had been the passage of his
two humble followers from the sloop which had
borne them across the bay on the preceding night,
to eternity. They had evidently suffered some
hours previousperhaps during the night. They
were the two subaltern officersselected by
himself
for his expedition down the river, and chosen
for their desperate bravery at the battle of Bloody
Run. And now to see their manly proportions
ignominiously exposed upon a gibbet, after
having
been most inhumanly murdered, was more
than he could calmly bear. Bitter and unavailing
were his reflections as he stood a spectator of this
outrage, while his own life hung suspended by a
hair.
He was not left long a spectator of this cruel
scene; the guard was ordered to present the
prisoner
again before the court to receive sentence.
When Bacon stood once more at the foot of the
table, surrounded by his unrelenting enemies, his
countenance evinced a total change. When first
he stood in the same place, he had not fully
realized
his situation; he was stupified with
overwatching
and fatigue. The young are always slow to
apprehend the darker shadows in their own
prospective
,
and instinctively cling to the brighter
aspect of events and circumstances, until some
sudden calamity or unexpected reverse in their
own immediate career, opens their eyes to the
stern reality. When such a change is brought
immediately before the senses, then indeed the
dreadful truth speaks direct to the apprehension.
Few criminals at the moment of receiving sentence
of death, realize more than a horrid and oppressive
sense of present calamityall hope has not yet
entirely forsaken them. But could they see
upon the spot a fellow criminal undergoing the last
penalty of the law, they would at once realize the
truth in all its terrors.
The sight of his unfortunate followers had thus
opened the eyes of the youthful general, to the
desperate character of his enemies, and the awful
fate which immediately awaited him, but it was
not fear which now revived his stupified powers
to action. His look was bold and daring, while a
preternatural brilliancy shot from his proud eye,
as the president of the court, with an assumed
calmness
,
pronounced upon him the sentence of death.
As the last fatal word fell from the lips of the
stern old knight, the prisoner's countenance was
rigid, cold and deathlike for an instant, as he
struggled to master his rebellious and scornful
feelings into such a state of discipline as would
enable him to express the little he had to say, with
clearness and precision.
Although the usual question, if he had any
thing to say why sentence of death should not
be pronounced against him, was not asked, he
stepped boldly up to the end of the board, and
notwithstanding the magisterial waive of the
president's
hand for silence, and a simultaneous order
to the officer of the guard to remove himgave
utterance to his feelings in these words, and with
a manner powerfully subdued, yet energetic; his
voice issuing from between his rigidly set teeth
like that of one under the influence of reckless
desperation.
If it may so please the president, and
gentlemen
of the court-martial, I will not tamely and
silently submit myself to be butchered in cold
blood, without raising my voice and protesting
against the jurisdiction of the courtthe time
the placethe manner of the trialthe persons
who compose the court, and especially him who
presides over your deliberations.
Was it treason I committed, when I boldly and
openly marched from Jamestown to Orapacks, at
the head of the brave men who drove before them
the savages by whom the dwellings of the Colony
had been burned, and its women and children
murdered
.
Did not the house of burgesses request the
Governor to sign the commission, which the
people
had unanimously put into my hands? Did he
not pledge his knightly word that the
commissions
should be ratified? Under the authority of
that commission and that promise, have I not
driven the enemies of civilized man before me, as
I marched through the Peninsula? Have I not
done what has never before been done? cut out
a broad line of separation between the habitations
of the white man and the savage? Have I not
avenged the murders committed on the night of
the massacre? Have I not avenged injuries
committed
against more than one member of this very
court, by the bloody confederation? Have I not,
with these hands, rescued the sister-in-law of the
president of this very tribunal from the
murderous
tomahawk of the savages? True, it was only
to diebut it was worthy of all my poor exertions
to rescue her body from their unhallowed hands,
that it might rest in consecrated ground. Have I
not annihilated the confederation itself, cut to pieces
the assembled tribesrescued the prisoners, razed
to the ground the fortifications at the falls, and
made prisoners of the brave remnant of those
misguided
nations who erected it? If this be treason,
then indeed am I a traitor!
Why is it that this great and glorious country,
opened to the oppressed and crowded nations of
the old world by a kind and beneficent Providence,
must so often become the theatre of struggles for
personal aggrandizement and power? Why is it
that our arms must be turned against ourselves in
fratricidal conflict, when so many enemies have
been swarming upon our frontiers, and devastating
our settlements? Must the great and evident
designs
of the Creator be thus constantly retarded?
the great destinies of this vast land obscured in the
dawn, by the petty struggles of contending
chieftains
?
Who can tell how far to the mighty west
the tide of civilization and emigration would have
rolled their swelling waves, but for the scenes
of personal rivalry and contention like the
present
,
which have disgraced our annals?
The rosy tints of the morning dawn of destiny
have scarcely risen in the east of this mighty
continent
the
boldest and the wildest imagination
cannot soar into futurity, and predict its
noonday
glories, or count up the tides and floods of
human
beings, that shall be wafted to these shores,
and thence roll in successive waves, to the dark
and as yet unknown west.
I have been but an humble instrument in the
hands of the Great Mover of these mighty currents,
and for this ye seek my life. But death to this
frail body cannot arrest the great movement, in
which I have been an actor. I have indeed been
the first to point out the importance of drawing a
broad line of separation between the European and
the native, the first to show the necessity of rolling
to the west the savage hordes, as the swelling
numbers of our own countrymen increase upon
our hands. Future emigration must advance
westward
in a semicircular wavelike a kindred
billow
of the watery ocean, sweeping all obstruction
before it.
If the natives flee before this rolling tide, and
survive its destructive progress, well and happy
will it be for them; but if they attempt to buffet
the storm, ruin hangs upon their tardy footsteps.
I confess that I have been the first to maintain the
impossibility of the two species living together in
peace, and to execute the primitive and opening
step in this great revolution of nations. If this be
treason, then am I a traitor. But if I fall, think
not that the great movement shall fall with me.
The Great Ruler of the universe has opened these
fertile hills and dales to his oppressed creatures;
and he has likewise pointed out the necessity of
driving back them who make no use of these
blessings
,
and who rise not from their idolatry and
ignorance to a state fitted to render glory to their
Creator. The tide will move on to the westward,
in spite of such tribunals as this. If I am to die
here in this insulated neck of land, by the hands
of those who are themselves prisoners, so be it
I shall die contented in the knowledge that I have
not lived in vain, and that future generations will
rescue from oblivion the name of him who first
opened an avenue to the mighty and unknown
west, and however illegally my life may be taken,
I will show you that I can die as becomes a soldier
and a Cavalier. One request I would fain make,
even of them whose actions I abhor and despise;
Vol. II. 16
it is this; as you have tried and condemned me
by a military tribunal, that you inflict upon me
the death of a soldier. This is a request which I
would alike make to a heathen or an infidel.
Take him immediately to the gallows,
shouted Sir William Berkley.
The officer of the guard approached with his
myrmidons, and laid hold of the prisoner, in
accordance
with the mandate of the Governor; but
three or four members of the court rose at once,
and expressed their willingness to allow the
prisoner
until the succeeding day to prepare for
execution
.
Away with him, away with him, again
vociferated the president, at the same time,
menacing
the official who stood holding the prisoner,
doubtful how to act, and apparently willing to
listen
to the more merciful suggestion. By this time
the whole court was in confusion and uproar; every
member was upon his feet, together with the
president
,
each one endeavouring to be heard. A
large majority of the members were for the longest
time, and these now demanded of the Governor to
submit the question to the court; but the old
knight, having probably discovered that Ludwell
and Beverly were his only supporters,
clamorously
persisted in ordering the prisoner to instant
execution.
Bacon himself, during this time, at first stood
with his arms folded and a bitter smile of contempt
playing upon his features, until the turmoil growing
louder and more protracted, he too attempted to
obtain a hearing. It is perfectly indifferent to
me, said he, whether I am murdered
to-morrow
,
or at the next moment; let the hour come
when it may, my blood be upon your skirts!
His manly bearing served to reanimate those who
contended for delay, and the strife continued to
grow more noisy and turbulent, until, as if by
magic, a side door of the apartment opened, and a
new actor appeared upon the scene. The court was
instantaneously hushed to silence, and Sir William
Berkley stood as if he beheld an apparition, while
Bacon bounded forward and clasped Virginia, who
rushed into his outstretched (but fettered) arms.
When she first gently pushed open the door, not
one of the court or of the attendants perceived her.
She was clad in the loose folds of the sick
chamber
her
blond curls fell in unheeded ringlets over
her brow, temples and shouldersher face was pale
as monumental marble, and her frame weak and
trembling, while a preternatural excitement of the
moment shot from her eyes, as she gazed through
the partly opened door, to ascertain if her ears had
not deceived her.
Not a word was uttered louder than a deep
impassioned
whisper, until Virginia perceived the
chains upon his hands, when seizing the iron by
the middle she stepped forward and boldly
elevating
her head, addressed Sirl William Whence
these chains, sir?tell me quickly; tell me that
they have not been put on by your ordersbefore
I curse the hour that united my destiny in any
manner with yours!
Not only were they imposed by my orders,
but they were so put on in preparation for a
ceremony
which shall alike cure you of your vagaries
and release me from his hated presence for ever!
Guard, lead her to her chamber, and the prisoner
to execution!
Scarcely had the words died upon his lips, ere
she sprang from the grasp of the officer, and locked
her hands around the neck of her lover,
exclaiming
,
Now you may shoot him through meno
ball enters his body but through mine. You may
hack off my arms with your swords, but until
then I will never leave him!
The Governor and Beverly now came forward,
and each of them seizing a hand, they tore her
from his embrace, in the midst of a wild
hysterical
laugh, hot however before Bacon had
imprinted
a kiss upon her pale forehead, and uttered a
brief and agonizing farewell. He then seated
himself
upon a chair, and covering his face with his
hands, gave himself up to emotions which had not
before been awakened during his trial.
As they were leading Virginia from the room,
she suddenly recovered her composure, sprang
from their grasp, and placing herself against the
wall, between two of the officers of the court, who
were still standing, clung to their arms while she
thus addressed Frank BeverlyAnd this is the
method you have taken to win your way to my
favourthis is the plan you have devised to rid
yourself of a rival. And you too, his deadly
enemy
to
sit in judgment upon him, and mock
justice by the cowardly device. Out upon you,
sir, for a craven-hearted dastard. Is this the way
you were to meet and conquer him in battle?
Where are your trophies for my bridal turban,
taken from the standards of his followers? You
take trophies from Bacon in battle! One glance
of his manly eye would drive the blood chilled
to your craven heart, and wither the muscles of
your coward arm.
Again she was seized, and dragged from the
court-room by the Governor and Beverly. In a
few moments the president returned, and found
the court proceeding in his absence deliberately
to take the question on granting the prisoner until
the succeeding day to prepare for death, and
allowing
him the attendance of a clergyman. Sir
William
was fearful perhaps, that by resisting the will
of the majority, he should defeat his purpose, and
therefore acquiesced in what he could not prevent,
with more amenity than might have been expected
from his previous violence.
The prisoner had not so suddenly regained his
equanimity; he was indeed making strenuous
exertions
to that end, but now and then a
piercing
scream from the upper chambers of the
mansion
thrilled through his nerves, and more than
once he suddenly sprang to his feet, and made an
attempt to rush past his vigilant keepers, but was
16*
as quickly reminded of his helplessness by the
jarring sound of his fetters, and the ready grasp of
the officials. After several such attempts, he at
length folded his arms, and gave himself up to
bitter
reflectionsa wretched smile flashing athwart
his countenance indicating the violence of the
internal struggle and the cruel pangs that rent his
bosom.
The majority of the court having triumphed in
the first matter, the question was again raised as
to the manner of his death, and Bacon's
countenance
was actually lit up by a smile when he heard
the decision of the court in favour of his own
request
,
that he might die the death of a soldier.
The guard were at the moment leading him from
the court room to his prison house, and his step
became more firm and elastic, and he could now
look upon the wretched spectacle in the court,
without the same degree of horror which he had
before evinced.
When he had marched several paces in his
progress
round the mansion, he halted suddenly and
wheeled round to survey the dormer windows
peering through the roof, as was the fashion with
the long low houses of the time. His eye rested
from its piercing and steady gaze, in sadness and
disappointment, and he threw down his chained
hands with a violent motion, as he resumed his
march between the soldiers. They conducted him
to the door of a cellar at the end of the house,
which was secured with double defences; in the
next moment he was rudely thrust into a damp
cellar, without a ray of light, and the door was
closed and securely bolted.
CHAPTER X.
Bacon
heard the rusty bolt shoot into its socket,
and then the hasping and locking of the outside
door, with a sensation of utter hopelessness. He
wandered through the dark precincts of his prison,
stumbling now over an old barrel, and anon
against a meat block, until he came to some dry
bundles of fodder, which seemed to have been
spread out in one corner to answer the purpose of
a bed. Before throwing himself upon this rude
couch, he resolved to examine the structure of his
cell. By passing his hands along the walls, he
found that they were built of brick, well cemented
by a long process of timethat the summit upon
which the basement beams of the frame rested,
were entirely out of his reach, and that in the
present
confined state of his hands, it would be
impossible
for him to make any impression on them,
and he could distinctly hear the tramp of more
than one sentinel, as they paced their monotonous
rounds about that wing of the building. There
was yet much of the day remaining, and he
resolved
to spend it in endeavouring to grind off the
end of the rivets to the iron bands enclosing his
wrists. By rubbing these against the bricks, he
found that he could wear them away by a tedious
and laborious process. Our hero was not one of
those who surrender themselves up to
despondency
at the first appearance of insurmountable
difficulties
;
decision of character was his most striking
quality, and he knew that his devoted army only
waited for him to lead them to avenge his wrongs.
He felt the difficulties which lay between him and
Jamestown, but he did not despair, however
desperate
his circumstances. For many hours he
persevered
in grinding the rivets against the bricks;
with wrenching and great danger of dislocating
his wrists, he at length succeeded in so wearing
down the iron, that he could at any moment throw
aside the manacles. Encouraged with this success,
he moved the meat-block against the wall, and
made all preparations for a breach, as soon as he
should be satisfied that the darkness of night would
cover his movements.
To while away the time usefully, he threw
himself
upon his rude bed, and was soon, from the
effects of great previous mental excitement and
bodily fatigue, wrapt in profound slumber.
The shadows of night had closed around this
land in the midst of waters in sombre hues, and
the prisoner still slept profoundly.
In the mean time circumstances were in progress
on the bay, which had a most important bearing
upon the fate of every one then at Accomac.
It has already been stated that Sir William
Berkley had put in requisition such of the naval
power as he could bring to bear upon his
immediate
designs and pressing necessities. But, after
leaving the city in the precipitate manner which
has been related, the citizens determined to
summon
to their aid, such of the ships and other
vessels
of war and merchandise, as yet remained in
the river, within convenient distance of the city,
and make the old knight a prisoner at Accomae.
The Governor had not long been gone before an
armament superior to his own, was seen steering
in the course which he had taken. This
consisted
of one ship, a bark of four guns, a sloop
and schooner. The expedition was under the
joint command of Giles Bland and William
Carver
,
both veteran and experienced seamen. On
board of one of the vessels, and subordinate to the
officers just mentioned, was Captain Larimore; he
was one of the most devoted friends of Sir William
Berkley, but his personal predilections and loyal
principles were entirely unknown, either at
Jamestown
or on board the fleet. When this (at that
time) formidable armament arrived in sight of the
vessels at anchor, which had borne Sir William
and his partisans to Accomac, it being now dark,
(on the same evening in which Bacon lay sleeping
in his dungeon,) Capt. Larimore proposed to his
superior officers, that he would take one or two
resolute
tars, and, avoiding the hostile vessels, land and
reconnoitre the position and forces of the Governor.
His proposition was promptly aceeded to, and
Larimore launched his boat, selected his men,
and protected by the thickness of the fog and the
darkness of the night, succeeded in effecting his
landing unperceived by the vessels in the service
of the Governor. If he had been aware of Bacon's
imprisonment and condemnation, and disposed to
do so, he might have rendered him the most
important
services; but whether disposed to hazard
any thing in his cause or not, both he and his
superiors
were ignorant of Bacon's fate.
When the boat containing the adventurer and
his two associates struck the shore, Larimore
immediately
sprang upon the beach and ordered his
subordinates to push a few yards out into the bay,
and remain within sound of his whistle. He
proceeded directly towards the quarters of Sir
William Berkley, until he was challenged by one
of the sentinels with his carbine at his breast.
Larimore
desired the sentinel to lead him to the
Governor
.
As soon as he had made himself known
to his Excellency, he informed him of his
disposition
to advance the cause of the loyal party, and
submitted the following proposition.
He requested the Governor to send one or two
of his most daring and trusty officers, with one
hundred rosolute men in boats or canoes, during
that portion of the night when he should himself
be in command of the watchand promised that
he would deliver the whole armament into the
hands of the Governor. Sir William immediately
summoned his officers and made the proposition
known to themrequesting, at the same time that
any gentleman who desired to be entrusted with
the expedition would step forward. Philip
Ludwell
promptly acceded to the offer, and
tendered
his services, which were as promptly
accepted
.
Ludwell having selected his supporters from
the hardiest of the troops and sailors, he held
himself
in readiness to push off as soon as the appointed
hour should arrive. Larimore giving the concerted
signal, sprang into his boat and returned to those
who sent him, with a very different account of
Sir William's position and intentions from that
we have just related.
All this time Bacon was sleeping as soundly
upon his bed of corn blades, as if it was not to be
his last sleep on earth. Criminals condemned
to death generally do sleep soundly the night
preceding
their execution, and Bacon, whether
criminal
or not, was no exception to the rule.
It was some hours after the sun had gone down,
and about the same time that Larimore put off to
his vessel, when Bacon suddenly started up from
his rude couch, under an oppressive sense of
glaring light upon his eye balls. An aged and
decrepid woman was leaning over him; she was
resting upon her knees, in one hand holding the
lamp and in the other the locket which had already
exercised such an important influence upon his
destiny. She had sprung the lid, during his sleep,
and was now gazing upon the beautiful picture,
with an interest and amazement not less intense
than he had himself manifested on its first
discovery
in the Indian wigwam. So absorbed was
her every faculty, that his sudden start from sleep
scarcely attracted her attention. Her eyes were
filled with water in the vain endeavour to decipher
the outlines with convincing accuracy. When the
date and the initials and the hair were submitted
to a like scrutiny, conviction settled at once upon
her mind. The feeling operated slowly at first,
but as one doubt gave way after another, her pale
and haggard features began perceptibly to assume
the life and vigour of deep excitement. The locket
fell from her grasp, and she clasped her hands
but suddenly throwing back the curling masses
from his brow she exclaimed: Tell me, my
master, are you called Nathaniel Bacon?
I am! but tell me in your turn, why do you
ask?
She answered only by exclaiming, O
merciful
Heaven! God be praised! Wonderful are
the ways of Providence! Bacon was on his
knees also, his manacled hands laid upon her
shoulders as he anxiously and hastily inquired,
Tell me, good mother, what do you know of
Nathaniel Bacon?
More than he knows of himself, mayhap!
Speak it quicklymoments are more
precious
than diamondssay, whence comes your
knowledge? who are you? who am I? for God's
sake tell me quickly!
You are the son of as worthy a gentleman as
ever wore a sword. I knew him and your
honoured
mother wellthat is, if you are the same
Vol. II. 17
mischievous boy whom I have mourned as
drowned
these many long and lonesome years.
The captive waited to hear no more, but
springing
upon his feet, paced wildly round the damp
cellar like one in a delirium of joy. The old woman
still maintained her humble posture, her hands
again clasped, and her long wrinkled neck turning
with difficulty to follow the strange movements of
the prisoner. Suddenly, and as if stricken down
by a cannon shot, he threw himself upon the
earth his whole frame convulsed with thoughts
of his present hopeless condition. What
matters
it whether I am Nathaniel Bacon or not?
What will it avail, this time to-morrow, when
these limbs, now so full of life and vigour in the
renewal
of hope, will be still in the cold embrace
of death?
Death! the old woman sereamed, rising
from her knees, seizing the lamp and thrusting it in
Bacon's faceDeath, did you say, my son? or did
my old ears deceive me with the horrible word?
They did not,truer words were never
spoken or heard; to-morrow, before the sun has
measured an hour in the heavens, the voice which
now addresses you, will be silenced in the
everlasting
sleep of death!
Horror struck his auditor dumb; her shrivelled
lips moved with a tremulous motion, as if she
desired
to speakbut she spoke not. An ashy
paleness
overspread her features, and she staggered
backward and would have fallen, had she not been
caught in the arms of her long-lost foster son. A
tumult of thoughts crowded upon her enfeebled
mind, as she recovered, gasping with the unusual
excitement, and her aged frame heaved as if it
would burst in the effort. At length a ray of hope
seemed to dawn upon her mental vision; her eye
sparkled with the thought, as she resumed the
lamp which Bacon had taken from her hand, and
placed upon the ground. It must not, shall not
be, my son. There is your coarse food, Heaven
forgive me for not offering you better, but little
did my thoughts turn upon such a godsend. I
have a thousand things to ask and tell, but as you
say, lifeprecious lifehangs upon every
moment
lost, so
At this moment the sentinel advanced
directly
before them, and taking the old woman
rudely by the arm, said, Come, old Tabby, the
prisoner can find the way to his mouth without the
light; give him his bread and water, and be off;
thrusting her up the steps, as he spoke, slamming
the door, and once more turning the grating bolt
upon the unfortunate prisoner.
Bacon's late reviving hopes almost died within
him as he listened to the unwelcome sounds and
the retreating footsteps of his visiters.
He threw himself once more upon his rude
couch and abandoned himself to despair. But
youthful hope never despairs utterly, however
desperate the circumstances; a few moments after
saw him with his handcuffs thrown off, and busily
engaged in piling the loosened bricks upon the
floor. In less than an hour, he beheld the stars
lightly twinkling in the Heavens, through the
aperture created by the removal of a single brick,
which he had taken from the outer layer before
he was aware of his progress. Cautiously and
intently he listened for the footsteps of the
sentinel
;
strange sounds seemed to come from off the
water, but all in his immediate vicinity was as
quiet as the grave, except the tumultuous
throbbing
of his own heart. Again he proceeded
cautiously
in his work, until he had completed an
aperture sufficiently large to admit the passage
of his body. Then, bracing his nerves, he
proceeded
to effect his exit through the opening,
and was vigorously struggling to free himself,
when a musket ball whistled by his ear and
buried
itself in the wooden sill of the house. He
sprang back into the cellar, and stood in confusion
and amazement, until the short chuckling laugh of
the sentinel roused him from his delusive dream
of hope. He could distinctly hear the marksman
who had exhibited such a dangerous proof of his
skill, laughing and telling his comrade, who paced
before the door at the end of the house, how
he had shaved the prisoner's head. The
unfortunate
captive now abandoned himself to despair
in earnest. A thousand times he cursed his ill
fated stars, for thus leading the old nurse into his
cell to rouse his dormant hopes, and give a new
impulse to his desires for freedom.
While these matters were in progress at the
prison of our hero, the naval armament under the
command of Bland, Carver and Larimore,
belonging
to and put in motion by his friends among
the citizens, and which might have rendered him
such effectual assistance had the two principal
officers
been aware of his situation, was itself about
to perform its share in the contest. The
expedition
under Ludwell, as had been promised to the
traitor Larimore, was sent out at the exact time
specified, and with muffled oars skimmed along
the surface of the tranquil lake, keeping under the
shadow of the ships. As they approached, signals
were exchanged, which satisfied Ludwell that
Larimore was indeed in command of the watch,
and still ready to betray his trust. Once or twice,
indeed, a suspicion shot across his mind, that
Larimore
might only be an agent in the hands of Bland
and Carver, and that his proposal was but a scheme
laid to entrap himself and followers into the power
of the rebels, as the Governor's party were pleased
to call the patriots; but it was as speedily
dissipated
by the favourable train in which every thing
seemed to lie, as the traitor had promised.
The loyal party under his command was in a
very few minutes silently and stealthily climbing
up the sides of the vessels. Having gained the
decks, they proceeded at once to disarm and bind
the sentinels. These unfortunate fellows had been
induced by the traitor Larimore, to believe that
the party under Ludwell were deserters from the
17*
ranks of Sir William Berkley, and were not
undeceived
until they found themselves bound hand
and foot, and such other precautions taken that
they could not alarm their sleeping comrades
below. In less time than we have taken to record
the transaction, the whole naval armament in the
service of the patriots, together with the officers,
crews and military stores, were delivered into the
hands of Governor Berkley. The success of the
enterprise was announced to the anxious expectants
on shore, by a discharge of artillery, which was
joyously answered on their part. Sir William
Berkley was transported with delightso lately
abandoned by the majority of the citizens and
soldiers of the capital, and compelled to desert the
legitimate seat of government, he now saw himself
in possession of a naval and military power, more
than sufficient to command the obedience, if he
could not win the affections of the rebellious
citizens
.
He immediately called together his officers,
and such of the cavalier gentry as had followed
his fortunes to this remote corner of the colony,
and imparted to them his determination to embark
his land forces on board the ships brought over by
himself, and those surrendered by Larimore, and
sail within the hour for the capital.
It may be readily imagined that this sudden
change in their fortunes was not received with
murmurs and discontent; on the contrary
preparations
were eagerly and joyously commenced.
The captured and betrayed patriots were divided
among all the vessels, so as to preclude effectually
any chance of their rising upon the Governor and
his party. The soldiers, artillery and baggage
were placed on board, and the signal given for the
embarkation of the old knight and his staff
family and attendants.
Our gentle heroine was not forgottenshe too
had been roused, not from her slumbers, for she
had not slept, but from her restless and feverish
pillow, and commanded to prepare for instant
departure
for the capital. The stern old Cavalier,
her uncle, stood in the open plot in front of the
house surrounded by his partisans, impatiently
waiting her descent. At length she appeared,
leaning upon the arm of Frank Beverly on one
side, and that of her female attendant upon the
otherher aunt following in evident dejection of
spirits. Virginia's countenance was white as the
spotless attire in which she was enveloped. Her
eye wildly wandered over the faces crowding
around, as she emerged from the house, but soon
settled again in sullen composure as she perceived
the absence of the one sought. The pine torches,
borne by the negroes, shed a glaring and unsteady
light on the objects around; the steady tramp of the
soldiers, as they marched to and embarked on
board the boats, were heard in the direction of
the water, while other parties were seen in like
manner provided with torches, floating in the
barks already laden, toward the ships moored in
the offing. As the party that had just emerged
from the house was about to move in the same
direction, Beverly spoke aloud to the Governor.
Sir William, are you going to leave the
prisoner
in the cellar?
Truetrue, my boy, he replied, I was so
overjoyed at trapping so many of his compeers,
that I had entirely forgotten his generalship; but
we will care for his standing, and that right
speedily
.
We will elevate himI will not say above
his desertbut certainly to a position to which he
has long had eminent claims. Ho! Sir
Hangman
!
Ludwell, order the hangman into our
presence; we need a cast of his office before we
set sail.
It was customary with the Romans, you
know, Sir William, to offer up a sacrifice before
they embarked upon any important enterprise,
said Beverly, laughing at his own wretched
attempt
at wit. But there was one countenance in
the group upon which the first intimation of
Beverly concerning the neglect of the prisoner,
wrought a fearful change. Virginia threw her
eyes wildly round, searching from face to face,
for some small evidence of sympathy on which to
cast her hopes, but they were all steeled in
imperturbable
apathy, or clad in more appalling smiles
of derision. As her eye glanced around the
circle, it fell at last upon the youth supporting her
own enfeebled steps. Her knees were just
sinking
under her from weakness and dismay, but the
sight of Frank Beverly's smiling countenance
aroused her energies. Her muscles were instantly
braced, her eye shot forth scorn and contempt,
while she threw his arms from her, as she would
have started from the touch of some loathsome
reptile. The youth, with a grim smile, folded his
arms in quiet serenity, to await the appearance of
the prisoner, as if conscious that his hour of sweet
revenge was near at hand.
Virginia threw herself at the feet, first of her
uncle, and then of her aunt, and earnestly prayed
for the life of her lover, as she heard the orders
for bringing him forth, but from the first she
received
only a contemptuous glance, and from the
latter silent tears. She was still kneeling upon
the grass at the feet of the latter, her head fallen
in despair and exhaustion upon her bosom, when the
soldiers rushed out from the cellar, and
proclaimed
the escape of the prisoner. An electric stream
poured into Virginia's sinking frame could not
have more suddenly restored her to life and
animation
.
She screamed, clasped her hands, sprang
to her feet, and fell back into the arms of her aunt
in a paroxysm of mingled joy and agitation.
Sir William Berkley gnashed his teeth, and
swearing vengeance against the traitors who had
permitted his enemy's escape, seized one of the
pine torches and rushed into the cellar to satisfy
himself that he was not concealed behind some of
the rubbish of the apartment; but soon found
convincing
evidence of his escape, in the irons that
lay upon the ground, and the aperture through
which he had made his exit. The sentinels were
all called up, who had at any time stood guard over
the prisoner through the night. It appeared that
the one who had discharged his piece so near to
the head of the prisoner, had been some time since
relieved, and that he had merely mentioned to his
successor, the attempt of Bacon to escape, with
his own amusement in showing him how near he
could shoot to his head without wounding him.
Would to God you had lodged the ball in his
skull, exclaimed the enraged governor. The
truth was, that the sentinel had supposed the
prisoner still loaded with his irons when he
appeared
at the breach, having merely discovered
one of the many evidences of dilapidation in the
house, and had consequently left him in the care
of his successor, with the full confidence that he
would not make a second attempt. How he was
induced to make that second attempt will appear
in the sequel. The soldier on duty, at the time
when he was supposed to have escaped, was
immediately
ordered to be put in irons.
Lady Berkley was about having her niece
conveyed
to the house, but her enraged husband
harshly ordered those supporting her now
prostrate
form, to convey her to the vessel, which was
accordingly done. The Governor, his suite and
followers were soon also on board, and a roar of
artillery announced their final departure from the
eastern shore.
When Bacon threw himself upon his couch,
after his last unfortunate attempt to escape, every
thought of once more gaining his liberty
abandoned
him. He very naturally supposed that his
failure would only redouble the vigilance of his
guards, and therefore resumed his irons, with the
desperate resolution of throwing them off, when
he should be led to execution on the following
morning, and selling his life as dearly as he might.
He had lain for some hours in a state of mind
that may be readily imagined from the late scenes
through which he had passed, when at length he
heard his own name softly whispered in his gloomy
cell; the voice appeared to be in his immediate
vicinity. He arose and followed the supposed
direction of the sound, and again he heard it on
the opposite sideproceeding from the still
unclosed
aperture in the wall. He answered in the
same subdued whisper. Come this way, said
the voice of the old woman, the shadow of whose
head he could now perceive darkening the partial
light which broke through. Come this way,
Master Bacon. Tim Jones, the sentinel, has gone
into my cabin to eat a chicken supper, and drink
some aqua vit which I procured for him; his place
is supplied by a soldier whom I engaged to be
ready, as if by accident. He pretends to be asleep
under the big tree yonder. Do you come forth
and proceed round the opposite end of the house
to that occupied by the other sentinel, until you
come to the bushes at the end of the garden
palings
there
wait until I come to youfor your
life do not stir, until I join you there.
Bacon succeeded in avoiding the notice of the
sentry and in gaining the spot indicated by the
old woman, where he had scarcely concealed
himself
,
before the discharge of artillery from the
betrayed fleet startled him from his recumbent
posture. He supposed that his own capture had
been ascertained at Jamestown, and that vessels
had been despatched to rescue him. This idea
had scarcely entered his mind, before he sprang
over the palings and was running at his utmost
speed across the garden toward the bay, for the
purpose of procuring a boat, but his attention was
instantly arrested by the appearance of the
Governor
and his suite collecting in the yard in front
of the house. He was on the point of running
into the hands of the sentinel whose temporary
absence
had afforded him the chance of escape, and
who now sat with his weapon ready for action,
securely guarding, as he supposed, the person who
stood just behind him. The man hailed him as
soon as he heard the rustling among the shrubbery,
but the liberated captive had seen and heard enough
to induce him to seek his hiding-place once more.
CHAPTER XI.
When
Sir William Berkley embarked on board
the ships, he left a company of picked soldiers,
commanded by an officer of tried fidelity, together
with the smallest of the vessels and her crew, with
orders to bring the fugitive to Jamestown, dead or
alive. In a short time that portion of the eastern
shore, lately so full of bustle and activity, was
wrapped in profound repose, unbroken save by the
monotonous tramp of the sentinel, pacing before
the door of the mansion, now the solitary quarters
of the sole remaining officer.
Bacon had perceived from his hiding-place, that
some unusual commotion was in progress between
the quarters of the Governor and the ships lying
in the offing, and he was seized with the most
eager desire to know what it foreboded. For the
first half hour, he lay in momentary expectation
of the commencement of a naval action; at length
he saw the glaring lights of the pine torches,
skimming
along the margin of the water, and dark
shadows of moving crowds, as the boats floated to
their destination. These movements he could not
comprehend except by supposing that the crafty
old knight had set on foot some secret
expedition
,
Vol. II. 18
for the capture of the newly arrived ships,
the increased numbers of which he could easily
perceive. But when the whole fleet set sail, with
the exception of the small craft already
mentioned
,
he was completely at fault. He was
revolving
these strange movements in his mind,
when his kind preserver came again to his
assistance
.
She was moving like an unearthly spirit
along the garden palings, cautiously examining
every bush, when he presented himself before
her. She led him by a circuitous route, and one
the farthest removed from the sentinel, to a lone
cabin that stood some distance from the main
building
,
and that had lately been occupied by the
inferior
officers attached to Sir William's cause; it
had formerly been used as a negro cabin. After
she had ushered him into the single room which
it afforded, she pointed to a seat, and began
stirring
up the coals which had been left from the
culinary operations of the late occupants. She
was about sitting down to hear Bacon's account
of himself, and doubtless of communicating her
share of information for filling out the history, but
recollecting that he had left his food untouched,
she hastily covered the light, and went out,
carefully
securing the door on the outside, but soon
returned with a remnant of Tim Jones' chicken
supper, which she had no doubt preserved for her
own use. This was speedily placed upon a rude
table, and the fugitive urged to help himself in
the midst of a torrent of questions.Now she
desired
to know the fate of the Irishmanwhere
they had landed after the shipwreckwho had
so kindly nurtured and educated himwhether
he knew any thing of his relations in England
if he remembered any thing of her features, or
her home in the old country. What was his
occupation
.
Why Sir William Berkley disliked
him, in what position he stood with regard to the
beautiful invalid, who had shown so much grief
at the prospect of his immediate execution,
how he had managed to preserve the locket so
faithfullyand a hundred other queries of like
import, with the solution to which the reader is
already acquainted, but which our hero answered
with great impatience, interposing one of his own
between every two of hers, and meanwhile doing
ample justice to the provision she had set before
him. The substance of the old woman's narrative
was as follows:
When Mrs. Fairfax, then Mrs. Whalley
Merciful Heaven! exclaimed Bacon,
dropping
his knife and forkwas General
Whalley
her first husband? Then indeed he and the
Recluse are the same person. The nurse stared
at him a moment, but presently proceeded with
her narrative.
When Mrs. Fairfax, then Mrs. Whalley, left
her infant son in my care, for the purpose of
joining her husband, then an officer in the army
of the commonwealth, I was entirely
unacquainted
with the opposition of her family to her
marriage
with General Whalley, and ignorant of the
clandestine manner in which that ceremony had
been performed, as well as the subsequent
privacy
of their movements, which they thought
necessary for their safety.
It was a long time after her departure from
my house, and after the time of her promised
return
,
before I received the least account of her, or
the cause of her prolonged absence from her child.
But when I did at length receive a letter from
the unfortunate lady, the whole mystery was
cleared
up. In that letter she stated `that while she
was on her way to join her husband, she was
overtaken in the highway, by a party of loyalist
soldiers, commanded by her own brother. She
was immediately recognised by him, and sent
under
a military escort to her father's house, not,
however, before she had time to learn from one of
the prisoners under the charge of the party, the
death of her husband, who, he stated, had fallen
by his side.' She made the promised remittances
for the support of her infant, and every thing went
on in the usual train, until the time arrived for the
next promised letter, which indeed arrived, by the
hands of a very different messenger from the one
before employed. It was brought by the very
brother who had arrested her in the road, and sent
her a prisoner to her father's house. He presented
the letter unopened, but stated that he was fully
apprised of its contents, as well as of the existence
of his sister's child, which she still supposed
unknown
to her family. He told me that his father
was almost broken-hearted, on account of the
disgraceful
marriage which his sister had contracted,
and that the sight of her infant in the house, or
even the knowledge of its existence, would drive
him to phrenzy; that his brothers and himself had
therefore determined to take effectual means, not
only to remove the child from within the reach
and knowledge of their father, but of its mother
also. That they were determined to take it by
force, a sufficient proof of which he showed me in
a party of armed followers, (for they were all
military
men,) unless I would consent to a plan for the
removal of the offensive little stranger, which
would secure all their views, and be, at the same
time, more satisfactory to himself and, he doubted
not, to me. His proposition was, that I should
remove with the child to a distant residence, the
means for which he would amply provide; and
that I should then wait on Mrs. Whalley, his
sister
,
and inform her that her child was dead. As
an inducement for me to be guilty of this
deception
,
he informed me that there was a young
Cavalier
,
of good birth and connexions, who was
enamoured
of his sister, but if the child was permitted
to absorb her affections, and remind her of her lost
husband, they despaired of ever seeing her married
to Mr. Fairfax, and consequently of wiping out
the stigma upon their good name created by her
first marriage. I was really attached to the
little
boy, and fearful that they would take him by
force if I did not quietly yield, and being assured
that I should watch over him wherever he went,
18*
I consented to the plan. I waited on the mother,
and with well dissembled sorrow, told her of the
death of her darling boy. I thought at first that
she would have gone distracted, but the necessity
of keeping her secret from her father and
brothers
,
roused her to the needful exertion. It was
well that it was so, for I could not have endured
her heart-rending distress five minutes longer.
The next information I had of the unfortunate
lady, was from the same young gentleman, her
brother, who came to inform me of the success
of their plans and thus relieve my conscience. His
sister after a tedious delay had married Mr. Fairfax,
and sailed for the Capes of Virginia. He assured
me that the child should always be provided for, but
that I must change his name from Charles Whalley
to some other, which I might choose myself, so that
he could never be able to trace his parentage. I
was firmly resolved, however, that the innocent
babe should some day know his real history. In
the meantime I consented to all that the young
gentleman desired, and he left the usual supply
and departed. I never saw him again. The
remittances
for the support of the child were indeed
kept up for some time, but they at length became
irregular, and less frequent. My mind began to
grow uneasy concerning the charge which I had
thus by a crime brought upon myself, and which
I considered but a just retribution for my evil
deeds. Nor were my fears less anxious
concerning
the future prospects of my innocent nursling.
My health had well nigh sunk under the
accumulating
load of poverty and unavailing regrets for
my wickedness, and I trust that I sincerely
repented
of the evil deed. Providence at length
directed to my humble dwelling one who appeared
indeed as one risen from the dead.
It was none other than General Whalley
himself
;
he had really been shot in the battle, but had
recovered. Great God! what were my sensations,
when the gigantic warrior, pale and worn with
mental and bodily suffering, threw aside his
disguise
,
and avowed himself to me.
Notwithstanding
the embarrassing position into which his being
still alive was calculated to throw all parties, I fell
upon my knees before him, and my Maker, and
fully acknowledged my participation in the
transactions
which I have related. He had heard of
the marriage of his wife to Mr. Fairfax, before he
sought me out, but even at this comparatively
remote period of time from her marriage, his huge
frame shook, and he became like an effeminate
being
while he listened to my narrative. He told
me that he was likewise about to sail for America;
not that he desired or intended to make himself
known to his wife, but because it was becoming
unsafe for him to remain longer in the kingdom.
I have no doubt in my own mind, that he was
unconsciously
indulging his desire to be near his still
adored Emily, in his choice of a place of refuge,
which he now informed me, was the same to which
she had gone with her husband. He told me that
it was his intention to live in the greatest
seclusion
,
and that his very name should be unknown
in his new abode. He proposed that I should
follow
him, after he should have established himself,
and made arrangements for my comfortable
reception
,
the time for which was specified. I felt
myself
impelled by an imperious sense of duty to
repair
,
as far as lay within my power, the injury
which I had helped to inflict upon him, and
therefore consented to leave country and home
with my little charge, now become so dear to
me.
After furnishing me with the necessary supplies
for the long and dreaded voyage, together with
particular directions as to the place of
embarkation
,
and the course I was to pursue after arriving
in Jamestown, General Whalley left me, and I
have never seen or heard of him to the present
hour. I did not consider that surprising,
however
,
because he informed me that he would never
more be known by the name of Whalley, and that
I must school myself carefully before my departure
for America, never to drop a hint that he had ever
been more than he seemed to be in his new abode.
But to proceed with my story. He had directed
that I should sail with the boy after the lapse of
one year from the time of his own departure. The
most of this interval was employed in making my
own little preparations for so long a voyage, and my
final separation in this life, from all my kindred
and friends. I had promised to keep my design
as secret as possible, and every precaution was
indeed
taken to keep my intended departure a secret
from all but my own immediate relations. But
by some means unknown to me, my design
became
known to others, as I was apprised one day,
by a visit from a gentleman named Bacon!
The fugitive instantly dropped his knife and
fork, which he had been occasionally using as the
story of the nurse ran upon those events already
known to him, but now a new name was
introduced
,
and one which, it may be readily
imagined
,
did not fail to command his undivided and
breathless attention.
Mr. Bacon informed me that he had heard of
my intended expedition, and that I was to take
out with me the tender boy then on my lap, and
said he could readily surmise that the late
unfortunate
civil wars were in some way or other the
cause of my undertaking so long and dangerous a
voyage. As he saw my embarrassment from not
knowing how to answer him, he hastened to
assure
me that he did not desire to pry into my
secret. That he was placed in somewhat similar
circumstances himself, to those which, as he
supposed
,
operated on the parents of the boy. He
informed me that his brother and himself had both
been unfortunately in the army of the
commonwealth
,
in which his brother had fallen, and that
he had left an only son to his care, the mother of
whom had died in giving him birth. `Now my
object in coming to you, my good woman,' said
he, `is to procure your assistance in conveying my
ward to Virginia.'
I readily undertook the task, and all necessary
arrangements were made for the boy's comfortable
passage. Some months before the time of
embarkation
,
little master Bacon, or I may as well say
yourself, was brought to me, in order that you
might learn to know and love me before we set
sail for this distant land. When I was on board
the vessel, and had paid for my own passage as
well as for those of my little charges, the money
for which had been provided by the friends of
each, I was startled to perceive that Mr. Bacon
did not join me as had been agreed upon. My
anxiety became more and more intense as the time
approached for weighing anchor, for although I
was amply provided with all necessary funds, my
mind misgave me that some accident had befallen
the unfortunate gentleman. He was indeed in
disguise when he came to see me, and I doubt not,
was a fugitive from the powers that then ruled our
native land. My worst apprehensions were
realized
Mr.
Bacon was either made a prisoner,
prevented
from joining me by apprehension, or chose
to deceive me in the whole business, but I have
always religiously believed, since I have had time
to reflect dispassionately on the subject, that his
absence was not a matter of choice.
We had a pleasant and prosperous voyage, until
the first night after we came in sight of land, when
such a storm arose, as it seemed to me that the
whole world was coming to an end. Daylight
found us a miserable company of forlorn wretches,
hanging upon the wreck. The boats were already
loaded to the water's edge. I prayed and
entreated
some of the good gentlemen to save my two
precious boys, if they left me, but alas! every
one was taking measures for his own safety. There
was one poor, ignorant, but tender-hearted
Irishman
,
who had been a soldier, that seemed to
commiserate
my helpless little charges, his name was
Brian O'Reilya talking, blundering, merry youth
he was then. At length seeing some prospect of
effecting a landing, he made a raft of parts of the
wreck, and trusted himself and you to the mercy of
the treacherous waves. That was the last I ever
saw of the warm hearted Irishman, and of you, until
I accidentally discovered, while you were asleep
in the cellar, the identical locket containing your
mother's likeness, which I had placed round your
neck with my own hands. I saw the resemblance,
too, which you bore to my lost boy, and was
immediately
satisfied that God had preserved you, in
his own way and for his own wise purposes, and
I determined also to save you, if I could, from the
cruel punishment which I learned more fully from
the sentinel, the Governor intended to inflict upon
you in the morning. Thank God, I have succeeded.
Now do tell me, what I have asked you so often,
what became of the Irishman, and where you were
landed and how preserved.
First tell me, good nurse, how you escaped
the wreck, and what became of your other ward.
It is of immense importance for me to know. The
liberty which you have given me is worth nothing,
without a clear explanation of these points.
That I can soon inform you ofthe Captain,
kind and generous man that he was, seeing the
probable success of the Irishman's plan, adopted
it himself, and after making a raft, with the help
of some of his crew, placed all the females on it
who chose to venture in preference to waiting
for the return of the boats. Myself with my
little
remaining boy, and several other females who
were steerage passengers, suffered ourselves to be
lashed to the frail machine. For four dreadful
hours we were tossed about at the mercy of the
waves, the water for at least half the time dashing
over us, and, as it seemed, carrying us half way to
the bottom. At length, however, we landed upon
the eastern side of this very neck of land, where
I have remained ever since. I have never set my
foot on board of any kind of water craft from that
time to this. Together with another of the females
mentioned and my little boy, the son of
General
Whalley, I wandered through swamps, and
marshes, and sea-weeds, until we had entirely
crossed the necknever having eaten one
mouthful
until we arrived at this plantation. Here we
were most kindly received by the widowed
mother
of the present proprietor, Mr. Philip
Ludwell
;
but alas, my little boy had suffered too long
and too severely from the combined effects of the
night upon the wreck, the succeeding sufferings
upon the raft, and the hunger endured before we
came to this place. He sunk rapidly,
notwithstanding
the humane exertions of the good lady
who had extended her kindness toward us. He
died and was buried on this plantationI have
preserved his little clothes and trinkets to this day.
Little did I think at that time that you had
outlived
him.
Bacon then performed his promise, and related
all that he knew of his own and O'Reily's escape
from the wreckand likewise informed her that
the latter had been on the eastern shore within
the last two hours, but, he supposed had been
taken as a prisoner to Jamestown by Sir William
Berkley. But tell me, he continued, have
you never seen or heard any thing of General
Whalley, or Mrs. Fairfax, since you parted from
them in England?
I have never heard a word of the General
from that time to the present, though I have
questioned
every body that came from Jamestown. I
knew that he intended to assume another name,
and other habits, and I therefore described his
person and manners, but no one had ever seen such
a personage!
The hasp flew from the pine log into which it
had been inserted, and the door was driven back
against the opposite wall. Thou beholdest him
now, woman! look at me! and he pointed to his
now haggard features, and say whether I am that
man!
But his gigantic figure, never to be mistaken,
Vol. II. 19
had scarcely darkened the doorway, before the
person he addressed began to gasp for breath, and
seized the arm of Bacon for protectioncalling
upon him for God's sake to save herher eyes
meantime immoveably fixed upon the intruder's
countenance.
Quail not, woman; there is no one here to
harm thee, if thy own conscience condemns thee
not. I have heard part of thy story, as I listened
at the door, in order to find out how many of
the Governor's minions I should have to slay
before freeing the boy. Lay thy hand upon the
Holy Evangelists, woman, and he drew his
clasped Bible from his pouch and extended it
across the table to her, and swear that this boy
is not my son, whom I entrusted to thy care.
With a trembling hand she touched the holy
book, and said as distinctly as her fears would
permit
,
Before God and upon his word, I testify
it as my firm and unwavering belief, that this
young man who sits before me, is Nathaniel Bacon,
and not your son.
It was indeed my boy, then, whom thou
buried
upon this lone shore? And without waiting
for an answer he threw himself into one of the rude
seats, leaned his head down upon the table, and
gave himself up to uncontrolled emotion.
Bacon was moved to tears as he saw the stern
Recluse thus overwhelmed with grief at the
breaking up of the last tie that linked him to
earth. He remembered, as he looked upon his
agitated frame, how uncompromising had been the
frowns of fortune upon this now solitary being.
Once he was flushed with the joy of youth, and
love, and hope, and fired with a military ardour
like himself. But now (as he supposed) he was
an outlaw, and an exile from his country
unconsciously
abandoned by a doting wifehis only
heir, and the sole stay and hope of his declining
years dead and buried upon the very spot where
he at last found the nurse to whom the child had
been committed. He remembered also his
unwavering
kindness to himself, and his general
benevolence and kindness of feeling toward his
fellow men, and he unconsciously let fall the
words which rose embodied to his tongue, as with
swimming eyes he looked upon him, 'Tis a
hard and cruel fate!
Rather say that retributive justice pursues and
overtakes the guilty to the ends of the earth.
answered
the Recluse, raising his head erect from the
table. Oh God, how just and appropriate are thy
punishments! How true and discriminating is
thy retribution. Behold here a wretch who has
fled three thousand miles from the scene of his
crimes in the vain delusion that he could flee from
himself and the mysterious all seeing eye above!
Young man, there is a mysterious system of ethics
which the world understands notthe reputed
wise, subtleize it, and the vainly wicked contemn
and despise it. It is comprised in the simple words
justiceprobityand benevolence! There is a
power of bringing about its own ends in the first
which none but the wickedly wise know. Yea, and
bringing it about by the very weapons used against
its dictates, and if not upon the very scene of the
crime, at least in a place peculiarly appropriate.
Behold here before you this worn down remnant
of humanity, summoned, as he supposed, to rescue
the last of his race from the power of the oppressor;
but in truth, only to weep over the grave of his
real son, buried on this spot years ago. This
hand once aided in severing the links between
father and son,a man as innocent and
unoffending
as his offspring was helpless. A royal line
they were. Just heaven, how that crime has been
avenged! How strangely and how justly!
Probity
and benevolence are mysteriously bringing
about their own righteous purposes, as does justice
her avenging decrees. The worldly wise look with
contempt upon simple honesty, but the highest
ultimatum of earthly wisdom and experience is to
have the power and the knowledge of the wicked
with the simple guide, that justice, probity and
benevolence unerringly work out their own
reward
.
The wickedly wise cunningly suppose that they
are cheating their God and their fellow men; the
last they may temporarily deceive, but the Great
Political Economist of the universe so overrules
their cunning, that their own hands are forging
the chains of their future captivity, at the very
moment when they suppose themselves
constructing
daggers for their neighbour's throats, and keys
for their strong boxes. The mysterious power of
which I speak is felt always in the latter end of
human life, but can never be described to those
just entering upon the scene. Thrice blessed is
he, my son, who can fall before his Maker and say
that justice, probity and benevolence have been his
ruling motives of actionwhether from the
dictates
of the heart or of the head. That thou art
one of those I have long believed, and if thou art
not the son of my loins, thou art of my affections.
Come, my boat waits for thee; thy presence is even
now needed in Jamestown. Thy troops are
encamped
but a few miles from the town, and are
wondering at thy absence. The Governor has
embarked
for the city to perpetrate more wrong and
oppression. By the will of Heaven this rusty
weapon shall once more do battle in a holy cause.
As they were leaving the cabin. Bacon turned
to the nurse and embracing her said, I go hence,
good Margaret, to battle in the cause of my
country
,
and that right speedily. If I am successful,
you will soon hear from me, and if not, you will
have the consolation of knowing that your foster
son died as became the son of a soldier. Before
you rising moon has twice performed her circuit,
I will be either the conqueror of Jamestown or
buried in its ruins.
With hasty strides he followed the Recluse, who
was already half way to the little secluded inlet
from which he had landed. As they approached
19*
the water, Bacon could perceive two slender masts
dancing in the moonbeams, as the dark hull of a
fishing smack pitched and tossed with the swelling
billows. Stepping into a log canoe, (such as
surround
all water bound plantations in slave
countries
,)
they were speedily on board the diminutive
craft, where two lounging fishermen waited their
approach. The wind was blowing fresh from off
the sea across the neck of land they had just left,
and they scudded before it at a rate, if not quite
equal to the impatience of the more youthful
voyager, at least with as much rapidity as could
reasonably have been expected. The Recluse
seemed as usual inclined for thoughtful silence,
and as his companion leaned against the mast of
the rocking vessel, he saw the workings of a
mighty mindwrecked, as he supposed, upon some
unseen obstacle, as it was impetuously borne along
by the resistless tide of youthful hopes and
aspirations
.
He could not believe that the Recluse had
ever been deliberately base or cruel, as he
himself
had more than hinted. At least, said he,
as he communed with himself, he has paid
tenfold
penance for a single error.
The Recluse at length perceived that his
companion
was observing him, and arose from his half
recumbent position, and stood beside him, his
arms folded for an instant, and his attenuated
countenance, as it reflected back the sickly rays of
a hazy moon, settled in profound melancholy. He
took the hand of the youth, and shook it some
time in agitation before he could give utterance to
his thoughts, but at length he said in a voice which
betrayed the violence of his feelings,
Nathaniel, canst thou forgive me for that cruel
mistake at the chapel? Oh, couldst thou know
what I suffered then, and since, both on thy
account
and my own, thou wouldst accept it as
ample
atonement for the unintended wrong. I saw,
on that dreadful night, her who was the queen of
my manhood's fondest dreamswho had basked
with me in the sunshine of youth and hopewho
had given me her young affections in return for
my own, when life was in its bud, and who
afterward
blossomed into the rich fruition of maternal
love and beauty in these armsher who was torn
from me by a base deception of her kindred, and
married to another. I saw her face to face, for
the first time in more than twenty years, when
she was about to give the offspring of her second
marriage as a wife to the offspring of her first, as
I supposed. Oh, what human conception can
realize the torrent that broke over my soul at that
fearful moment? The shadowy remembrances
which had been softening and fading in the lapse
of years burst at once into life and being Time
and place were forgottenthe passions of youth
rushed into the contest, and I stood as the frail
mortal body shall stand at the final day, when its
own spirit knocks for entrance. The buried
ghosts of my own passions rose from their grave,
the frail cloak of stoicism which had been woven
round me, was blasted into shreds and patches,
and I stood and quailed before a woman's eye like
Belshazzar at his feast. Thou hast felt thy heart
swelling and/plunging against its bony prison, but
thou hast never had it gorged and choked with
the dammed up waters of bitterness, gathered
through long and dreary years. Thou hast felt
the words stick in thy throat, and refuse to leap
into life, but thou wert never struck dumb with a
judgment from Heaven, like a thunderbolt
scorching
and searing into the very citadel of thought
and vitality! Thou hast writhed when stung by
the scorpion tongue of calumny, but thou hast
never been outlawed and abandoned of all human
kindcondemned by thy own conscienceand
given up of God!
His eye shot forth vivid fires, and his arms, as
they were flung abroad in violent gesticulation,
cast giant shadows upon the moonlit waves of the
Chesapeake.
You do both yourself and your friends
grievous
wrong, said Bacon, after a painful pause.
I have indeed wronged myselfmost
wretchedly
wronged myself, but not now; the wrong
which I did to others has recoiled ten-fold upon
my own head. I know full well thy meaning
thou wouldst say that kindly feelings are not
wholly dead within this seared heart! But thou
hast made but little progress in analyzing our
moral structure, if thou dost not know that crime
committed by one whose nature would lead to
good, is the true source of that misery which
surpasseth speech.
An intuitive villain, if there be such, or one
become wholly corrupt, plunges from transgression
to transgression, until his final ruin, without
enduring
any of that wretchedness which comes of a
stain upon a tenderer conscience. Such a man has
no conscience; it is seared or obliterated; but he of
benevolent heart and virtuous impulses, wounds his
guardian angel by the deed. The taint corrupts
and sours the sweets of life into gall and
bitterness
.
If that stain be but a single deed, and
that, dark, damning and indelible, the perpetrator
becomes as an angel of light in the companionship
of hell. He may be likened to one who loses the
power of sight, with all the other senses perfect.
He hears what others see, but to him the grand
medium of perception is dark and dismal, and the
rhapsodies of others are his own damnation. There
is but one hue to his atmosphere; it is the fearful
red which only the blood of man can dye. In his
case the language of scripture is fulfilled before
its time. The moon is turned to blood, and the
morning beam dispelleth not the horrid hue.
Bacon thought any direction of his companion's
thoughts preferable to his present mood, and
therefore
said But she whom you supposed my
mother
I know it all, my son, interrupted the Recluse;
I saw the marble features upon their last journey.
For twenty years I have not envied mortal being,
but I confess to thee, that there was something in
the cessation from thought, suffering and action
and the sleep-like serenity of death for which I
longed. Nevertheless, there is an awful mystery
in that which seemeth so simple in itself. Mere
lifeless clay, moulded by the hands of man into the
same stamp, speaks not to man in the same
language
;
it may indeed refresh the memory, but it
stirreth not up the divinity within us. Who is
he that looketh upon the features of the dead and
looketh not up to the giver and recipient of life?
I saw her mortal remains laid out in the midst of
a camp, and the busy world faded away into
indistinctness
,
while the God of the universe spoke
in the person of the beautiful corse before me and
said Thus far shalt thou go and no farther.
As they steered their course uninterruptedly
towards the source of the Powhatan, which they
had entered as the sunbeams broke through the
morning mists, Bacon threw himself down, and
slept soundly, until he was aroused by the Recluse
to inquire what direction their agents should give
the vessel when they arrived within sight of the
city.
He was roused to immediate thought and action
by the question. He knew the danger of entering
the capital, now that it was in the possession of
Sir William Berkley, and therefore directed the
boatmen to land him some miles above.
The Recluse, at his own request, was put on
shore somewhat nearer the capital, but entirely out
of reach of any precautions which the vigilance
of the Governor might have instituted.
Bacon inquired eagerly, why he left him, after
his promise to draw his sword in the cause of the
people and the country, assuring him at the same
time that he intended bringing the matter to
immediate
issue.
I leave thee now, my son, to set my house in
order. Trust in one who has never failed thee in
need. I will be with thee in this last struggle
for there is something whispers me that it will be
the last. Leave the event, therefore, with him
who rules the destinies of battles. And with these
words he sprang upon the shore and disappeared in
the forest.
In a few hours more, Bacon was again at the
head of his devoted troops, who were entirely
ignorant of the cause of his protracted absence,
but now that they knew its cause, were bursting
with ardour to avenge his own and his country's
wrongs.
CHAPTER XI.
General Bacon's
ardour and decision of
character
were not in the least abated by his late perils
and imprisonment; on the contrary, recent
developments
had relieved him from suspense and
inspired him with new motives for action, to say
nothing of the redress loudly demanded, by all
classes of the citizens, for the Governor's increasing
oppressions. Scarcely was sufficient time allowed
for his devoted officers to shake him cordially by
the hand, before his gallant band of patriots was
marching towards Jamestown, without music or
noise of any kind. There was a cool settled
determination
visible in the countenances of all, which
was admirably evinced by the order and alacrity
with which they obeyed the general's orders.
Bacon's cause had now become personal with
every man in the ranks, composed as they were
principally of hardy planters and more chivalrous
Cavaliers, who knew not at what moment they
might themselves be subjected to like wrongs and
indignities to those from which he had just escaped.
As the chief had anticipated, the patriot army
arrived
on the heights of Jamestown, just as the
shades of night were enclosing the forest. It was
not his intention that Sir William Berkley should
ascertain his arrival and position, until he had made
suitable dispositions for his reception, should he
feel disposed to pay him a visit. Accordingly, the
whole army was immediately employed in digging
an entrenchment, and erecting a barricade of fallen
trees, for the protection of the troops, should it be
found necessary in their future operations. These
transactions took place, it will be remembered, on
the evening of the same day in which Bacon parted
from the Recluse, and landed upon the main shore.
Meanwhile, Sir William Berkley, his family,
suite and followers, of high and low degree, had
effected their landing without opposition at
Jamestown
.
The same night that Bacon and his patriot
followers were entrenching themselves on the
heights, the Governor and his adherents were
marshalling themselves in the city. Great
numbers
of the citizens, however, were decidedly
opposed
to Sir William and his measures; and his
arrival and military preparations were no sooner
perceived, then they betook themselves, with
their families and property, under cover of night,
to the privacy of the neighbouring plantations:
numbers of them accidentally encountered the
patriots at their work, and immediately sending on
their families, joined their standard. Besides
the land and naval forces now at the disposal of the
Governorand they already outnumbered his
opponents
he
offered every inducement to the
worthless
and dissolute loungers of the town to unite
Vol. II. 20
with his army; he did not even hesitate to promise
largely of the plunder, and confiscated property of
the rebels.
On the succeeding morning, the sun rose upon
the ancient city, in unclouded splendour, for the
last time it was destined ever to shine upon the
earliest erected city in North America. It was
the dreaded day to our heroine, appointed for her
marriage. Her uncle had solemnly assured her
upon their landing on the previous day, that the one
which had now arrived, should see her the wife of
Beverly. The latter, too, claimed the fulfilment of
her solemn promise. The distressed and enfeebled
girl knew not whither to turn for sympathy and
succour; she was beset on all sides, and not a little
oppressed with the shackles of her own promise.
She did not dare to hope that her lover had already
made his way from Accomac to her own vicinity.
She remembered indeed, that the Recluse had
charged her, in case of any sudden danger or
emergency
,
to send him a memento of the bloody seal,
but she likewise remembered, that he had since been
the main cause of her separation from one to whom
she was heart and soul devoted. She was also
oppressed
with unutterable sadness on account of her
mother's death, the true account of which she had
just heard,the body having been sent by the
patriots
to the city for burial, immediately before her
arrival. To her aunt she appealed, with touching
pathos; but alas, she could do nothing, even had
she been so disposed. Wyanokee had returned
with the body of her mother, and by her devotion
to the revered remains, revived all Virginia's
former
affection, but she was powerless, and withal a
prisoner, and so wrapped up in her own gloomy
meditations, that she looked more like one of the
dumb idols of her own race, than a living maiden.
When spoken to, she started up as one from a
tranceand without speaking again, sought
communion
with her own ideal world.
The hour was a second time fast approaching
for the celebration of the nuptials of our heroine.
None of the fortunate occurrences or lucky
accidents
for which she had hoped, relieved the
despair
of the fleeting moments. Her uncle and
Beverly had both repeatedly sent up to her
apartments
,
and desired to be admitted to her presence,
but on various pretences they had been as yet
denied
.
Her aunt had again and again urged her to
prepare for the ceremony, but hour after hour flew
by, and she was still sitting in her
robe de
chambre
,
her neglected ringlets hanging in loose
clusters
over her forehead and neck, the former of
which rested upon her hand, and it in its turn upon
her kneeher head turned slightly to one side,
where Wyanokee sat, straight as an Indian arrow,
and silent and immoveable as death. At length she
heard her uncle at the door, who swore that if she
did not dress and descend immediately to the
parlour, where the clergyman and Beverly were
in waiting, he would have the door forced, and
compel her to go through the ceremony even
should her feet refuse to sustain her. Soon after
he had retired, Lady Berkley again entered, when
the distressed and bereaved maiden clasped her
round the neck and wept bitterly. Oh, dearest
aunt, she exclaimed, save me from this
desecration
this
perjury! Great and merciful God, she
cried, loosing her hold, and clasping her hands,
how can I vow before Heaven to love, honour
and obey a man that I abhor and detest?
You should have thought of that, my dear
child, before you gave your solemn promise to
Frank; it is too late now to retract.
Is it even so? then I will swear when they
come to ask me to pledge my vows, that my love
never was mine to give away; that I learned its
existence in another's possession. They shall
notthey cannot force me to swear an untruth.
They may lead me through the outward forms of
a marriage ceremony, but racks and torments shall
not make me in any way accessary to the deed.
If I promised otherwise, it was the last despairing
refuge of outraged nature. It was the instinct
of preservation within me, and not my free and
voluntary act. Influenced by this idea, she stood
like an automaton, and suffered her women to deck
her out in bridal array, and was then mechanically
led from her room, accompanied by her aunt,
Wyanokee, and her female dependants. She found
Sir William Berkley and Frank Beverly waiting
her approach in the entry. She shrunk back at
the sight of the latter, but he, none the less bold,
approached at the same time with her uncle, and
together
they led her toward the room where the
clergyman
waited, with many of the loyal Cavaliers.
When they arrived at the door, and she saw the
reverend gentleman in his robes, and the book
open before him, her excited frame could bear the
tension no longer, and she fell lifeless upon the
floor. A loud roar from the brazen throat of a
cannon
at the same moment shook the windows like a
peal of thunder, and was succeeded by the echoing
blasts of the trumpet's charge, multiplying the
bold challenge as it rolled from river to cliff. This
plan of daring an opponent to battle, was strictly
in accordance with the usages of the age, and was
instantly understood by the Governor and his
friends, all of whom flew to the windows, where
they beheld a sight, which soon drove softer
emotions
from their hearts, if they had any. The
former
saw the smoke curling over Bacon's
breastwork
and entrenchments, and was struck dumb
with amazement. But soon recovering his voice,
and throwing up the sash, he shouted to the
guard below, to arms, to armsfor king and
country.
Whatever were the faults of Sir William
Berkley
,
and they will be considered many in this
refined
age and renovated country, cowardice was
not one of them. In a very few moments he
mounted
his charger and, together with Beverly and
Ludwell, galloped swiftly along his forming
battalions
rebuking the tardy and cheering on the
brave. With his superior numbers and heavier
appointments, he felt as sure of victory as if he
20*
already sat in judgment, or was pronouncing
sentence
upon the chief of the rebels. That Bacon
was already at the head of his army never for a
moment entered his imagination; but the
knowledge
would have made no change in his arrogant
calculations, even had he possessed it.
So confident was he of an easy and speedy
victory
,
that he scouted the idea of remaining within
the palisade, and waiting for the attack of the
patriots
;
and this was indeed becoming every
moment
more impracticable, for the cannon balls from
the heights were even now tearing through the
houses, riddling the ships and throwing his troops
into confusion. No time therefore was to be lost.
He ordered the vessels to draw off into the middle
of the stream, threw open the gates, and sallied
boldly out to meet the foe.
Virginia was borne to her apartment still
senseless, and the physician was immediately sent
for, but before his arrival, she had several times
opened her eyes as her aunt with real but
unavailing
sorrow in her countenance applied the usual
restoratives. At every discharge of the artillery
she slightly moved; her excited imagination
identified
the sound with the fearful thunder that
attended
the former disastrous ceremony at the chapel.
But when her aunt explained to her the occasion
of the uproar, she sprang up in the bed, clasped
her hands, threw her eyes to Heaven, and
exclaimed
,Merciful
God, I thank thee! Providence
has indeed interposed for my preservation! Oh, if
he
could only be there?No, no, no, it is better,
perhaps, as it isfor cruel as my uncle is, I could
not bear to see him pierced by Bacon's sword, and
he would assuredly seek his life. Merciful Father,
thou orderest all things wisely. Aunt, let me
prepare you for another turn of fortune! The
patriots will be successful! my heart assures me
they will. Young Dudley and Harrison are there,
and they have lion hearts; but weep not, aunt, they
are as generous as they are brave.
Sir William Berkley, with that blind,
passionate
,
and impetuous courage for which he was
distinguished
,
scarcely delayed to organize his troops
effectually, but rushed with reckless fury against
his enemies.
Bacon, from the moment that he perceived the
marshalling of the troops outside the gate, silenced
his cannon, and waited with coolness, and in
profound
silence, the approach of the opposing
columns. Sir William began to calculate upon a
bloodless and easy victory, and even contemplated
sending in a flag with terms of capitulation. But
dearly did he pay for his error, and terribly was
he awakened from the momentary delusion.
Bacon had persisted in waiting the onset,
notwithstanding
the impetuous ardour of his troops,
until he could make every shot effective; he
knew his inferiority of numbers, and determined
to compensate for his disparity of force by
coolness
and precision. Wait until you see the
white of their eyes, my fine fellows, was his
often repeated answer to the suggestions and even
entreaties of his impatient cannoniers; but when
at length he did give the word fire! most
effectually
was it echoed. The very heights
seemed
to the panic stricken troops of the Governor, to
pour out red hot iron and smoke. They were
speedily rallied and brought again to the charge
and again the same fearful reception awaited their
farther progress, with the addition, at the second
onset, of a volley of musketry. Dreadful was the
havoc in the royal ranks, and terrible the dismay
of the soldiery. The rabble which the Governor
had hastily collected in the town, fairly took to their
heels and fled to the protection of the fort. Again
the valiant old knight rode among his troops, and
cheered them to the onset, but at each succeeding
attack, some more fatal reserve was brought into
action
.
At length the patriot chief, standing upon his
rude fortification, and looking down upon the
dismayed
and retreating loyalists, began to take
counsel
of his youthful ardourhe longed to measure
swords with the officer whom he beheld riding so
constantly by the side of the Governor. He saw
the officers of the king, as they rode among their
troops, some with tears in their eyes
endeavouring
to rally them, and others swearing and
rebuking
their cowardly followers; and he
determined
to permit them to rally and then bear down
upon them with his own high spirited and ardent
soldiers. He was quickly mounted, as were also
Dudley, Harrison, and the brave band of youthful
Cavaliers who had adhered so long and so
faithfully
to his fortunes. When he announced this
determination
to his army, the welkin rung again
with their joyous acclamations, and every heart
throbbed in unison with his own, and assured him
of victory.
This night, said Bacon in a low voice to
Dudley, as they rode over the entrenchment
Jamestown shall be a heap of ashes!
Dudley made no reply, but smote his clenched
hand upon his harness with emphasis, returning
the glance of his commander with one of cordial
approval.
Sir William Berkley and his subordinates,
seeing
the movement of their opponents, were soon
enabled to rally the disheartened troops, and as the
patriot army marched down the hill, the royalists
in turn, raised the cheering chorus.
The loyal army had not at any time during the
engagement, presented so formidable an
appearance
,
as they did at this moment, and they in their
turn silently awaited the sortie of the enemy. As
Bacon's followers debouched, they visibly
accelerated
their pace to double quick time, and the
two bodies came together with a shock like the
explosion of a magazine. Terrible was the
melee
,
and dreadful the carnage which ensued. As they
closed, Bacon raised his voice, and addressing
Beverly by name, called upon him to sustain his
late charges. Consternation was visible in the
countenances both of Beverly and the Governor
at the unexpected appearance of the patriot chief,
but the former yielded to it only for an instant
in the next the youthful champions plunged the
rowels into the flanks of their chargers, and
rushed
at each other like infuriated wild beasts. The
fire flew from their swords, and their eyes flashed
not less brightly, but at the first onset, Beverly's
weapon snapped off short at the guard. Bacon
raised himself in the stirrups, and was about to
plunge his blade deep into the breast of his hated
rival, but it fell harmless upon the mane of his
charger, and he drew back to the command of his
troops. Beverly wheeled his horse and rode
slowly
from the field, deeply wounded and mortified; as
much perhaps at the contrast between Bacon's
forbearance
and his own late vote of condemnation,
as at the disaster and defeat he had sustained.
As Bacon returned to reanimate his troops, he
found that a new ally was doing battle in his
cause. He saw near the right wing, the flourishes
of a gigantic arm, which he had formerly seen do
service. The Recluse was indeed there; how
long since, Bacon knew not, but he seemed to be
already in the thickest of the fight. He had lost
his cap, and his bald head towered amid his
fellows
and brightly glistened in the sun. His
right arm was bare to the shoulder, and dyed with
blood to the finger ends. He seemed striving to
throw his life away, and more than once thrust
himself into the very ranks of the foe, but as
often the terror-struck loyalists gave way before
him. He seemed to be perfectly invulnerable,
for not a wound had he yet received.
The consequences of the first repulse at the
assault
on Bacon's intrenchments could not be
overcome
by the now exhausted and dismayed loyalists.
One column after another gave way, and fled into
the town, until not more than half remained.
These were the regular troops, which had
throughout
adhered so firmly to the person and fortunes of
the Governor. His friends urged him to
capitulate
,
but he was as obstinate in battle as he had
before shown himself in council.
He was at length almost dragged from the field
by his friendsas all his troops were flying in
disorder
and confusion into the town. The patriots
rushed in, together with their flying foes. The
Recluse had seized some flying charger, and, still
bareheaded, was dealing death to those who came
within the sweep of his terrific weapon. Bacon over
and over again, offered quarter to the flying
remnant
,
but they fought as they ran, keeping up
something
like an irregular action, the whole distance
from the field of battle to the city.
At length both parties were within the walls, and
the fight was renewed, but the loyalists were soon
driven from the field. Some escaped by boats to
the shippingand among these, Sir William
Berkley
was forcibly dragged from the city as he had
been from the field. In vain he pleaded the
situation
of his wife and niece; he was assured by his
friends of their safety in the hands of the victor,
and still urged forward in his flight. Many poor
fellows plunged into the river, and endeavoured to
save themselves by swimming to the ships which
still adhered to the loyal cause, but numbers
perished
in the attempt.
Bacon with difficulty restrained himself by a
sense of duty, long enough to see the victory
complete
,
before he leaped from his horse, and rushed
up the stairs of the Governor's house, where, in a
few moments, he was clasped in the arms of the
amazed and delighted Virginia, notwithstanding
the presence of Lady Berkley. He had no sooner
exchanged those thousand little nameless but
endearing
questions and answers, that leap into life
unbidden after such an absence and such a meeting,
than he turned to Lady Berkley, and said.
Madam
,
a safe escort to convey you to your husband,
waits your commands, at any moment you may
choose to leave the city.
But my nieceis she also free to go?
What says my Virginiawill she accept a
soldier's
protection?
With all my heart and soul, she answered.
While they discoursed thus, the bells were
ringing
,
and huge columns of smoke shot up past the
windows on every side, and burning timbers
sparkled
and cracked with increasing and startling
rapidity. Bacon instantly understood the cause,
and taking Virginia in his arms, and bidding Lady
Berkley and Wyanokee, who till now had scarcely
been noticed, to follow, he rushed into the street,
and beheld Jamestown in flames. In a short time
it was a pile of black and scorched ruins, as it has
stood from that day to the present.
Vol. II. 21
CHAPTER XIII.
After
the battle and destruction of Jamestown,
Sir William Berkley, accompanied by his now
liberated Lady and his remaining followers,
comprising
the still loyal marine force, retired again to
the shades of Accomac, where we will leave him
and the remaining events of his life in the hands
of the historian.
The political power of the colony was now in
the possession of the victorious chief, so lately
condemned to death. He was not long in
surrendering
it to a convention of the people,
summoned
to meet at Middle Plantations, (
Williamsburg
,)
for that purpose, and in their hands we will
leave the political affairs of the future mother of
states. Our only remaining duty is to follow the
fortunes of the principal characters of our
narrative
.
The successful general, after attending to
his military and political duties, accompanied his
now betrothed bride from the ruins of Jamestown
to the new seat of government. It was a
delightful
summer eveningthe sun was just sinking
beneath
a horizon, where the darker blue of the
distant
landscape softened the shades of the azure
sky, both merging in the indistinct prospect so as
to form a magnificent back ground to a panorama,
bathed in a flood of golden light. The youthful
and happy pair instinctively reined up their horses,
and gazed upon the enchanting scene, until their
hearts were full of love and adoration.
Then by one impulse they turned their horses'
heads, and gazed upon one far different, which they
were leaving. The ruins of the first civilized
settlement in North America were still sending
up volumes of smoke, through which at intervals
gleamed a lurid flash, as some more combustible
materials fell into the mass of living embers below.
But there were associations with this scene, to the
hearts of our pilgrims, which no tongue or pen can
describe; the melancholy treasures of memory
collected
through long forgotten years, came gushing
back over their hearts in a resistless torrent. The
scenes of their childhoodof all their romantic
dreams, and those fairy and too unreal creations
of young lifethe graves of their relations and
friends, were about to be surrendered up to the
dominion of the thistle and the ivy, there to
moulder
through all future generations.
[13]
[13]
The ivy capped ruins of the old church are all that remain to
this day of the ancient city. We trust that no irreverent hands
will ever be laid upon that venerable pile; but that it may be suffered
to stand in its own melancholy grandeur, as long as its materials
may cling together.
But this was
not all that was saddening in the view before them.
The Indian captives, some two hundred in number,
were ascending the heights to the very spot which
they occupied, on their way to the far west.
Poor and friendless beings they were! their
worldly
store they wore upon their backs, consisting for
the most part of worn out leather garments, and
a few worthless baubles carried in their wallets.
They skirted along the brow of the hill in Indian
filetheir steps slow and melancholy. They too
were about to leave the scenes of their long sojourn,
the broad and fertile lands which they had
inherited
from the beginning of timethe honoured
relies
of their dead, and all the loved associations
which cling to the heart of the rudest of
mankind
,
when about to leave for ever the shades of
home. They were just entering upon the
wearisome
pilgrimage of the exile, under a combination
of the most cruel and unfortunate circumstances,
and in a condition the worst calculated to subdue
new countries, and battle with hostile tribes. As
they passed in review before the youthful pair of
another
race, no sign of recognition manifested itself.
They moved along with the gravity and solemnity
of a funeral procession, until the last of the line
stood before them. It was Wyanokee! She
paused
attempted
to pass on like her predecessors,
but her feet refused to bear her from the spot, and
turning to them she cried as if the words had burst
irresistibly from her heart, Oh cruel and
treacherous
is the white man! See you those braves,
going down the path of yonder hill? So they
have been going ever since Powhatan made the
first peace with your race. May the Great Spirit
who dwells beyond the clouds, shower mercies
upon you both, equal to the wrongs which your
people have visited upon ours. And having thus
spoken she broke away, and ran swiftly down the
hill in pursuit of her countrymen. She saw that
Virginia was struggling with her emotions to speak,
and she rushed away lest she should again be
compelled
to listen to a subject which was disagreeable
to her. Virginia, before her own departure, had
exhausted her persuasive powers in the vain effort
to induce her to remain. A hope had till now
lingered in her heart, that Wyanokee would
follow
her to Middle Plantations, and once more
take up her abode in her house, but when she saw
the last traces of her receding figure through the
shadowy gloom of the forest, she knew that she
looked upon the Indian maiden for the last time
on earth.
With swimming eyes the lovers pursued their
way across the narrow peninsula. Virginia
sobbed
aloud, until she had given vent to her
overcharged
heart. But an easy and gentle palfrey, and
a devoted and obsequious lover, do not often fail to
revive a lady's spirits, especially through such
scenes as she now beheld, bathed as they were
in the mellow glories of a summer twilight.
Hope told a flattering tale, and our hero and
heroine would have been more or less than
mortal
,
and wise beyond their years, had they not
listened to it. Their laughter was not loud and
joyous, it is true, they were far too happy for that;
their frames trembled with the exquisite pleasure
which words warm from and to the heart
produced
.
Sometimes they were silent indeed, but not
for want of thoughts to interchange. Words had
exhausted their power.
They had not proceeded many miles on their
way, and the sun still hung as it were suspended
beyond the purple glories of the horizon, when
Bacon
pointed with his riding whip to an object before
them which quickly changed the current of his
companion's thoughts. Like human life, their short
journey seemed destined to exhibit many dark
and gloomy shadows. It was the Recluse; he
was leaning against a tree, apparently waiting their
approach, for as they rode up, he stepped out into
the highway and saluted them. Virginia trembled
upon her saddle with very different sensations from
those to which we have just alluded, but her lover
hastily unfolded to her his name and former
delusion
.
This, my young friends, said the Recluse,
is our last meeting on earthand I have sought
it that I might bless you both, before my departure
from the land in which I have so long been a
sojourner
and an exile from the haunts of men.
Whither are you going? asked Bacon in
astonishment. You certainly will not leave us,
now that the very time has arrived when you may
dwell here in safety. I had even calculated upon
having you as an inmate at my house.
It cannot be, replied the Recluse. My
destiny calls me to a place far north of this, where
some of my old comrades and now fellow sufferers,
dwell in comparative peace and security. But it
is only detaining you after night fall, to multiply
words. May God of his infinite mercy bless and
preserve you both, and thus speaking he also
departed
,
and was seen no more.
[14]
[14]
Our authority for assuming that one of the Regicides secluded
himself for a time near Jamestown, may be found in Stiles'
Judges, Chapter VI.
On a certain evening, not very long after the
one just spoken of, General Bacon was married to
Miss Virginia Fairfax, and at the same time and
place Charles Dudley, Esq. led to the altar Miss
Harriet Harrison.
After this happy announcement, it becomes our
painful duty to cast a melancholy blemish upon
the character of one who has figured in our
narrative
.
On the two several occasions, namely, of
his release from captivity by the storming and
capture of Jamestown, and his master's marriage,
Brian O'Reily was found hopelessly, helplessly
drunk; or according to his own explanation, in
that state in which a man feels upward for the
earth.
THE END.